***those questions are to be ready for your linux exam***

1. Linux Interview questions
2. How to use find command to find all links in a folder
3. How to find a process and kill it 
 ps -ef | grep <pid process> 
4. How to run a command in a background 
5. How to copy file scurely from one machine to another 
6. how to ccopy file securely from one machine to another without a       password  
7. How to remove all empty files in any given foleder
8. How to find a process listening on a particular port 
   netstat -nap | grep process_id 
9. List files opened by a given process
   lsof -p <pid> 
   ps -aef | grep <pid> 
   ls -l /proc/<pid>/fd

10.
What is a kernel modules ?
Where are located kernel modules ?
How to load a missing kernel modules
---------------------------
You want to search for all the *.tar files in your Home directory and wants to delete all at once. How will you do it?
-----------------------
Enlist some Linux networking and troubleshooting commands?
----------------------
 Enlist the basic components of LINUX?
Answer: Linux operating system basically consists of 3 components which are enlisted below

Kernel: This is considered as the core part and is responsible for all major activities of the Linux operating system. Linux Kernel is considered as free and open source software which is capable of managing hardware resources for the users. It consists of various modules and interacts directly with the underlying hardware.
System Library: Most of the functionalities of the operating system are implemented by System Libraries. These act as a special function using which application programs accesses Kernel’s features.
System Utility: These programs are responsible for performing specialized, individual-level tasks.

-----------------------------------
How Can I Redirect Both Stderr And Stdin At Once?

11.
Do you contribute to any Open Source projects?
Describe the linux boot process with as much detail as possible, starting from when the system is powered on and ending when you get a prompt
How to find shared library dependencies
What is LD_LIBRARY_PATH?
How to install a missing library in linux
What fields are stored in an inode
What are MAJOR and MINOR numbers of special files
-----------------
The only important thing with a device file are its major and minor device numbers, which are shown instead of the file size:
What Are Inodes In Linux ? How To Find The Inode Associated With A File ?


-----------------------
Systemd Over Init System, What Do You Think?
How To Check All The Installed Kernel Modules?

---------------------
      $ ls -l /dev/hda
brw-rw---- 1 root disk 8, 0 mars  9 07:56 /dev/sda
Shows permissions ( brw-rw----), owner (root), group (disk), major device number (8), minor device number (0), date (mars 9 - french, no year), hour (07:56) and device name (guess :-).

When accessing a device file, the major number selects which device driver is being called to perform the input/output operation. This call is being done with the minor number as a parameter and it is entirely up to the driver how the minor number is being interpreted. The driver documentation usually describes how the driver uses minor numbers.


----------------

Steps to add a user to a system without using useradd/adduser

11.
Computer Science questions
How does DNS work and when should you have backup DNS?
What are the pros and cons of using cloud applications?
What is a disaster recovery plan?
Role-specific questions
How do you ensure technical documentation is up-to-date?
What was the last piece of software you installed on a server?
If a website is slow, how do you troubleshoot the problem? Describe your approach step-by-step.
How do you manage system configuration?
Are you familiar with virtualization and containerization? Mention any experience you have using tools like VMware or Virtualbox.
Describe your tasks concerning a SQL server deployment.
What tests would you run to ensure an application runs smoothly?
How can you debug a program while it’s being used?
What do you know about the Java Scripting API? Can you think of a use case
What’s the best automation software for Windows?
If we’re deploying a new system, who do you need to collaborate with to ensure system development, testing and implementation?
Behavioral questions
What resources do you use (e.g. forums, websites and books) to keep up-to-date with engineering trends?
What types of problems have you encountered most often in operational systems after deployment?
Describe a time when you had to make a presentation. How did you manage to explain technical details to a non-technical audience?
What’s your biggest engineering challenge you have faced so far?







 In this article we will discuss top 30 linux system admin interview questions with the answers for experience professionals. Below mentioned questions may help the readers to clear Linux interviews. If you like these questions , please don’t hesitate to share on Facebook,google+ and Twitter.

 Q:1 Why is LVM is required ?
Ans: LVM stands for Logical Volume Manager , to resize filesystem’s size online we required LVM partition in Linux. Size of LVM partition can be extended and reduced using the lvextend & lvreduce commands respectively.

Q:2 How To check Memory stats and CPU stats ?

Ans:  Using ‘free’ & ‘vmstat’ command we can display the physical and virtual memory statistics respectively.With the help of ‘sar’ command we see the CPU utilization & other stats.

 Q:3 What does Sar provides and at which location Sar logs are stored ?
Ans: Sar Collect, report, or save system activity information. The default version of the sar command (CPU utilization report) might be one of the first facilities the  user  runs  to  begin system  activity investigation, because it monitors major system resources. If CPU utilization is near 100 percent (user + nice + system), the workload sampled is CPU-bound.

By  default log files of Sar command  is located at  /var/log/sa/sadd file, where the dd parameter indicates the current day.

 Q:4 How to increase the size of LVM partition ?
Ans: Below are the Logical Steps :
– Use the lvextend command (lvextend -L +100M /dev/<Name of the LVM Partition> , in this example we are extending the size by 100MB.
– resize2fs /dev/<Name of the LVM Partition>
– check the size of partition using ‘df -h’ command

 Q:5 How to reduce or shrink the size of LVM partition ?
Ans: Below are the logical Steps to reduce size of LVM partition :
-Umount the filesystem using umount command,
-use resize2fs command , e.g resiz2fs /dev/mapper/myvg-mylv 10G
-Now use the lvreduce command , e.g lvreduce -L 10G /dev/mapper/myvg-mylv

Above Command will shrink the size & will make the filesystem size 10GB.

 Q:6 How to create partition from the raw disk ?
Ans: Using fdisk utility we can create partitions from the raw disk.Below are the steps to create partition from the raw dsik :
– fdisk  /dev/hd* (IDE) or /dev/sd* (SCSI)
– Type n to create a new partition
–  After creating partition , type w command to write the changes to the partition table.

 Q:7 Where the kernel modules are located ?
Ans: The ‘/lib/modules/kernel-version/’ directory stores all kernel modules or compiled drivers in Linux operating system. Also with ‘lsmod’ command we can see all the installed kernel modules.

 Q:8 What is umask ?
Ans: umask stands for ‘User file creation mask’, which determines the settings of a mask that controls which file permissions are set for files and directories when they are created.

 Q:9 How to set the umask permanently for a user?
Ans: To set this value permanently for a user, it has to be put in the appropriate profile file which depends on the default shell of the user.

 Q:10 How to change the default run level in linux ?
Ans: To change the run level we have to edit the file “/etc/inittab” and change initdefault entry ( id:5:initdefault:). Using ‘init’ command we change the run level temporary like ‘init 3′ , this command will move the system in runlevl 3.

 Q:11 How to share a directory using nfs ?
Ans: To share a directory using nfs , first edit the configuration file ‘/etc/exportfs’ , add a entry like
‘/<directory-name>  <ip or Network>(Options)’ and then restart the nfs service.

 Q:12 How to check and mount nfs share ?
Ans: Using ‘showmount’ command we can see what directories are shared via nfs e.g ‘showmount -e <ip address of nfs server>’.Using mount command we can mount the nfs share on linux machine.

 Q:13 What are the default ports used for SMTP,DNS,FTP,DHCP,SSH and squid ?
Ans: Service      Port
SMTP          25
DNS            53
FTP             20 (data transfer) , 21 ( Connection established)
DHCP         67/UDP(dhcp server) , 68/UDP(dhcp client)
SSH            22
Squid         3128

 Q:14 What is Network Bonding ?
Ans: Network bonding is the aggregation of multiple Lan cards into a single bonded interface to provide fault tolerance and high performance. Network bonding is also known as NIC Teaming.

Q:15 What  are the different modes of Network bonding in Linux ?
Ans: Below are list of modes used in Network Bonding :

balance-rr or 0 – round-robin mode for fault tolerance and load balancing.
active-backup or 1 – Sets active-backup mode for fault tolerance.
balance-xor or 2 – Sets an XOR (exclusive-or) mode for fault tolerance and load balancing.
broadcast or 3 – Sets a broadcast mode for fault tolerance. All transmissions are sent on all slave interfaces.
802.3ad or 4  – Sets an IEEE 802.3ad dynamic link aggregation mode. Creates aggregation groups that share the same speed & duplex settings.
balance-tlb or 5 –  Sets a Transmit Load Balancing (TLB) mode for fault tolerance & load balancing.
balance-alb or 6 –  Sets an Active Load Balancing (ALB) mode for fault tolerance & load balancing.
 Q:16 How to check and verify the status the bond interface.

Ans: Using the command ‘cat /proc/net/bonding/bond0′ , we can check which mode is enabled and what lan cards are used in this bond. In this example we have one only one bond interface but we can have multiple bond interface like bond1,bond2 and so on.

 Q:17 How to check default route and routing table ?
Ans: Using the Commands ‘netstat -nr’ and ‘route -n’ we can see the default route and routing tables.

 Q:18 How to check which ports are listening in my Linux Server ?
Asn:  Use the Command ‘netstat –listen’ and ‘lsof -i’

 Q:19 List the services that are enabled at a particular run level in linux server ?
Ans: With the help of command ‘chkconfig –list | grep 5:on’ we can list all the service that are enabled in run level5. For other run levels just replace 5 with the respective run level.

 Q:20 How to enable a service at a particular run level ?
Ans: We can enable a service using the Command ‘chkconfig <Service-Name> on –level 3′

 Q:21 How to upgrade Kernel in Linux ?
Ans: We should never upgrade Linux Kernel , always install the new New kernel using rpm command because upgrading a kenel can make your linux box in a unbootable state.

 Q:22 How To scan newly asssigned luns on linux box without rebooting ?
Ans: There are two ways to scan newly assigned luns :
Method:1 if sg3 rpm is installed , then run the command ‘rescan-scsi-bus.sh’
Method:2 Run the Command ,  echo ” – – – ” > /sys/class/scsi_host/hostX/scan

 Q:23 How  to find WWN numbers of HBA cards in Linux Server ?
Ans: We can find the WWN numbers of HBA cards using the command ‘systool -c fc_host -v | grep port_name’

 Q:24 How to add & change the Kernel parameters ?
Ans: To Set the kernel parameters in linux , first edit the file ‘/etc/sysctl.conf’ after making the changes save the file and run the command ‘sysctl -p’ , this command will make the changes permanently without rebooting the machine.

 Q:25 What is Puppet Server ?
Ans: Puppet is an open-source & enterprise software for configuration management toll in UNIX like  operating system.  Puppet is a  IT automation software used to push configuration to its clients (puppet agents) using code. Puppet code can do a variety of tasks from installing new software, to check file permissions, or updating user accounts & lots of other tasks.

 Q:26 What are manifests in Puppet ?
Ans: Manifests, in Puppet, are the files in which the client configuration is specified.

 Q:27 Which Command is used to sign requested certificates in Puppet Server ?
Ans: ‘puppetca  –sign hostname-of-agent’ in (2.X)  & ‘puppet ca  sign hostname-of-agent’ in  (3.X)

 Q:28  At which location  Puppet Master Stores Certificates ?
Ans:  /var/lib/puppet/ssl/ca/signed

 Q:29 How to find all the regular files in a directory  ?
Ans: using the command ‘find /<directory -type f’.

 Q:30 What is load average in a linux ?
Ans: Load  Average is defined as the average sum of the number of process waiting in the run queue and number of process currently executing over the period of 1,5 and 15  minutes. Using the ‘top’ and ‘uptime’ command we find the load average of a linux sever.


Linux interview questions - posted on April 14, 2013 at 16:25 PM by Kshipra Singh

1. Which account is created on Linux installation?

- With the installation of Linux, a super user account is created called as ‘root’.

2. Which daemon tracks events on your system?

- The syslogd daemon tracks the system information and saves it to specified log files.

3. Which command would you use if you want to remove the password assigned to a group?

- gpasswd – r removes the password from the group. 
- Here, the gpasswd changes the password of the group and when it is accompanied by –r, the password gets removed.

4. You wish to print a file ‘draft’ with 60 lines to a page. What command would you use?

- The command that I would use is: pr -l60 draft
- The default page length when using pr is 66 lines. 
- The -l option specifies a different length.

Test your linux knowledge with our multiple choice questions!

Linux part 1 (27 questions)
Linux part 2 (25 questions)
Linux part 3 (25 questions)  

Download Linux interview questions and answers

5. Which file would you examine to determine the levels of messages written to system log files?

- kernel.h

6. You are logged on as a regular user. Without logging off and logging on as root, you are required to create a new user account immediately. How would you do it?

- This can be achieved by issuing the su command. 
- This will prompt you for the password of the root account.
- Providing the password, logs you in as root. Now, you can perform any administrative duties. .

7. You are required to restore the file memo.ben. It was backed up in the tar file MyBackup.tar. Which command would you use to do it?

- The command that we would use is: tar xf MyBackup.tar memo.ben
- It uses the x switch to extract a file.

8. What is partial backup?

- When you select only a portion of your file hierarchy or a single partition to back up, it is called partial back up.

9. What is the fastest way to enter a series of commands from the command-line?

- Write the commands, each separated by a semi-colon. Press enter after the last command. 
- The semi-colon would inform the shell that multiple commands are being entered at the command line, to be executed serially.

10. What are the qualities of soft links?

a.) Soft link files have different inode numbers than source file
b.) The soft link file will be of no use if original file is deleted. 
c.) Soft links are not updated
d.) They can create links between directories
e.) They can cross file system boundaries

11. Differentiate between Cron and Anacron.

a.) Minimum granularity with Cron is minute while it is in days with Anacron. 
b.) Cron job can be scheduled by any normal user while Anacron can be scheduled only by the super user. 
c.) Cron expects the system to be up and running while the Anacron doesn’t expect the system to be up and running all the time. In case of anacron if a job is scheduled and the system is down that time, it will execute the job as soon as the system is up and running. 
d.) Cron is ideal for servers while Anacron is ideal for desktops and laptops. 
e. ) Cron should be used when you want a job to be executed at a particular hour and minute while Anacron should be used in when the job can be executed irrespective of the hour and minute.

12.) What is an INODE?

- It is a structure which has the description of all the files and pointers to the data blocks of file stored in it. 
- The information contained is file-size, access and modification time, permission and so on.

13. Which command is used to check the number of files and disk space used and the each user’s defined quota?

repquota command is used to check the status of the user’s quota along with the disk space and number of files used. This command gives a summary of the user’s quota that how much space and files are left for the user. Every user has a defined quota in Linux. This is done mainly for the security, as some users have only limited access to files. This provides a security to the files from unwanted access. The quota can be given to a single user or to a group of users.

14. What is the name and path of the main system log?

By default the main system log is /var/log/messages. This file contains all the messages and the script written by the user. By default all scripts are saved in this file. This is the standard system log file, which contains messages from all system software, non-kernel boot issues, and messages that go to 'dmesg'. dmesg is a system file that is written upon system boot.

16. How secured is Linux? Explain.

Security is the most important aspect of an operating system. Due to its unique authentication module, Linux is considered as more secured than other operating systems. Linux consists of PAM. PAM is Pluggable Authentication Modules. It provides a layer between applications and actual authentication mechanism. It is a library of loadable modules which are called by the application for authentication. It also allows the administrator to control when a user can log in. All PAM applications are configured in the directory "/etc/pam.d" or in a file "/etc/pam.conf". PAM is controlled using the configuration file or the configuration directory.

17. Can Linux computer be made a router so that several machines may share a single Internet connection? How?

Yes a Linux machine can be made a router. This is called "IP Masquerade." IP Masquerade is a networking function in Linux similar to the one-to-many (1: Many) NAT (Network Address Translation) servers found in many commercial firewalls and network routers. The IP Masquerade feature allows other "internal" computers connected to this Linux box (via PPP, Ethernet, etc.) to also reach the Internet as well. Linux IP Masquerading allows this functionality even if the internal computers do not have IP addresses.
The IP masquerading can be done by the following steps:

1. The Linux PC must have an internet connection and a connection to LAN. Typically, the Linux PC has two network interfaces-an Ethernet card for the LAN and a dial-up PPP connection to the Internet (through an ISP).

2. All other systems on your LAN use the Linux PC as the default gateway for TCP/IP networking. Use the same ISP-provided DNS addresses on all systems.

3. Enable IP forwarding in the kernel. By default the IP forwarding is not enabled. To ensure that IP forwarding is enabled when you reboot your system, place this command in the /etc/rc.d/rc.local file.

4. Run /sbin/iptables-the IP packet filter administration program-to set up the rules that enable the Linux PC to masquerade for your LAN.

18. What is the minimum number of partitions you need to install Linux?

Minimum 2 partitions are needed for installing Linux. The one is / or root which contains all the files and the other is swap. Linux file system is function specific which means that files and folders are organized according to their functionality. For example, all executables are in one folder, all devices in another, all libraries in another and so on. / or ‘root’ is the base of this file system. All the other folders are under this one. / can be consider as C: .Swap is a partition that will be used as virtual memory. If there is no more available RAM a Linux computer will use an area of the hard disk, called swap, to temporarily store data. In other words it is a way of expanding your computers RAM.

19. Which command is used to review boot messages?

dmesg command is used to review boot messages. This command will display system messages contained in the kernel ring buffer. We can use this command immediately after booting to see boot messages. A ring buffer is a buffer of fixed size for which any new data added to it overwrites the oldest data in it. Its basic syntax is

dmesg [options]

Invoking dmesg without any of its options causes it to write all the kernel messages to standard output. This usually produces far too many lines to fit into the display screen all at once, and thus only the final messages are visible. However, the output can be redirected to the less command through the use of a pipe, thereby allowing the startup messages to be viewed on one screen at a time
dmesg | less

20. Which utility is used to make automate rotation of a log?

logrotate command is used to make automate rotation of log.
Syntax of the command is:
logrotate [-dv] [-f|] [-s|] config_file+
It allows automatic rotation, compression, removal, and mailing of log files. This command is mainly used for rotating and compressing log files. This job is done every day when a log file becomes too large. This command can also be run by giving on command line. We can done force rotation by giving –f option with this command in command line. This command is also used for mailing. We can give –m option for mailing with this command. This option takes two arguments one is subject and other is recipient name.

21. What are the partitions created on the mail server hard drive?

The main partitions are done firstly which are root, swap and boot partition. But for the mail server three different partitions are also done which are as follows:
1. /var/spool- This is done so that if something goes wrong with the mail server or spool than the output cannot overrun the file system.
2. /tmp- putting this on its own partition prevents any user item or software from overrunning the system files.
3. /home- putting this on its own is useful for system upgrades or reinstalls. It allow not to wipe off the /home hierarchy along with other areas.

22. What are the fields in the/etc/passwd file?

It contains all the information of the users who log into the system. It contains a list of the system's accounts, giving for each account some useful information like user ID, group ID, home directory, shell, etc. It should have general read permission as many utilities, like ls use it to map user IDs to user names, but write access only for the superuser (root). The main fields of /etc/passwd file are:
1. Username: It is used when user logs in. It should be between 1 and 32 characters in length.
2. Password: An x character indicates that encrypted password is stored in /etc/shadow file.
3. User ID (UID): Each user must be assigned a user ID (UID). UID 0 (zero) is reserved for root and UIDs 1-99 are reserved for other predefined accounts. Further UID 100-999 are reserved by system for administrative and system accounts/groups.
4. Group ID (GID): The primary group ID (stored in /etc/group file)
5. User ID Info: The comment field. It allow you to add extra information about the users such as user's full name, phone number etc. This field use by finger command.
6. Home directory: The absolute path to the directory the user will be in when they log in. If this directory does not exists then users directory becomes /
7. Command/shell: The absolute path of a command or shell (/bin/bash). Typically, this is a shell.

23. Which commands are used to set a processor-intensive job to use less CPU time?

nice command is used for changing priority of the jobs.
Syntax: nice [OPTION] [COMMAND [ARG]...]
Range of priority goes from -20 (highest priority) to 19 (lowest).Priority is given to a job so that the most important job is executed first by the kernel and then the other least important jobs. This takes less CPU times as the jobs are scheduled and are given priorities so the CPU executes fast. The priority is given by numbers like -20 describe the highest priority and 19 describe the least priority.

24. How to change window manager by editing your home directory?

/.xinitrc file allows changing the window manager we want to use when logging into X from that account. The dot in the file name shows you that the file is a hidden file and doesn't show when you do a normal directory listing. For setting a window manager we have to save a command in this file. The syntax of command is: exec windowmanager.After this, save the file. Next time when you run a startx a new window manager will open and become default. The commands for starting some popular window managers and desktop environments are:
-KDE = startkde
-Gnome = gnome-session
-Blackbox = blackbox
-FVWM = fvwm
-Window Maker = wmaker
-IceWM = icewm

25. How documentation of an application is stored?

When a new application is installed its documentation is also installed. This documentation is stored under the directory named for application. For example if my application name is App1 then the path of the documentation will be /user/doc/App1. It contains all the information about the application. It contains date of creating application, name of application and other important module of the application. We can get the basic information of application from the documentation.

26. How shadow passwords are given?

pwconv command is used for giving shadow passwords. Shadow passwords are given for better system security. The pwconv command creates the file /etc/shadow and changes all passwords to ‘x’ in the /etc/passwd file. First, entries in the shadowed file which don't exist in the main file are removed. Then, shadowed entries which don't have `x' as the password in the main file are updated. Any missing shadowed entries are added. Finally, passwords in the main file are replaced with `x'. These programs can be used for initial conversion as well to update the shadowed file if the main file is edited by hand.

27. How do you create a new user account?

useradd command is used for creating a new user account. When invoked without the
-D option, the useradd command creates a new user account using the values specified on the command line and the default values from the system. The new user account will be entered into the system files as needed, and initial files copied, depending on the command line options. This command uses the system default as home directory. If –m option is given then the home directory is made.

28. Which password package is installed for the security of central password?

Shadow password packages are used for security of central passwords. Security is the most important aspect of every operating system. When this package is not installed the user information including passwords is stored in the /etc/passwd file. The password is stored in an encoded format. These encoded forms can be easily identified by the System crackers by randomly encoding the passwords from dictionaries. The Shadow Package solves the problem by relocating the passwords to another file (usually /etc/shadow). The /etc/shadow file is set so that it cannot be read by just anyone. Only root will be able to read and write to the /etc/shadow file.

29. Which shell do you assign to a POP3 mail-only account?

POP3 mail only account is assigned to the /bin/false shell. However, assigning bash shell to a POP3 mail only gives user login access, which is avoided. /bin/nologin can also be used. This shell is provided to the user when we don’t want to give shell access to the user. The user cannot access the shell and it reject shell login on the server like on telnet. It is mainly for the security of the shells. POP3 is basically used for downloading mail to mail program. So for illegal downloading of emails on the shell this account is assigned to the /bin/false shell or /bin/nologin. These both shells are same they both do the same work of rejecting the user login to the shell. The main difference between these two shells is that false shell shows the incorrect code and any unusual coding when user login with it. But the nologin shell simply tells that no such account is available. So nologin shell is used mostly in Linux.

30. Which daemon is responsible for tracking events on Linux system?

syslogd is responsible for tracking system information and save it to the desired log files. It provides two system utilities which provide system logging and kernel message trapping. Internet and UNIX domain sockets support enable this utility package to support both local and remote logging. Every logged message contains at least a time and a hostname field, normally a program name field, too. So to track these information this daemon is used. syslogd mainly reacts to the set of signals given by the user. These are the signals given to syslogd: SIGHUP: This lets syslogd perform a re-initialization. All open files are closed, the configuration file (default is /etc/syslog.conf) will be reread and the syslog facility is started again. SIGTERM: The syslogd will die. SIGINT, SIGQUIT: If debugging is enabled these are ignored, otherwise syslogd will die. SIGUSR1: Switch debugging on/off. This option can only be used if syslogd is started with the - d debug option. SIGCHLD: Wait for Childs if some were born, because of waiting messages.

31. Which daemon is used for scheduling of the commands?

The crontab command is used for scheduling of the commands to run at a later time. SYNTAX
crontab [ -u user ] file
crontab [ -u user ] { -l | -r | -e }

Options
-l List - display the current crontab entries.

-r Remove the current crontab.

-e Edit the current crontab using the editor specified by the VISUAL or EDITOR environment variables.
When user exits from the editor, the modified crontab will be installed automatically. Each user can have their own crontab, and though these are files in /var, they are not intended to be edited directly. If the –u option is given than the crontab gives the name of the user whose crontab is to be tweaked. If it is given without this then it will display the crontab of the user who is executing the command.

32. How environment variable is set so that the file permission can be automatically set to the newly created files?

umask command is used to set file permission on newly created files automatically. 
Syntax
umask [-p] [-S] [mode]
It is represented in octal numbers. We can simply use this command without arguments to see the current file permissions. To change the permissions, mode is given in the arguments. The default umask used for normal user is 0002. The default umask for the root user is 0022. For calculating the original values, the values shown by the umask must be subtracted by the default values. It is mainly used for masking of the file and directory permission. The /etc/profile script is where the umask command is usually set for all users. The –S option can be used to see the current default permissions displayed in the alpha symbolic format. 
For example, umask 022 ensures that new files will have at most 755 permissions (777 NAND 022).
The permissions can be calculated by taking the NAND of original value with the default values of files and directories.

Linux interview - August 21, 2008 at 22:00 pm by Rajmeet Ghai

What is Linux and why is it so popular?

Answer - Linux is an operating system that uses UNIX like Operating system.......

Unix interview questions with answers

Discuss the mount and unmount system calls, What are the process states in Unix?, What is use of sed command?, What is 'inode'?,What are the Unix system calls for I/O?, How are devices represented in UNIX?, Brief about the directory representation in UNIX ......

What is LILO? 

Answer - LILO is Linux Loader is a boot loader for Linux. It is used to load Linux into the memory and start the Operating system.......

What is the difference between home directory and working directory?

Answer - Home directory is the default working directory when a user logs in. On the other hand, working directory is the user’s current directory.......

What is the difference between internal and external commands?

Answer - Internal commands are commands that are already loaded in the system. They can be executed any time and are independent.......

Explain the difference between a static library and a dynamic library.

Answer - Static libraries are loaded when the program is compiled and dynamically-linked libraries are loaded in while......

What is LD_LIBRARY_PATH?

Answer - LD_LIBRARY_PATH is an environment variable. It is used for debugging a new library or a non standard library.......

What is the file server in Linux server?

Answer - File server is used for file sharing. It enables the processes required fro sharing.......

What is NFS? What is its purpose?

Answer - NFS is Network File system. It is a file system used for sharing of files over a network.......

How do I send email with linux?

Answer - Email can be sent in Linux using the mail command. ......

Explain RPM (Red Hat Package Manager) features.

Answer - RPM is a package managing system (collection of tools to manage software packages).......

What is Kernel? Explain the task it performs.

Answer - Kernel is used in UNIX like systems and is considered to be the heart of the operating system.......

What is Linux Shell? What is Shell Script?

Answer - Linux shell is a user interface used for executing the commands. Shell is a program the user......

What are Pipes? Explain use of pipes.

Answer - A pipe is a chain of processes so that output of one process (stdout) is fed an input (stdin) to another.......

Explain trap command; shift Command, getopts command of linux.

Answer - Trap command: controls the action to be taken by the shell when a signal is received. ......

What Stateless Linux server? What feature it offers?

Answer - A stateless Linux server is a centralized server in which no state exists on the single workstations. ......

What does nslookup do? Explain its two modes.

Answer - Nslookup is used to find details related to a Domain name server. Details like IP addresses of a machine, MX records,......

What is Bash Shell?

Answer - Bash is a free shell for UNIX. It is the default shell for most UNIX systems. It has a combination of the C and Korn shell features. ......

Explain some Network-Monitoring Tools in Linux: ping, traceroute, tcpdump, ntop

Answer - Network monitoring tools are used to monitor the network, systems present on the network, traffic etc.......

How does the linux file system work?

Answer - Linux file structure is a tree like structure. It starts from the root directory, represented by '/', and then expands into sub-directories.......

What are the process states in Linux?

Answer - Process states in Linux.......

What is a zombie?

Answer - Zombie is a process state when the child dies before the parent process. In this case the structural information of the process is still in the process table.......

Explain each system calls used for process management in linux.

Answer - System calls used for Process management......
               

------------------------------

Contributors
General Questions
Simple Linux Questions
Medium Linux Questions
Hard Linux Questions
Expert Linux Questions
Networking Questions
MySQL Questions
DevOps Questions
Fun Questions
Demo Time
Other Great References
[⬆] Contributors:
moregeek
typhonius
schumar
negesti
peter
andreashappe
quatrix
biyanisuraj
pedroguima
Ben
bharatnc
[⬆] General Questions:
What did you learn yesterday/this week?
Talk about your preferred development/administration environment. (OS, Editor, Browsers, Tools etc.)
Tell me about the last major Linux project you finished.
Tell me about the biggest mistake you've made in [some recent time period] and how you would do it differently today. What did you learn from this experience?
Why we must choose you?
What function does DNS play on a network?
What is HTTP?
What is an HTTP proxy and how does it work?
Describe briefly how HTTPS works.
What is SMTP? Give the basic scenario of how a mail message is delivered via SMTP.
What is RAID? What is RAID0, RAID1, RAID5, RAID10?
What is a level 0 backup? What is an incremental backup?
Describe the general file system hierarchy of a Linux system.
Which difference have between public and private SSH key?
[⬆] Simple Linux Questions:
What is the name and the UID of the administrator user?
How to list all files, including hidden ones, in a directory?
What is the Unix/Linux command to remove a directory and its contents?
Which command will show you free/used memory? Does free memory exist on Linux?
How to search for the string "my konfu is the best" in files of a directory recursively?
How to connect to a remote server or what is SSH?
How to get all environment variables and how can you use them?
I get "command not found" when I run ifconfig -a. What can be wrong?
What happens if I type TAB-TAB?
What command will show the available disk space on the Unix/Linux system?
What commands do you know that can be used to check DNS records?
What Unix/Linux commands will alter a files ownership, files permissions?
What does chmod +x FILENAME do?
What does the permission 0750 on a file mean?
What does the permission 0750 on a directory mean?
How to add a new system user without login permissions?
How to add/remove a group from a user?
What is a bash alias?
How do you set the mail address of the root/a user?
What does CTRL-c do?
What does CTRL-d do?
What does CTRL-z do?
What is in /etc/services?
How to redirect STDOUT and STDERR in bash? (> /dev/null 2>&1)
What is the difference between UNIX and Linux.
What is the difference between Telnet and SSH?
Explain the three load averages and what do they indicate. What command can be used to view the load averages?
Can you name a lower-case letter that is not a valid option for GNU ls?
What is a Linux kernel module?
Walk me through the steps in booting into single user mode to troubleshoot a problem.
Walk me through the steps you'd take to troubleshoot a 404 error on a web application you administer.
What is ICMP protocol? Why do you need to use?
[⬆] Medium Linux Questions:
What do the following commands do and how would you use them?
tee
awk
tr
cut
tac
curl
wget
watch
head
tail
less
cat
touch
sar
netstat
tcpdump
lsof
What does an & after a command do?
What does & disown after a command do?
What is a packet filter and how does it work?
What is Virtual Memory?
What is swap and what is it used for?
What is an A record, an NS record, a PTR record, a CNAME record, an MX record?
Are there any other RRs and what are they used for?
What is a Split-Horizon DNS?
What is the sticky bit?
What does the immutable bit do to a file?
What is the difference between hardlinks and symlinks? What happens when you remove the source to a symlink/hardlink?
What is an inode and what fields are stored in an inode?
How to force/trigger a file system check on next reboot?
What is SNMP and what is it used for?
What is a runlevel and how to get the current runlevel?
What is SSH port forwarding?
What is the difference between local and remote port forwarding?
What are the steps to add a user to a system without using useradd/adduser?
What is MAJOR and MINOR numbers of special files?
Describe the mknod command and when you'd use it.
Describe a scenario when you get a "filesystem is full" error, but 'df' shows there is free space.
Describe a scenario when deleting a file, but 'df' not showing the space being freed.
Describe how 'ps' works.
What happens to a child process that dies and has no parent process to wait for it and what’s bad about this?
Explain briefly each one of the process states.
How to know which process listens on a specific port?
What is a zombie process and what could be the cause of it?
You run a bash script and you want to see its output on your terminal and save it to a file at the same time. How could you do it?
Explain what echo "1" > /proc/sys/net/ipv4/ip_forward does.
Describe briefly the steps you need to take in order to create and install a valid certificate for the site https://foo.example.com.
Can you have several HTTPS virtual hosts sharing the same IP?
What is a wildcard certificate?
Which Linux file types do you know?
What is the difference between a process and a thread? And parent and child processes after a fork system call?
What is the difference between exec and fork?
What is "nohup" used for?
What is the difference between these two commands?
myvar=hello
export myvar=hello
How many NTP servers would you configure in your local ntp.conf?
What does the column 'reach' mean in ntpq -p output?
You need to upgrade kernel at 100-1000 servers, how you would do this?
How can you get Host, Channel, ID, LUN of SCSI disk?
How can you limit process memory usage?
What is bash quick substitution/caret replace(^x^y)?
Do you know of any alternative shells? If so, have you used any?
What is a tarpipe (or, how would you go about copying everything, including hardlinks and special files, from one server to another)?
How can you tell if the httpd package was already installed?
How can you list the contents of a package?
How can you determine which package is better: openssh-server-5.3p1-118.1.el6_8.x86_64 or openssh-server-6.6p1-1.el6.x86_64 ?
Can you explain to me the difference between block based, and object based storage?
[⬆] Hard Linux Questions:
What is a tunnel and how you can bypass a http proxy?
What is the difference between IDS and IPS?
What shortcuts do you use on a regular basis?
What is the Linux Standard Base?
What is an atomic operation?
Your freshly configured http server is not running after a restart, what can you do?
What kind of keys are in ~/.ssh/authorized_keys and what it is this file used for?
I've added my public ssh key into authorized_keys but I'm still getting a password prompt, what can be wrong?
Did you ever create RPM's, DEB's or solaris pkg's?
What does :(){ :|:& };: do on your system?
How do you catch a Linux signal on a script?
Can you catch a SIGKILL?
What's happening when the Linux kernel is starting the OOM killer and how does it choose which process to kill first?
Describe the linux boot process with as much detail as possible, starting from when the system is powered on and ending when you get a prompt.
What's a chroot jail?
When trying to umount a directory it says it's busy, how to find out which PID holds the directory?
What's LD_PRELOAD and when it's used?
You ran a binary and nothing happened. How would you debug this?
What are cgroups? Can you specify a scenario where you could use them?
How can you remove/delete a file with file-name consisting of only non-printable/non-type-able characters?
How can you increase or decrease the priority of a process in Linux?
[⬆] Expert Linux Questions:
A running process gets EAGAIN: Resource temporarily unavailable on reading a socket. How can you close this bad socket/file descriptor without killing the process?
What do you control with swapiness?
How do you change TCP stack buffers? How do you calculate it?
What is Huge Tables? Why isn't it enabled by default? Why and when use it?
What is LUKS? How to use it?
[⬆] Networking Questions:
What is localhost and why would ping localhost fail?
What is the similarity between "ping" & "traceroute" ? How is traceroute able to find the hops.
What is the command used to show all open ports and/or socket connections on a machine?
Is 300.168.0.123 a valid IPv4 address?
Which IP ranges/subnets are "private" or "non-routable" (RFC 1918)?
What is a VLAN?
What is ARP and what is it used for?
What is the difference between TCP and UDP?
What is the purpose of a default gateway?
What is command used to show the routing table on a Linux box?
A TCP connection on a network can be uniquely defined by 4 things. What are those things?
When a client running a web browser connects to a web server, what is the source port and what is the destination port of the connection?
How do you add an IPv6 address to a specific interface?
You have added an IPv4 and IPv6 address to interface eth0. A ping to the v4 address is working but a ping to the v6 address gives you the response sendmsg: operation not permitted. What could be wrong?
What is SNAT and when should it be used?
Explain how could you ssh login into a Linux system that DROPs all new incoming packets using a SSH tunnel.
How do you stop a DDoS attack?
How can you see content of an ip packet?
What is IPoAC (RFC 1149)?
What will happen when you bind port 0?
[⬆] MySQL questions:
How do you create a user?
How do you provide privileges to a user?
What is the difference between a "left" and a "right" join?
Explain briefly the differences between InnoDB and MyISAM.
Describe briefly the steps you need to follow in order to create a simple master/slave cluster.
Why should you run "mysql_secure_installation" after installing MySQL?
How do you check which jobs are running?
How would you take a backup of a MySQL database?
[⬆] DevOps Questions:
Can you describe your workflow when you create a script?
What is GIT?
What is a dynamically/statically linked file?
What does "./configure && make && make install" do?
What is puppet/chef/ansible used for?
What is Nagios/Zenoss/NewRelic used for?
What is Jenkins/TeamCity/GoCI used for?
What is the difference between Containers and VMs?
How do you create a new postgres user?
What is a virtual IP address? What is a cluster?
How do you print all strings of printable characters present in a file?
How do you find shared library dependencies?
What is Automake and Autoconf?
./configure shows an error that libfoobar is missing on your system, how could you fix this, what could be wrong?
What are the advantages/disadvantages of script vs compiled program?
What's the relationship between continuous delivery and DevOps?
What are the important aspects of a system of continuous integration and deployment?
How would you enable network file sharing within AWS that would allow EC2 instances in multiple availability zones to share data?
[⬆] Fun Questions:
A careless sysadmin executes the following command: chmod 444 /bin/chmod - what do you do to fix this?
I've lost my root password, what can I do?
I've rebooted a remote server but after 10 minutes I'm still not able to ssh into it, what can be wrong?
If you were stuck on a desert island with only 5 command-line utilities, which would you choose?
You come across a random computer and it appears to be a command console for the universe. What is the first thing you type?
Tell me about a creative way that you've used SSH?
You have deleted by error a running script, what could you do to restore it?
What will happen on 19 January 2038?
How to reboot server when reboot command is not responding?
[⬆] Demo Time:
Unpack test.tar.gz without man pages or google.
Remove all "*.pyc" files from testdir recursively?
Search for "my konfu is the best" in all *.py files.
Replace the occurrence of "my konfu is the best" with "I'm a linux jedi master" in all *.txt files.
Test if port 443 on a machine with IP address X.X.X.X is reachable.
Get http://myinternal.webserver.local/test.html via telnet.
How to send an email without a mail client, just on the command line?
Write a get_prim method in python/perl/bash/pseudo.
Find all files which have been accessed within the last 30 days.
Explain the following command (date ; ps -ef | awk '{print $1}' | sort | uniq | wc -l ) >> Activity.log
Write a script to list all the differences between two directories.
In a log file with contents as <TIME> : [MESSAGE] : [ERROR_NO] - Human readable text display summary/count of specific error numbers that occurred every hour or a specific hour.
[⬆] Other Great References:
Some questions are 'borrowed' from other great references like:

https://github.com/darcyclarke/Front-end-Developer-Interview-Questions
https://github.com/kylejohnson/linux-sysadmin-interview-questions/blob/master/test.md
http://slideshare.net/kavyasri790693/linux-admin-interview-questions
About
Collection of Linux Sysadmin/DevOps interview questions

Resources
 Readme
License
 Unlicense License
Releases
No releases published
Packages
No packages published
Contributors 33
@chassing
@pedroguima
@sevenfourk
@bharatnc
@DmitriyLyalyuev
@wincus
@mulx
@borgified
@rabdill
@vladimirmukhin
@syndbg
+ 22 contributors

---------------------------------------------

Using the OSI model, which layer has the responsibility of making sure that the packet gets where it is supposed to go?

What is the subnet mask, network address and broadcast address for the following address: 123.65.47.62/22?

What command is used to show all open ports and/or socket connections on a machine?

What is NAT? What is it used for?

Which IP ranges/subnets are "private" or "non-routable" (RFC 1918)?

What is a packet filter and how does it work?

What is a proxy and how does it work?

What is ARP and what is it used for?

What is the difference between TCP and UDP?

What command is used to show the route table for a machine?

Explain asynchronous routing?

What is the purpose of a default gateway?

A TCP connection on a network can be uniquely defined by 4 things. What are those things?

When a client running a web browser connects to a web server, what is the source port of the connection?

What is the destination port of the connection?

What is SMTP?

What is an SMTP relay?

Give the basic scenario of how a mail message is delivered via SMTP

What function does DNS play on a network?

What is an A record?

What is an NS record?

What is an MX record?

What is a PTR record?

What is a DNS forwarder?

What command is used to lookup DNS records?

What is meant by "Reverse Lookup"?

What is LDAP and what is it used for?

What is a DN in LDAP?

What is SSH?

What is SSL?

What is IDS?

What is IPS?

What is the difference between IDS and IPS?

What is meant by the term "DOS Attack"?

What is RAID?

What is swap and what is it used for?

What command will show the available disk space on the Unix/Linux system?

How do you determine the public and prive IP addresses, if applicable, of a Unix/Linux system from the command line?

What Unix/Linux command will alter a file's ownership?

What Unix/Linux command will alter a file's permissions?

What Unix/Linux command will show all processes running on a system?

What Unix/Linux command will show the details of a file(permissions, size, timestamp)?

What Unix/Linux command would you use to list all currently loaded kernel modules?

What command would you use to telnet to port 7777 on a machine with IP address 10.10.10.128?

What Unix/Linux command(s) will show a system's current resource allocations?

What is the Unix/Linux command to remove a directory and its contents?

What is the name and location of the system log on a Unix or Linux system?

What would you do to recover a lost the root password to a Unix/Linux system?

What is the difference between hardlink and symlink?

What happens when you remove the source to a symlink?

What are some of the security risks of symlinks?

Explain a hardlink

Where is a filename stored?

What happens when a hardlink is removed

how do you know when a file is removed

Write a locking function in bash

What is a pre-emptive kernel, what does that mean to you?

What is an atomic operation?

How does a switch get a mac address?

What type of packet to discover a router?

How does traceroute work?

A careless sysadmin executes the following command: chmod 444 chmod - what do you do to fix this?
-------------------------------
What is Virtual memory system and how it works ? 
What is the diffrence between fork and thread ?
What is the diffrence between semaphore, mutex & spinlock 
what is a socket and how it works 
what is the difference between Init and systemd


-----------------------------

Simple Linux Questions:
What is the name and the UID of the administrator user?
How to list all files, including hidden one, in a directory?
What is the Unix/Linux command to remove a directory and its contents?
Which command will show you free/used memory? Does free memory exist on Linux?
How to connect to a remote server or what is SSH?
I get "command not found" for ifconfig -a. What can be wrong?
What command will show the available disk space on the Unix/Linux system?
What Unix/Linux commands will alter a files ownership, files permissions?
What does chmod +x FILENAMEdo?
What does the permission 0750 on a file mean?
What does the permission 0750 on a directory mean?
How to redirect STDOUT and STDERR in bash? (> /dev/null 2>&1)
What is the difference between UNIX and Linux
What is the difference between Telnet and SSH?
Explain the three load averages and what do they indicate
Medium Linux Questions:
What is a packet filter and how does it work?
What is swap and what is it used for?
What is an A record, an NS record, a PTR record, a CNAME record, an MX record?
Are there any other RRs and what are they used for?
What is the sticky bit?
What is an inode and what fields are stored in an inode?
What is a runlevel and how to get the current runlevel?
What is SSH port forwarding?
Describe a scenario when you get a "filesystem is full" error, but 'df' shows there is free space.
Describe a scenario when deleting a file, but 'df' not showing the space being freed.
What happens to a child process that dies and has no parent process to wait for it and what’s bad about this?
How to know which process listens on a specific port?
What is Iptables?
Which privilege is required to operate iptables?
How can you find all the regular files in a directory?
What is LVM?
Which command is used to extend a logical volume?
Tell me the steps to remove the swap file?
What is the role of /etc/resolv.conf file?
What daemon is responsible for tracking events on your system?
Hard Linux Questions:
What shortcuts do you use on a regular basis?
What kind of keys are in ~/.ssh/authorized_keys and what it is this file used for?
I've added my public ssh key into authorized_keys but I'm still getting a password prompt, what can be wrong?
Did you ever create RPM's, DEB's or solaris pkg's?
Describe the linux boot process with as much detail as possible, starting from when the system is powered on and ending when you get a prompt.
When trying to umount a directory it says it's busy, how to find out which PID holds the directory?
How do you debug a running process or a library that is being called? A: strace -p PID
What are the steps to create LVM logical volume?
Java Administration
What is the JVM?
Describe garbage collection.
What are the types of garbage collectors?
Walk me through a garbage collection, what happens?
What are the heap generations?
Describe the young heap spaces.
What is stored in the To space of a young generation
How do you set the heap size?
Apache
What is the basic directory structure?
What files are contained in /etc/httpd/conf.d?
What is virtual hosting?
What are the types of virtual hosts?
What is meaning of "Listen" in httpd.conf file?
What is DocumentRoot?
Can I serve content out of a directory other than the DocumentRoot directory?
Which tool you have used for Apache benchmarking?
You are getting following codes (2xx, 3xx, 4xx, 5xx) in Apache, at some point of time. What does this means?
Can we have two Apache Web servers on a single machine?
Which of the following best explains why Apache Web servers are able to handles multiple requests? A. Apache is able to spawn child processes that handle requests before they die.
What does DSO stands for?
Redhat
What is RPM?
What is YUM?
Explain the differences.
What does /boot directory contains?
What does /dev directory contain?
If you are getting error "package is already installed" but you have to install package any how. what option you will use?
How to install Linux software’s by RPM?
How Many Run Levels present in Linux?
0: Halt the system
1: Single-user mode
2: Not used
3: Multi-user mode with text login
4: Not used
5: Multi-user mode with graphical login
6: Reboot
What is the default runlevel for a server?
Explain /proc filesystem?
Puppet
What is Puppet?
What is Manifests?
What is Module and How it is different from Manifest?
What is Facter?
Shell
What does . mean in regular expressions?
What is difference between ” and ‘?
What does $? give you?
You might have heard about inodes. can you describe inode briefly?
A ‘inode’ is a ‘data-structure’, which is used for file identification on Linux. Each file on an Unix System has a separate ‘inode’ and an ‘Unique’ inode Number.
What is the difference between $$ and $!?
DNS
which are the important configuration files for DNS server ?
On which port DNS server works ?
Other Great References:
Some questions are 'borrowed' from other great references like:

https://github.com/chassing/linux-sysadmin-interview-questions
http://www.masteringinlinux.com/linux-questions/apache-interview-questions-answers.html
http://www.nextstep4it.com/qa/system_admininstration/linux/
About
Interview questions

Resources
 Readme
Releases
No releases published
Packages
No packages published
-----------------------------------------
README.md
Unix / Linux Interview Questions
This repo contains questions that have been taken from various sources. Most of these involve the use of two or more commands. I have used GIT Bash to execute the below scripts.

Difficulty Level: Beginner to Intermediate

All the Best !!!

Test Commands
Tip n Hints

Option	Description
data	path to data files to supply the data that will be passed into templates.
engine	engine to be used for processing templates. Handlebars is the default.
ext	extension to be used for dest files.
First Header	Second Header	Second Header	centre
Content cell 1	Content cell 2	RitghtContent cell 2	centreContent cell 2
Content column 1	Content column 2	engine to be used for processing templates. Handlebars is the default.	engine to be used for processing templates. Handlebars is the default.
References
http://www.folkstalk.com/
http://www.thegeekstuff.com/
http://www.theunixschool.com/
Question List
 1. Delete blank lines in file
 2. Print number of times each word appears in a file
3. List all the files in directory except .txt and .pdf
4. Rename all .jpg files to .jpeg
5. Delete files of size more than 100mb in a folder which are older than 90 days
6. Reverse the words in a sentence
7. Given an input file having lines with alphabets and numbers. Print only the distinct alpha-numberic lines.
8. Given a comma separated input file with items, category and cost. Display the category and its sum.
9. Output of following command ps -ef | awk '{ print $1}' | sort | uniq | wc -l
10. Kill process based on user and process.
11. Print contents of a file starting from the nth line.
12. Write a command to calculate the total size of all pdf files in the directory.
13. Write a command to delete the first and last line in every file in the directory and rename it.
14. Given a file with records. Print the sum of m where name=aman
15. Given a file with numbers. Sort each line.
16. Bash shell script to reverse a string / word.
17. Reverse last 4 digits of a string.
1. Delete blank lines in file
$ sed '^\s*$'/d' file.txt
To save changes back to file

$ sed -i '^\s*$'/d' file.txt
Also

$ grep -v '^\s*$' file.txt
2. Print number of times each word appears in a file
$ cat file | tr '[:space:]' '[\n*]' | grep -v '^\s*$' | sort | uniq -c | sort -bnr
tr just replaces spaces woth newlines
grep -v '^\s*$' trims out empty lines
sort to prepare as input for uniq
uniq -c to count occurrences
sort -bnr sorts in numeric reverse order while ignoring whitespace

3. List all the files in directory except .txt and .pdf
$ ls -I "*.txt" -I "*.pdf"
If you want to iterate across all the subdirectories:

$ ls -I "*.txt" -I "*.pdf" -R
Also

$ find -not -iname "*.txt"
$ find . ! '(' -name '*.txt' -o -name '*.pdf' ')'
Reference: https://unix.stackexchange.com/questions/47151/how-do-i-list-every-file-in-a-directory-except-those-with-specified-extensions

Back To Top
4. Rename all .jpg files to .jpeg
$ vi image.sh

for x in `ls ./images/`;
do
    a=`echo $x | cut -d'.' -f1`
    mv ./images/$x ./images/$a".jpeg";
done

$ ./image.sh
5. Delete files of size more than 100mb in a folder which are older than 90 days
$ find /folder -size +204800 -mtime +90 -exec rm {} \;
6. Reverse the words in a sentence
$  echo "Have a good day" | awk '{ for(i=0;i<NF;++i){ x=NF-i; printf "%s ",$x;}  }'    
Output: day good a Have

Back To Top
7. Given an input file having lines with alphabets and numbers. Print only the distinct alpha-numberic lines.
Input

$ cat input.txt

1234567890
0987654321
ABCDEFGH
123456789X
1234567890
123456789X
Output

123456789X
$ vi script.sh

#!/bin/bash
awk '
BEGIN {
i=0; 
}
{ 
    if (($1 ~ /[0-9]/) && ($1 ~ /[A-Z]/)) { 
        flg=0; 
        for (x = 0; $x < $i; x=$x+1) { 
            if($arr[$x] == $1) {
                flg=1;
                break;
            } 
        }
        if(flg==0) {
            arr[$i] = $1; i=$i+1;
        } 
    } 
}
END { 
    for (x = 0; x < $i; x++)
        print $arr[0]
}' input.txt | uniq

$ ./script.sh
Back To Top
8. Given a comma separated input file with items, category and cost. Display the category and its sum.
Input

$ cat input.txt

item1,category1,200
item2,category2,100
item3,category3,300
item4,category1,400
item5,category2,500
item6,category1,600
Output

category1 - 1200
category2 - 600
category3 - 300
$ vi script.sh

awk '
BEGIN{
x=0;
flag=0
}
{ 
    split($0,arr,",")           # split - arr[1] has item, arr[2] has category, arr[3] has cost
    flag=0;
    for(i=0;i<=x;i++){
        if(arr[2]==cat_arr[i]){
            flag=1;
            sum_arr[i]=sum_arr[i]+arr[3]
        }
    }
    if(flag==0){
        cat_arr[x]=arr[2]
        sum_arr[x]=arr[3]
        x++;
    }
}
END {
    for(i=0;i<x;i++){
        print(cat_arr[i],"-",sum_arr[i])
    }
}' input.txt

$ ./script.sh
Back To Top
9. Output of following command ps -ef | awk '{ print $1}' | sort | uniq | wc -l
Answer 2

$ ps -ef
     UID     PID    PPID  TTY        STIME COMMAND
prabakad   20464       1 ?          Jul 13 /usr/bin/mintty
prabakad    4940   18944 pty2       Jul 14 /usr/bin/bash
prabakad   18944       1 ?          Jul 14 /usr/bin/mintty
prabakad   19944   20464 pty1       Jul 13 /usr/bin/bash
prabakad   11492    4940 pty2       Jul 14 /usr/bin/winpty
prabakad   20708   16868 pty0     20:38:09 /usr/bin/ps
prabakad   16868   13672 pty0       Jul 12 /usr/bin/bash
prabakad   13672       1 ?          Jul 12 /usr/bin/mintty

$ ps -ef | awk '{ print $1}'
UID
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad
prabakad

$ ps -ef | awk '{ print $1}' | sort | uniq
prabakad
UID

$ ps -ef | awk '{ print $1}' | sort | uniq | wc -l
2
Back To Top
10. Kill process based on user and process.
Using grep to search
$ ps -ef | grep "bash" | grep "prabakad"| awk 'BEGIN{print $2}{kill -9 $2}

$ ps -ef | grep "bash" | grep "prabakad"| awk '{print $2}' | xargs kill -9
Using ps command with -u and -p
$ ps -ef -u prabakad -p 8552 | tail -n +2 | awk '{print $2}' | xargs kill -9
Explanation

$ ps -ef
     UID     PID    PPID  TTY        STIME COMMAND
prabakad   19208   18800 pty0     21:46:39 /usr/bin/bash
prabakad   11440   19208 pty0     21:46:43 /usr/bin/ps
prabakad   18800       1 ?        21:46:38 /usr/bin/mintty

$ ps -ef -u prabakad -p 19208
     UID     PID    PPID  TTY        STIME COMMAND
prabakad   19208   18800 pty0     21:46:39 /usr/bin/bash

$ ps -ef | grep "bash" | grep "prabakad"
prabakad   19208   18800 pty0     21:46:39 /usr/bin/bash
prabakad   19484   19208 pty0     21:47:52 /usr/bin/bash
grep command does not give header.
ps command gives header, so use tail command to remove it.
The PIDs are sent as arguments using xargs and killed using kill -9

Back To Top
11. Print contents of a file starting from the nth line.
For example, print the give file starting from the 4th line

Input

$ cat lines.txt
line1
line2
line3
line4
line5
line6
line7
line8
line9
line10
line11
Using tail command
$ cat lines.txt | tail -n +4
line4
line5
line6
line7
line8
line9
line10
line11
Using sed command
$ sed '1,3d' lines.txt
line4
line5
line6
line7
line8
line9
line10
line11
Additional Information

head command displays first n lines.
tail command displays last n lines. If tail is used with +, displays lines starting from nth line as shown above.
The sed command above deletes the first 3 lines and prints output starting from 4th line.

Back To Top
12. Write a command to calculate the total size of all pdf files in the directory.
$ du -hc *.pdf | tail -1
25K     total
13. Write a command to delete the first and last line in every file in the directory and rename it.
Input

$ ls ./sample
abc_20171607.txt      rocket_20171503.txt   xyz_20171507.txt
mno xyz_20171507.txt  sample1_20171607.txt

$ cat ./sample/abc_20171607.txt
header
line1
line2
line3
footer
Output

$ ls sample
renamed_abc_20171607.log      renamed_sample1_20171607.log
renamed_mno xyz_20171507.log  renamed_xyz_20171507.log
renamed_rocket_20171503.log

$ cat ./sample/renamed_abc_20171607.log
line1
line2
line3
$ vi sample.sh

IFS=$'\n'
for filename in `ls ./sample -I '*.sh'`;                        # ls in sample folder searching file other than .sh
do
    newfilename=`echo $filename | cut -d '.' -f1`
    sed -i -e '1d' -e '$d' ./sample/$filename                   # -i to save to file. '1d' and '$d' delete first and last line
    mv ./sample/$filename ./sample/"renamed"_$newfilename".log"
done

$ ./sample.sh
Additional

If IFS=$'\n' (Internal Field Separator) is missing, file names having space in them are not recognised.

$ ./sample.sh
abc_20171607.txt
mno
xyz_20171507.txt
rocket_20171503.txt
sample1_20171607.txt
xyz_20171507.txt
Back To Top
14. Given a file with records. Print the sum of m where name=aman
Input

$ cat input.txt
t=20
m=10
name=aman
--xx--
t=30
m=20
name=deep
--xx--
t=40
m=30
name=aman
--xx--
t=40
m=300
name=aman
--xx--
t=40
m=10
name=rahul
Output

sum of aman is 340
$ vi script.awk

BEGIN {
	RS="--xx--\n";
	FS="\n";
}
{
	split($3,data,"=")
	if(data[2]=="aman"){
        split($2,mdata,"=")
        sum=sum+mdata[2]
	}
}
END{
	print ("sum of aman is",sum)
}

$ awk -f script.awk input.txt
Reference: http://www.thegeekstuff.com/2010/01/8-powerful-awk-built-in-variables-fs-ofs-rs-ors-nr-nf-filename-fnr/

Back To Top
15. Given a file with numbers. Sort each line.
Input

$ cat input.txt
4 6 8 1 7
2 12 9 6 10
6 1 14 5 7
Output

1 4 6 7 8
2 6 9 10 12
1 5 6 7 14
$ awk ' {split( $0, a, " " ); asort( a ); for( i = 1; i <= length(a); i++ ) printf( "%s ", a[i] ); printf( "\n" ); }' input.txt
Reference: http://www.unix.com/shell-programming-and-scripting/180835-sort-each-row-horizontally-awk-any.html

16. Bash shell script to reverse a string / word.
$ vi reverse.sh

#!/bin/bash
input="$1"
reverse="" 
len=${#input}
for (( i=$len-1; i>=0; i-- ))
do 
	reverse="$reverse${input:$i:1}"
done 
echo "$reverse"

$ ./reverse.sh Hello
olleH
Also

$ echo "Hello" | rev
olleH

$ rev<<<"This is a test"
tset a si sihT
Reference: https://www.cyberciti.biz/faq/how-to-reverse-string-in-unix-shell-script/

Back To Top
17. Reverse last 4 digits of a string.
Input

123456****7890
Output

123456****0987
$ vi rev.sh

input="$1"
reverse=""

len=${#input}

for((i=0;i<$len-4;i++))
do
{
reverse="$reverse${input:$i:1}"
}
done
for((i=len-1;i>=len-4;i--))
do
{
reverse="$reverse${input:$i:1}"
}
done

echo $reverse

$ ./rev.sh 123456****7890

---------------------------------------------
What does nslookup do?

How do you display the top most process utilizing CPU process?

How to check all open ports on a Linux machine and block the unused ports?

What is Linux? How is it different from UNIX?

Explain the boot process of Unix System in details.

How do you change the permissions? How to create a file that’s read-only property?

Explain SUDO in detail. What are its disadvantages?

What is the difference between UDP and TCP?

Describe the boot order of a Linux machine.

Design a 3-tier web application.

Sketch how you would route network traffic from the internet into a few subnets.

How do you know about virtualization? Is it good to use?

What are different levels of RAID and what level will you use for a web server and database server?

List some latest developments in open source technologies.

Have you ever contributed to an open source project?

Systems engineer or a systems administrator? Explain?

List some of the common unethical practices followed by a system professional.

What is the common size for a swap partition under a Linux system?

What does a nameless directory represent in a Linux system?

How to list all files, including hidden ones, in a directory?

How to add a new system user without login permissions?

Explain a hardlink. What happens when a hardlink is removed?

What happens when a sysadmin executes this command: chmod 444 chmod

How do you determine the private and public IP addresses of a Linux system?

How do you send a mail attachment using bash?

Tell me something about the Linux distros used on servers.

Explain the process to re-install Grub in Linux in the shortest manner.

What is an A record, an NS record, a PTR record, a CNAME record, an MX record?

What is a zombie process? State its causes?

When do we prefer a script over a compiled program?

How to create a simple master/slave cluster?

What happens when you delete the source to a symlink?

How to restrict an IP so that it may not use the FTP Server?

Explain the directory structure of Linux. What contents go in /usr/local?

What is git? Explain its structure and working.

How would you send an automated email to 100 people at 12:00 AM?

Tell me about ZFS file system.

How to change the default run level in a Linux system?

How would you change the kernel parameters in Linux?

State the differences between SSH and Telnet.

How would you virtualize a physical Linux machine?

Tell me about some quirky Linux commands.

Explain how HTTPS works.

Do you know about TOR browser? Explain its working.

How to trigger a forced system check the next time you boot your machine?

What backup techniques do you prefer?

Tell me something about SWAP partition.

Explain Ping of Death attack.

How do you sniff the contents of an IP packet?

Which OSI layer is responsible for making sure that the packet reaches its correct destination?

---------------------------------
BASH INTERVIEW QUESTIONS
Candidate should be able to answer at least half of these. They get progressively harder, so if they are not able to answer any of the first four or five, there’s little point continuing.

Some questions contain child questions that are harder extensions of the parent. Again, no point asking the child question if they can’t answer the parent.

Being able to answer half only applies to parent questions. ie) Candidate needs to able answer half of all parent questions, not parent and child questions.

Question
*Can you paraphrase the Unix philosophy?*

Write programs that do one thing and do it well. Favor modular over monolithic design.
Write programs to work together. Expect the output of every program to become the input to another.
Write programs to handle text streams, because that is a universal interface.
Question
*How should you signal to the user of your function or script that it executed successfully or failed?*

Success = exit or return 0
Failure = exit or return 1

Question
*Why is it good practice to always quote variables in bash?*

Prevent reinterpretation of special characters and word splitting

Question
*What is the difference between single and double quotes in bash*

Variables are expanded in double quotes. Variables are string literals in single quotes.

Question
*What is the default scope of variables in bash?*

Global

Question
*What keyword is used to create a variable whose scope is limited to the function it’s defined in?*

local

Question
*What is the ternary operator & what symbols are used to?*

A terse way of writing an if else conditional.

[ "$var1" -eq "$var2" ] && echo "equal" || echo "not equal"
Question
*Is it good practice to use ternary operator’s in scripts?*

No, because they are less readable.

Question
*What test arguments can be used to test if a variable is empty or not?*

-z checks if variable is empty
-n checks if variable is not empty

Question
*Explain the difference between ~$*~ ~$@~ and ~$#~*

$* = All args as single string
$@ = All args as array\ $# = Number of args\

Question
*What is IFS? What is the default?*

Internal Field Seperator. Default is spaces, tabs and newlines.

Question
*How would you debug a script?*

set -x
Question
*How would you search for and replace all occurrences of a string in a file?*

sed -i 's/foo/bar/g' file.txt
or

awk '{gsub(/foo/,"bar")}1' file.txt > tmpfile.txt
mv tmpfile.txt file.txt
Question
*How would you return a string from a function in bash?*

setter() {
    echo "$myvar"
}

getter() {
    myvar="$(myfunction)"
}
Question
*How would you use find to delete all zip files in directory hierarchy?*

find /path/to/dir -type f -name *.zip -delete
or

find /path/to/dir -type f -name *.zip -exec rm {} +
Question
*Why is using the output from ls or find as the input to a forloop a bad idea?*

Word splitting
Globbing characters
Question
*How would you write a avoid these issues?*

Use globbing

for f in ./*.mp3; do
    some command "$f"
done
for find example, change IFS and pipe find output into a while loop using read.

while IFS= read -r -d '' file; do
  some command "$file"
done < <(find . -type f -name '*.mp3' -print0)
Question
/*In a script how would you get the name of the script without its extension, preferably using bash’s built-in parameter substitution rather than sed or awk?*/

echo "$(basename "${0%.*}")"
Question
*How would you get the basename and dirname of the running script on a system where basename and dirname weren’t available?*

BASENAME=${0##*/}
DIRNAME=${0%$BASENAME}
echo "$BASENAME"
echo "$DIRNAME"
Question
*Vi or Emacs?*

Emacs. Obviously. Will accept Spacemacs…

As long as the answer isn’t nano or notepad* then we’re good… 

------------------------------------
LINUX INTERVIEW QUESTIONS
Candidate should be able to answer at least half of these. Some questions contain child questions that are harder extensions of the parent.

Being able to answer half only applies to parent questions. ie) Candidate needs to able answer half of all parent questions, not parent and child questions.

Question
*What command would you use to find information on another command?*

man

Question
*What command would you use to find information on a topic without being specific?*

apropos

Question
*How would you use ssh to copy a directory to a remote machine?*

scp -R /path/to/directory user@host:/remote/path

Question
*How would you use ssh to execute a command on a remote machine*

ssh user@host command

Question
*How would you enable ssh public key authentication*

Generate ssh keys on local machine using ssh-keygen
Copy public key to remote machine using ssh-copy-id
Question
*How would you get the cumulative size of a directory in a human readable format on a *nix system?*

du -sh /path/to/directory

Question
*How would you check the systems total disk usage in a human readable format on a *nix system?*

df -h

Question
*On a Unix based system what is the difference between a hard and a soft link?*

A soft link is just a pointer to another files inode, it doesn’t contain the contents of the file. If the original file is deleted the soft link is broken. Can span filesystems.

A hard link is a pointer to an inode shared by multiple files. Deleting any one pointer doesn’t delete the inode. The inode only goes away when all hard links are deleted.

Question
*How would use chmod to change the permissions of a given file to only readable and writeable by it’s owner, using both octal and symbolic notation*

chmod 600 file.txt

chmod u=rw,g=,o= file.txt

Question
*What umask should a user have so that they create files with 644 permissions and directories with 755 permissions?*

022 or 0022

Question
*What commands would you use to troubleshoot networking on a linux box (explain roughly what they do)?*

ping - check connectivity.
traceroute - pinpoints which hop is the source of the problem.\ route - check kernel routing table.\ netstat - check kernel routing table.\ host - query dns records.\ nslookup - check dns records and dns server.\ ifconfig - interface assignment.\ ip - interface assignment.\ ufw - check firewall status.\ iptables - check kernel firewall status.

Question
*On a typical Linux box which files would you look at to check interface assignment and dns records?*

/etc/network/interfaces - interface assignment
/etc/resolv.conf - dns records

Question
*How would you check the logs on a Linux system that uses systemd*

journalctl

Question
*How would you check the logs on a *nix system that didn’t use systemd*

/var/log/messages (or whatever file is relevant)

Question
*How would you view the kernel log messages on a *nix system*

dmesg

Question
*What is crontab*

Cron is a task scheduler. The crontab is the file that specifies what command will be executed at what time.

Question
Explain the format of crontab?

<Min><Hour><MonthDay><Month><WeekDay><command/program to execute>

------------------------------

've been in tech for a long time and have interviewed quite a bit from small to very large companies. All of the questions mentioned on this page are ones I have been asked for IT-related positions. Each time a question was asked, I'd write it down. I thought I would share these with all of you for those who are wanting to study for their next interview. Enjoy!

I would like to also collaborate with the public to get other interview questions that may be asked during a technical interview. Would you like to contribute? Please send me a pull request and I'd be happy to add it! I will also be providing the answers as well, so please feel free to add your answer to the answer directory.

User says their internet is slow and that it takes ages to get to websites. What steps would you do to troubleshoot?
Tell me five ways to find the current date and time on a Linux system.
How would you delete a file called -f on a Linux system?
Can you explain the difference between a hub, a router, and a switch.
What are the layers of the OSI model and describe each one?
How would you find a device on a network?
How does traceroute work? How is it different from ping?
What is ping?
Draw an entire network (very broad, but will allow you to show everything you know about one)
What is DHCP? How does it work? What is assigned to the computer that requested an address?
What is ARP?
How does a switch work?
What are some ways you can kill a program that is not responding? (think of the command line as well)
On a Linux machine, how would you find the drive you just plugged in? How would you mount it?
With the kill command what does -9 do (kill -9)? How is it different than kill -11?
What is DNS?
On a mac, what are some ways you can transfer data from one computer to another?
What is the PRAM and SMC reset do? What do each reset?
Say that I opened my browser and went to www.google.com. Describe what exactly happens in order for the page to display in my browser? In detail: https://github.com/alex/what-happens-when
What is an inode? What metadata does it contain?
What is the difference between a hard link and a soft link (symlink)?
What is the Windows registry? How does linux do the same thing? Mac?
What is the bootup process of a machine of your choice?
What are the differences between 802.11 a,b,g, and n?
What is in an IP header? TCP Header?
What is the difference between a public IP and a private IP?
What port is SMTP? Is there more than one port used for SMTP?
What is an MX record?
Describe the TCP Handshake
What is the difference between TCP and UDP?
A user has a machine that shows no output on the monitor. How to you troubleshoot? How can you see the state of the boot sequence without replacing the graphics card?
How do you define the following types of malware: a worm, a trojan, a rootkit?
How are ICMP packets denoted in the IP header? How are ICMP echo and reply denoted?
What routing protocol do you think Google uses and why?
You have 2 linux machines. How would you copy host A's disk0 to host B's disk1 and verify it copied correctly?
A user with a Windows laptop says that whenever they try to visit a particular website they instead see some strange Russian website they're not expecting. How would you troubleshoot this?
In linux, you want to unmount a filesystem but it is in use. Can you fix this without rebooting the machine?
What is RAID? Describe RAID 0, 1, 5, 6, and 10
Your machine needs to send data to a host with an IP address on the same LAN. How does it specify the address the data should go to?
Be prepared to talk about any acronyms you mention
How do you start a website using Apache?
You are a new consultant at a company and you are to give the company new internet. What up and down speeds would you provide and why?
What is OWFS?
What is Journaling? Why is it useful?
What is HTTPS? How does it work?
How do private and public keys work?
Does DNS use TCP or UDP? Why?
What is QoS?
What is a VLAN?
What is TLS?
What is ICMP?
What is a fork bomb?
How would you test if a port is open on a remote server?
You opened a port on a server, but from the outside, you cannot connect to that port. What might the problem be?
A fellow technician says that a Windows machine they're working on has an IP address of 169.254.101.6, and asks you to help him troubleshoot. What do you do?
What are IPTables? What are the different things you can do with them?
On a Linux machine, how can you spin up a webserver? What is a vhost? Where do the configuration files live?
Name a few HTTP requests.
List some ports and define what they are used for.
What command would you use to list the number of threads for a running process?
How would you find the system load average WITHOUT causing more load?
What are some of the default Linux system variables?
What is garbage collection?
Using bash, how would you output a specific column in a file?
What's the difference between bootp and DHCP?
What is Immutable Infrastructure? How does it differ from Mutable Infrastructure and what are some advantages of having an Immutable Infrastructure?
Name a few data structures.
What tool would you use to sniff DNS traffic?
What tool would you use to view disk IO?
What is a CDN?
What is Puppet, Ansible, Chef, Saltstack and what are they used for?
What is the difference between git pull and git fetch?
What does git rebase do?
Write a Puppet class to include the apache module and add the attrubutes for hostname and www_root. Set www_root to /mnt/mount.
The node that has /mnt/root begins having issues. The /mnt/root is an NFS mount and a process is using the mount. What cammns can you use to determine what is using the mount?
Let's say you have 5 web hosts behind HAproxy. One of the servers started experiencing issues. What would you do?
From the last question, how would you troubleshoot the node having issues?
You have a border router and behind the router is an HAproxy enpoint serving 5 web nodes behind it. All of a sudden, you begin getting 10Gbps traffic to the HAproxy node and becomes unresponsive. What do you do?
What is a Puppet module? If you needed to make changes to a module, what can you do?
What are ports and port numbers to DNS, FTP, and DHCP?
What Linux command you would use to limit administration access?
What is ransomeware?
Explain WannaCry
How do you find out latest exploits and news in the industry?
Which 3 part handshake protocol is used to establish a connection?
Name the IP address ranges for the different classes and what their subnets masks were
Name the private IP addresses, their subnet masks, and their CIDR
What is CIDR?
Which security method helps block and prevent ports from being accessed?
What prevents a network from intrusion?
What is an injection attack?
How do you read Wireshark and a IDS/IPS scan paper for intrusion scans and how/why the intrusion occured
------------------------------------------

********************************************************************************************
--------------------------LINUX INTERVIEW QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS-----------------------------
____________________________________________________________________________________________
1. What do the following commands do and how would you use them?
A:
#tee
- Read from the standard input and write to the standard output and files.

#awk
- pattern scanning and processing language.

#tr
- Translate or delete characters.

#cut
- Remove sections from each line of the files

#tac
- Concatenate and print files in reverse.

#curl
- Curl is used to transfer a data from and to a server.

#wget
- Command to download file form the web.

#watch
- Execute a program periodically.

#head
- Output the first part of the lines.

#tail
- Output the last part of the lines.

#less
- Used when we have large files output, allows to read as pages. Opposite of more.

#cat
- Concatenate files and print standard output.

#touch
- Used to create a file and change timestamps.

#sar
- Display system activity report.

#netstat
- Priet network statistics information,routing, interfaces etc.

#tcpdump
- Used to analyse the packets.

#lsof
- List open files.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
2. What does an & after a command do?
A: & ommand is used to run command or script in background.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
3. What does & disown after a command do?
A: To delete/remove jobs or to tell the shell not to send a HUP signal.
   #disown -a ---> To remove all jobs
   #disowm -r ---> To remove running jobs.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
4. What is a packet filter and how does it work?
A: Packet filters act by inspecting the PACKETS which are transferred between computers
   on the Internet. 
____________________________________________________________________________________________
5. What is Virtual Memory?
A: RAM + SWAP = Virtual Memory
   When a RAM utilization exceeds defined limit and still the memory is needed for resources,
   then inacive pages from are moved to the hard disk space which is known as SWAP space to
   free up some space on main memory.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
6. What is swap and what is it used for?
A: A swap is space on the storage disk used by kernel memory management.
   It is use to store inactive pages from main memory when main memory exceeds the defined
   limit and no memory is left for new resources.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
7. What is an A record, an NS record, a PTR record, a CNAME record, an MX record?
A: A record maps hostname to IP address.
   NS record: Name Server Record.
   PTR Record: Pointer Record. For implementing reverse DNS lookups.
   CNAME: Canonical Name. It is the alias name and all the traffic hitting CNAME will
          redirect to target IP/Host.
   MX Record: Mail Exchange Record. Maps domain name to a list of message transfer agents
              for that domain.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
8. Are there any other RRs and what are they used for?
A: SOA: Start of Authority Record. First record of DNS server.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
9. What is a Split-Horizon DNS?
A: Split-Horizon DNS/Split-View DNS/Split-brain DNS or Split DNS is the facility of a DNS
   implementation to provode different sets of DNS information.(Usually source address of
   DNS request)
____________________________________________________________________________________________
10. What is the sticky bit?
A:  Sticky Bit is mainly used on folders in order to avoid deletion of folder and its content
    by other users even though they have write permission.
    If a sticky bit is set on the folder then only the owner and root can delete the folder.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
11. What does the immutable bit do to a file?
A:  Setting the immutable bit to file will not allow:
    Modifying
    Deleting
    Renaming
    No soft or hard links creation
    (Even by root user)

    NOTE:
    How to set immutable bit or change attribute of the file.
    #chattr +i <filename> ---> File is immutable
    #chattr -R +i <Directoryname>
    #chattr -i <filename> ---> Remove
    #chattr +a <filename> ---> It will always append data to the file
    #chattr -a <filename> ---> Remove
    Works with ext2/3/4 FS.
    To check if immutable bit is set on a file.
    #lsattr
____________________________________________________________________________________________
12. What is the difference between hardlinks and symlinks?
    What happens when you remove the source to a symlink/hardlink?
A:  Hardlinks are like a backup copy of original file. Even if we delete original file we
    can still use hard link file. Both file will have same inode number.
    Hard link points to the inode and not to the file.
    We cannot create hard link for directory.
    Hard Link are File System dependent.

    Soft links are like a shortcut of original file. If we delete original file then link
    between them is broken. Shortcut file is of no use and known as dangling file.
    Both file will have different inode number.
    We can create softlink for directory.
    Soft Link are independent of File System.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
13. What is an inode and what fields are stored in an inode?
A: Inode stores data about the data known as Metadata.
   Inode is the data structure that describes file or directory.
   Inode describes metadata i.e. permission, acces time owner, name etc.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
14. How to force/trigger a file system check on next reboot?
A: 2 Ways:
   a) Create a file forcefsck inside Root FS(/)
      #touch /forcefsck
   b) Set drive to check on every reboot and return to default value after reboot.
      #tune2fs -c 1 /dev/sda1
____________________________________________________________________________________________
15. What is SNMP and what is it used for?
A:  Simple Network Management Protocol is a protocol for Network Management.
    It is used for collecting information from networking devices such as servers, hubs etc.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
16. What is a runlevel and how to get the current runlevel?
A: Runlevel is the mode of operation in Unix like OS.
   Commands to check runlevel:
   #who -r
   #runlevel

  RUNLEVELS:
  0 - Halt
  1 - Single User Mode
  2 - Multi user mode (Without Networking)
  3 - Full Multi user mode
  4 - Unused
  5 - GUI
  6 - Reboot
____________________________________________________________________________________________
17. What is SSH port forwarding?
A:  Also known as TCP/IP connection tunneling. It is a process whereby a TCP/IP conection
    that would be insecure is tunneled through a secure SSH link, protecting from network 
    attacks. 
    Used to form Virtual Private Network.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
18. What is the difference between local and remote port forwarding?
A:  Local Port Forwarding(Outgoing Tunnel)
    Local host forwards /displays content of remote host.
    Local host acts as a proxy.

    Remote Port Forwarding(Incomming Tunnel) 
    Remote host forwards /displays content of local host
    Remote host acts as a proxy.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
19. What are the steps to add a user to a system without using useradd/adduser?
A:  Edit /etc/passwd file.
    Edit with vipw because vipw locks the file and other commands won't try to update it.
    Edit vipw -s ---> To edit shadow file.
    Edit vigr ---> To add user group
    Create home directory.
    Copy the content of /etc/skel directory to new user home directory.
    Change the group and directory ownership(Using chmod and chown)
____________________________________________________________________________________________
20. What is MAJOR and MINOR numbers of special files?
A:  Kernel will read the devices using MAJOR and MINOR number.
    MAJOR number will idebtify the driver associated with device.
    MINOR number is used by KERNEL to determine exactly which device is being reffered to.
    
    #ls -l /dev/*
    #cat /etc/devices ---> To get MAJOR number of devices
____________________________________________________________________________________________
21. Describe the mknod command and when you'd use it.
A:  #mknode ---> Was originally used to create the character and block devices that
    populate /dev/.
    Nowadays udev will automatically creates and removes the virtual FS when new hardware
    is detected.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
22. Describe a scenario when you get a "filesystem is full" error,
    but 'df' shows there is free space.
A:  If space available then, we ned to check inode consumption of filesystem.
    Here it means Filesystem inode is full.
    #df -iTh ---> To check inode usage.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
23. Describe a scenario when deleting a file, but 'df' not showing the space being freed.
A:  Even after deleting space is not being freed means files are held open and take space
    after they are deleted.
    #lsof ---> To find the list of open files
    #lsof | grep "deleted" ---> To get the files which are deleted but still consuming 
                                space.
    Get the PID of the files and kill it to free up space.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
24. Describe how 'ps' works.
A:  ps works by reading files in the proc FS.
    The directory contains various files that provide information about PIDs.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
25. What happens to a child process that dies and has no parent process to wait for it 
    and what’s bad about this?
A:  Child process then becomes defunct or zombie process. They only occupies space in the 
    process table, but excessive zombies can fill it, meaning no other processes can be
    launch.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
26. Explain briefly each one of the process states.
A:  START
    A process is started.
    READY
    Waiting for the allocation so that they can run.
    RUNNING
    Once process is assigned to processor by OS scheduler, it starts executing its
    instruction.
    WAITING
    Process is waiting for user input or for a file to become available.
    TERMINATED or EXIT
    When a process finishes its execution or terminated by OS then it moves to the
    terminated state where it waits to be removed from main memory.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
27. How to know which process listens on a specific port?
A:  #sudo netstat -tunlp | grep <port number>
    #sudo netstat -tunlp | grep LISTEN | grep ssh
    #lsof -i :port#
____________________________________________________________________________________________
28. What is a zombie process and what could be the cause of it?
A:  Zombie process is the process that have finished its execution but it still holds entry
    in process table.
    Zombie processes are also known as defunct process.
    #ps -ef | grep defunct
____________________________________________________________________________________________
29. You run a bash script and you want to see its output on your terminal and save it to a
    file at the same time. How could you do it?
A:  Using tee command.
    #bash script.sh | tee -a output.txt
____________________________________________________________________________________________
30. Explain what echo "1" > /proc/sys/net/ipv4/ip_forward does.
A:  Enables IP forwarding but will not reserve the states after reboot.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
31. Describe briefly the steps you need to take in order to create and install a valid
    certificate for the site https://foo.example.com.
A:  Make a CSR(Certificate Signing Request) on your web server.
    Purchase a certificate.
    Install your SSL certificates and intermidiate certificates on your server.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
32. Can you have several HTTPS virtual hosts sharing the same IP?
A:  Yes. If server supports SNI(Server Name Indication)
    SNI allows the server to safely host multiple TLS certificates for multiple sites, all
    under a single IP address.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
33. What is a wildcard certificate?
A:  Certificate which can be used with multiple subdomains of a domain.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
34. Which Linux file types do you know?
A:  Regular File
    Directory
    Special Files
      - Block file(b)
      - Character file(c)
      - Pipe file(p)
      - Symbolic link file(l)
      - Socket file(s)
____________________________________________________________________________________________
35. What is the difference between a process and a thread?
    And parent and child processes after a fork system call?
A:  PROCESS
    Process is the instance of the running program.
    Process can create another process and are ran in mmemory.
    Process is heavy weight.

    THREAD
    Thread is the segment of process.
    Process can have multiple threads.
    They run in shared memory.
    Thread is light weight.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
36. What is the difference between exec and fork?
A:  exec
    It will replace the entire current process with a new program.
    fork
    It creates duplicate of the current process.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
37. What is "nohup" used for?
A:  It will make your process running even after exiting from a shell.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
38. What is the difference between these two commands?
	myvar=hello
	export myvar=hello
A:  myvar=hello ---> Will assign value(hello) to myvar
    export myvar=hello ---> Will make myvar as envirnoment variable and it will be active
			    untill you logout from current session.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
39. How many NTP servers would you configure in your local ntp.conf?
A:  2 Servers. 
____________________________________________________________________________________________
40. What does the column 'reach' mean in ntpq -p output?
A:  If the reach value is non zero, the server is reacheable; otherwise, unreacheable.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
41. You need to upgrade kernel at 100-1000 servers, how you would do this?
A:  I will use ansible.
    Prior doing we need to test.
    Using serial argument in ansible we can upgrage servers in slots.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
42. How can you get Host, Channel, ID, LUN of SCSI disk?
A:  #cat /proc/scsi/scsi
____________________________________________________________________________________________
43. How can you limit process memory usage?
A:  We can edit the below file:
    #/etc/security/limits.conf
    OR
    #ulimt -a ----> To list all
____________________________________________________________________________________________
44. What is bash quick substitution/caret replace(^x^y)?
A:  #sed -e 's/^x/^y/g'
____________________________________________________________________________________________
45. Do you know of any alternative shells? If so, have you used any?
A:  zsh. It is bash compatible.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
46. What is a tarpipe (or, how would you go about copying everything, including hardlinks
    and special files, from one server to another)?
A:  tarpipe - copy a directory to a server from another preserving permissions and files.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
47. How can you tell if the httpd package was already installed?
A:  # rpm -qa | grep http
    httpd-2.4.6-93.el7.x86_64
    httpd-tools-2.4.6-93.el7.x86_64
    # httpd -v
    Server version: Apache/2.4.6 (Red Hat Enterprise Linux)
    Server built:   Oct  8 2019 05:47:38
____________________________________________________________________________________________
48. How can you list the contents of a package?
A:  #rpm -qc httpd-2.4.6-93.el7.x86_64
    #rpm -qf httpd-2.4.6-93.el7.x86_64
____________________________________________________________________________________________
49. How can you determine which package is better: openssh-server-5.3p1-118.1.el6_8.x86_64
    or openssh-server-6.6p1-1.el6.x86_64 ?
A:  The package with the higher version indeed will be a better as it will have bug fix and 
    other enhancements.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
50. Can you explain to me the difference between block based, and object based storage?
A:  object storage
    Best for big content and high stream throughput.
    Data is stored as discrete units called objects.
    block storage
    High performance with database and tracsactional data.
    Data is stored in blocks.
-----------------------------------------------------
********************************************************************************************
--------------------------LINUX INTERVIEW QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS-----------------------------
____________________________________________________________________________________________
1. Name and UID of Admin user?
A: Name: root
   UID: 0
____________________________________________________________________________________________
2. List all files including hidden files?
A: ls -la
____________________________________________________________________________________________
3. Command to remove directory and its content?
A: rm -rf <directory name> ---> -r=recursive -f=forcefully
   rmdir <directory name> ---> To remove empty directory
____________________________________________________________________________________________
4. Which command will show you free/used memory?
A: free
   -m=megabytes
   -h=human-readable(mb)
   -g=gigabyte
i) Does free memory exist on Linux?
A: Yes
Kernel can free more memory by deleting pages from the buffer,
incase RAM utilization is above 90%.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
5. How to search for the string "my konfu is the best" in files of a directory recursively?
A: grep -rn "my konfu is the best" <directory>
   -n=line number
   -r=recursive
____________________________________________________________________________________________
6. How to connect to a remote server or what is SSH?
A: Secure way of connecting to remote server is using SSH method(SecureSHell).
   SSH protocol is a method for secure remote login from one machine to another.
   SSH encrypts the network communication between client and server.
   SSH Public and Private Keys
   Public Key: Can distibute to anyone.
   Private Key: Should be kept secret.

i) How can I connect to a remote machine without having to type a password or passphrase?
A: a. ssh-agent
      #ssh-add
      #ssh-add -l
   b. Public Key Authentication
   c. Hostbased Authentication
   d. Kerberos Authentication

   Alternative - Non secure
   telnet and rlogin
____________________________________________________________________________________________
7. How to get all environment variables and how can you use them?
A: We can use below commands to see all the environment variables:
   #env
   #printenv
   #print HOME  ---> Prints user Home Directory
   #print USER  ---> Prints currently loggeg in user.
   Detail:
   #set | less
   
   To set Environment Variable(Temporary Method):
   #export VAR="VALUE" ---> This will be available only in current session.
			    If you logout and login it wont exits.
   
   To set Environment Variable(Persistent Method):
   Store the environment variables any of the below files:
   System wide Variables
   #cat /etc/environment
   #cat /etc/profile
   User Specific Environment variables
   #cat ~/.profile
   #cat ~/.bashrc
____________________________________________________________________________________________
8. I get "command not found" when I run ifconfig -a. What can be wrong?
A: Revelant package is not installed.
   We need to find the package that contains this command.
   Either Google or get information from other server where command exists using following:
   #rpm -qf /usr/sbin/ifconfig
   net-tools-2.0-0.25.20131004git.el7.x86_64
   Finally, install the package.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
5. What happens if I type TAB-TAB?
A: TAB-TAB will auto complete the command.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
6. What command will show the available disk space on the Unix/Linux system?
A: #df ---> Will show the partirion wise details.
   #du ---> Will show the disk usage details for files and directories inside partitions.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
7. What commands do you know that can be used to check DNS records?
A: #nslookup <IP or hostname>
   nslookup command will obtain domain name or IP address.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
8. What Unix/Linux commands will alter a files ownership, files permissions?
A: To alter a files ownership, use chown command.
   #chown user:group file/dir

   To alter a files permissions, use chmod command.
   #chmod <permission> file/dir
____________________________________________________________________________________________
9. What does chmod +x FILENAME do?
A: It will add execute(1) permission to user, group and others.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
10. What does the permission 0750 on a file mean?
A: 7 - rwx permission to user
   5 - r-x permission to group users
   0 - --- No permission to others
____________________________________________________________________________________________
11. What does the permission 0750 on a directory mean?
A: 7 - rwx permission to user
   5 - r-x permission to group users
   0 - --- No permission to others
____________________________________________________________________________________________
12. How to add a new system user without login permissions?
A: #useradd -r <username> -s /bin/nologin
   -r=create system user
   -s=set a shell 
____________________________________________________________________________________________
13. How to add/remove a group from a user?
A: Add user to group
   #usermod -aG <group-name> <user-name>
   #gpasswd -a <user-name> <group-name>
   
   Remove user from group
   #gpasswd -d <user-name> <group-name>
____________________________________________________________________________________________
14. What is a bash alias?
A: Alias is a keybord shortcut or short command for lengthy command.
   Ex.
   alias ll='ls -l'
   If you just type ll it will execute ls -l.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
15. How do you set the mail address of the root/a user?
A: Default email id used by root user is: root@hostname.
   To change this there are 2 ways:
   a) Edit /etc/aliases file
      Add email id at the buttom of the file
      root: system@domain.com
      To add multiple email ids, seperate the first email id with comma.
      #newaliases   ----> It will compile /etc/aliases file.
      #systemctl restart postfix
   b) Create a .forward file inside the root folder and add email id there.
      #vim /root/.forward
       system@domain.com
      #systemctl restart postfix
____________________________________________________________________________________________
16. What does CTRL-c do?
A: CTRL-c will send SIGINT signal.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
17. What does CTRL-d do?
A: CTRL-d will send end of file signal.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
18. What does CTRL-z do?
A: CTRL-z will send SIGSTP signal.

NOTE:
stty - change and print terminal line settings
#stty -a
____________________________________________________________________________________________
19. What is in /etc/services?
A: It stores the information about services that client applications might use on host.
   It consist of Service Name, Port Number and Protocol it uses, and aliases.
   SYNTAX:
   name port/protocol aliases comments
____________________________________________________________________________________________
20. How to redirect STDOUT and STDERR in bash? (> /dev/null 2>&1)
A: For redirection we use > or >> operator.
   FDs that represent each numbers are:
   0 - Standard Input
   1 - Standard Output
   2 - Standrd Error
   STDOUT
   #find / -name "data.txt" ---> If I issues this command as normal user then it will display
    				 output, error on the screen.
    If you want only display only the output and not the error the we redirect the error
    messages to nullify.
   #find / -name "data.txt" 2>/dev/null ---> Will dislay only output content

   STDERR
   #find / -name "data.txt" 1>/dev/null ---> This will nullify the output content and error 
					     messages will be displayed on the screen.
   NOTE:
   If you dont want to display any output on the terminal i.e. (STDOUT and STRERR) nullify
   the result.(Redirect to /dev/null)
   Ex.
   #echo "Hello World" &>/dev/null ---> & = Both STDOUT and STRERR
____________________________________________________________________________________________
21. What is the difference between UNIX and Linux.
A: UNIX is the copyrighted name and OpenGroup hold the trademark. Most UNIX are commercial
   in nature. You need to pay for support, software, training etc.
   LINUX Kernel is free to download and install on your systems free of cost.
   LINUX is the UNIX clone.

   LINUX is just a kernel. All linux distributions includes GUI system + GNU Utilities etc.
   Whereas UNIX is a complete OS from a single source or Vendor.

   Example:
   UNIX: HP-UX, IBM AIX, Sun Solaris, Apple MAC OS, IRIX
   LINUX: RHEL, Fedora, Debian, SUSE, Ubuntu, Arch, Gentoo
____________________________________________________________________________________________
22. What is the difference between Telnet and SSH?
A: Both are the Network communication Protocol used to comminicate with remote servers.
   SSH encrypts the communication between client and server.
   Telnet is not a secure protocol and communicates using plain text file, which can be
   sniffed by anyone.
   SSH = 22/tcp PORT NO.
   TELNET = 23tcp PORT NO.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
23. Explain the three load averages and what do they indicate.
A: The three load average indicates the average load for 1,5,15 minutes on the system.    
   a) What command can be used to view the load averages?
   A: #uptime
      #top
      #cat /proc/loadavg
      High Load indicates many processes are waiting for CPU.
      1.00 on a single core processor, 2.00 on dual-core, 4.00 on quad-core.
___________________________________________________________________________________________
24. Can you name a lower-case letter that is not a valid option for GNU ls?
A: #ls -y
   #ls -z 
   #ls -j
   #ls -w
____________________________________________________________________________________________
25. What is a Linux kernel module?
A: Kernel module are pieces of code that can be loaded and unloaded into the kernel.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
26. Walk me through the steps in booting into single user mode to troubleshoot a problem.
A: When a grub menu appears while rebooting the server, select the kernel and press e to edit.
   Go to kernel line.
   Move the cursor to the last letter.
   
____________________________________________________________________________________________
27. Walk me through the steps you'd take to troubleshoot a 404 error on a web application.
A: A 404 Http status code indicates page could not be found on the server. Server itself
   is reacheable but the page is not.
   An 404 is a client-side error, implying user mistake or incorrect URL.
   Possible FIX:
   1. Retry or Reload the web page F5.
   2. Check the errors in the URL.
   3. Move up one directory level. ex. www.example.com/a/b/c --->www.example.com/a/b/
   4. Clear browser cache.
   5. Change DNS server used by your system.
   6. Check with Application owner team.
____________________________________________________________________________________________
28. What is ICMP protocol? Why do you need to use?
A: ICMP stands for Internet Control Message Protocol. It is used to diagnose network
   communication issues.
   It is Internet Layer protocol.
   It is also used for error reporting.
   Commands used: ping, traceroute, mtr.

-----------------------------

Contributors
General Questions
Simple Linux Questions
Medium Linux Questions
Hard Linux Questions
Expert Linux Questions
Networking Questions
MySQL Questions
DevOps Questions
Fun Questions
Demo Time
Other Great References
####[⬆] Contributors:

moregeek
typhonius
schumar
negesti
peter
andreashappe
quatrix
biyanisuraj
pedroguima
Ben
bharatnc
####[⬆] General Questions:

What did you learn yesterday/this week?
Fix this readme.

Talk about your preferred development/administration environment. (OS, Editor, Browsers, Tools etc.)
Emacs, Arch Linux.

Tell me about the last major Linux project you finished.
Blog-minimal -- A static blog generator based on org mode in emacs. [https://github.com/thiefuniverse/blog-minimal]

Tell me about the biggest mistake you've made in [some recent time period] and how you would do it differently today. What did you learn from this experience?
Humm.... Let me think it over ....

Why we must choose you?
Energetic, humorous, like programming, learn quickly.

What function does DNS play on a network?
DNS is like a phone book for the Internet. If you know a person's name and don't know their telephone number, you can simply look it up in a phone book. DNS provides this same service to the Internet. When we visit website like microsoft.com, our computers use DNS to retrieve it's IP address and then send requests to this IP.

What is HTTP?
HTTP is short for HyperText Transfer Protocol. HTTP is the underlying protocol usesd by the World Wide Web and this protocol defines how messages are formatted and transmitted, and what actioins Web servers and browsers should take in response to various commands. When you enter a URL in your browser, this actually sends a HTTP command to the Web server directing it to fetch and transmit the requested Web page. (The other main standard that controls how the World Wide Web works is HTML, which covers how Web pages are formatted and dislpayed)

What is an HTTP proxy and how does it work?
A HTTP proxy speaks HTTP protocol. The browser sends a request to the proxy server and the proxy server will then forward the request to the Real server. The Real server will only see the proxy as connection and answer to the proxy just like a client. Proxy server* receives the response and forwards it back to the client.

Describe briefly how HTTPS works.
Servers and clients will communicate with others over a secure SSL connection that encrypts and decrypts their requests and responses. (The SSL layer can verify that you are talking directly to the server that you think you are talking to and ensure that only the server can read read what you send it and only you can read what it sends back. SSL Connection Eastablished( 1. Hello 2. Certificate Exchange 3. KeyExchange)

What is SMTP? Give the basic scenario of how a mail message is delivered via SMTP.
Eastablish TCP connection:
Send mail message:
Client sends a HELO command which identifies sender and then server responds a 250 Requested mail action okay message.
Client sends a MAIL command and server responses ok which means to ready to receive messages.
Client sends RCPT commands which identify receiver and server responses whether server receives this email or not.
Client sends data with DATA command and QUTI to quit.
What is RAID? What is RAID0, RAID1, RAID5, RAID10?
RAID: stands for Redundant Array of Independent Disks. By placing data on multiple disk, I/O operations can overlap in a balanced way, improving performance and increase fault tolerance. RAID0: Good speed. Bad redundant. raid0 

RAID1: Get some redundancy with limited number of disks but consume a lot of storage space
raid1 

RAID5: Get a balance of redundancy and disk space, use XOR to resume data.
raid5 

RAID10: Good speed and redundancy but need half of disk space
raid10 

What is a level 0 backup? What is an incremental backup?
Level 0 means full backup. Incremental backup captures oly the changes made since the last incremental backup. Saves both time and storage space and ensures that your backup is up to date. (Fast backups, low storage space but slower recovery and risk of data loss)

Describe the general file system hierarchy of a Linux system.
  /bin       Essential command binaries
  /boot      Static files of the boot loader
  /dev       Device files
  /etc       Host-specific system configuration
  /lib       Essential shared libraries and kernel modules
  /media     Mount point for removeable media
  /mnt       Mount point for mounting a filesystem temporarily
  /opt       Add-on application software packages
  /sbin      Essential system binaries
  /srv       Data for services provided by this system
  /tmp       Temporary files
  /usr       Secondary hierarchy
  /var       Variable data
  /proc      Virtual filesystem (contains runtime system infomation).
####[⬆] Simple Linux Questions:

What is the name and the UID of the administrator user?
root, 0

How to list all files, including hidden ones, in a directory?
ls -a

Which command will show you free/used memory? Does free memory exist on Linux?
free
(total = used + free + cached/buffer)
Memory that is free is actually harder to use because it has to be transitioned from free to in use. Memory that is already in use is available but not free amd can easily be switched to another use.

How to search for the string "my konfi is the best" in files of a directory recursively?
grep -ri string directory/

How to connect to a remote server or what is SSH?
SSH (Secure Socket Shell) is a network protocol that provides administrators with a secure way to access a remote computer. SSH provides strong authentication and secure encrypted data communications between two computers connecting over an insecure network.
ssh loginName@serverIP (login command)

How to get all environment variables and how can you use them?
env, printenv, set
myName="thiefunvierse"; export myName
Then we can use echo $myName to show "thiefunvierse".

I get "command not found" when I run ifconfig -a. What can be wrong?
Maybe its default path is wrong. Try to run locate ifconfig and find complete path for ifconfig command.
Or install net-tools.

What happens if I type TAB-TAB?
Get command completion based on curent input.

What command will show the available disk space on the Unix/Linux system?
df -h # for human

What commands do you know that can be used to check DNS records?
nslookup domainName (nslookup thiefuniverse.github.io)
dig @DNS_SERVER domainName QUERY_TYPE ( dig @8.8.8.8 thiefuniverse.github.io A)

What Unix/Linux commands will alter a files ownership, files permissions?
chown newOwner fileName
chown newOwner:newGroup fileName
chgrp newGroup fileName
chmod +x fileName
chmod u+x,g=rx,o=wrx fileName
chmod 570 fileName

What does chmod +x FILENAMEdo?
Add executable permission to file.

What does the permission 0750 on a file mean?
0750 = User:rwx Group:r-x World:---
r = read
w = write
x = execute (traverse for directories)

What does the permission 0750 on a directory mean?
0750 = User:rwx Group:r-x World:---
r = print a listing of all directory entries (like ls)
w = create new directory entries
x = traverse for directories, obtain the inode of directory entries

How to add a new system user without login permissions?
useradd -M newUser (create a user without home)
usermod -L newUser (lock this user)

How to add/remove a group from a user?
sudo groupadd newGroup
sudo groupdel newGroup

What is a bash alias?
A alias for linux shell command.
For example, I use alias lm = "ls -l | more", then we can just type lm like I type "ls -l | more".

How do you set the mail address of the root/a user?
set mail address in ~/.forward

What does CTRL-c do?What can be wrong
Terminate current process.

What is in /etc/services?
The /etc/services file contains information regarding the known services available in the DARPA Internet. For each service, a single line should be present with the following information:
official_service_name port_number/protocol_name aliases

How to redirect STDOUT and STDERR in bash? (> /dev/null 2>&1)
file descriptor 1 : standard out
file descriptor 2 : standard error
1>&- : close 1 (close standard out)

2>&1 : combine the output of 2 and 1
/dev/null : prevent from showing on console

What is the difference between UNIX and Linux.
Unix: old, mainframes and high end computers, proprietary
Linux: based on Unix (new), from mainframes to low end PC, GNU license

What is the difference between Telnet and SSH?
ssh is a secured shell, where telnet is not a secured one.when you ssh to trasnfer data between a system, the data will be send in the encrypted form, where the hacker cannot encode or decode it. While you telnet,the data send between the system is alphabetical format(ASCII), where every one can understand. More over as per network security, telnet and ftp are prohibited. Always, trust SSL based data transfer.

Explain the three load averages and what do they indicate. What command can be used to view the load averages?
The averages are taken over the three time intervals ( one minute, three minutes, fifteen minutes).
uptime

Can you name a lower-case letter that is not a valid option for GNU ls?
ls -j -y -z

####[⬆] Medium Linux Questions:

What do the following commands do and how would you use them?
tee
read a standard input and write to a standard output and file.

awk
pattern matching and processing language

tr
translate or delete characters

cut
remove sections from each line of lines

tac
show file from last line to first line.

curl
transfer data from or to a server.

wget
network downloader

watch
execute a program periodically.

head
output the first part of files

tail
output the last part of files

What does an & after a command do?
run this command in the background.

What does & disown after a command do?
&: puts the job in the background, that is, makes it block on attempting to read input, and makes the shell not wait for its completion.

- disown: removes the process from the shell's job control, but it still leaves it connected to the terminal. One of the results is that the shell won't send it a SIGHUP. Obviously, it can only be applied to background jobs, because you cannot enter it when a foreground job is running.
- nohup: disconnects the process from the terminal, redirects its output to nohup.out and shields it from SIGHUP. One of the effects (the naming one) is that the process won't receive any sent NOHUP. It is completely independent from job control and could in principle be used also for foreground jobs (although that's not very useful).
What is a packet filter and how does it work?
What is Virtual Memory?
Virtual memory is a memory management capability of an OS that uses hardware and software to allow a computer to compensate for physical memory shortages by temppraily transferring data from random access memory to disk storage. Virtual address space is increased using active memory in RAM and inactive memory in hard disk drives to from contiguous addresses that hold both the application and its data.

What is swap and what is it used for?
Swap space in Linux is used when the amount of physical memory is full. If the system needs more memory resources and the RAM is full, inactive pages in memory are moved to the swap space. While swap space can help machines with a small amount of RAM, it should not be considered a replacement for more RAM. Swap space is located on hard drives, which have a slower access time than physical memory.

What is an A record, an NS record, a PTR record, a CNAME record, an MX record?
wiki for DNS record
A: Address record (Return a 32-bit IPv4 address, most commonly used to map hostnames to an IP address of the host)
NS: Name server record (Delegates a DNS zone to use the given authoritative name servers)
PTR: Pointer record (Pointer to a canonical name. Unlike a CNAME, DNS processing stops and just the name is returned. The most common use is for implementing reverse DNS lookups, but other uses include such things as DNS-SD).
CNAME: Canonical name record (Alias of one name to another: the DNS lookup will continue by retrying the lookup with the new name)
MX: Mail exchange record (Maps a domain name to a list of message transfer agents for that domain)

Are there any other RRs and what are they used for?
A: Address record (Return a 128-bit IPv6 address, most commonly used to map hostnames to an IP address of the host)
TSIG: Transaction Signature, URI: Uniform Resource Identifier.

What is a Split-Horizon DNS?
What is the sticky bit?
What does the immutable bit do to a file?
What is the difference between hardlinks and symlinks? What happens when you remove the source to a symlink/hardlink?
hard-soft-link
Underneath the file system files are represented by inodes. A file in the file system is basically a link to an inode. A hard link then just creates another file with a link to the same underlying inode.

When you delete a file it removes one link to the underlying inode. The inode is only deleted (or deletable/over-writable) when all links to the inode have been deleted.

A symbolic link is a link to another name in the file system.

Once a hard link has been made the link is to the inode. deleting renaming or moving the original file will not affect the hard link as it links to the underlying inode. Any changes to the data on the inode is reflected in all files that refer to that inode.

What is an inode and what fields are stored in an inode?
How to force/trigger a file system check on next reboot?
What is SNMP and what is it used for?
What is a runlevel and how to get the current runlevel?
Each runlevel designates a different system configuration and allows access to a different combination of processes.

0 - System halt; no activity, the system can be safely powered down.
1 - Single user; rarely used.
2 - Multiple users, no NFS (network filesystem); also used rarely.
3 - Multiple users, command line (i.e., all-text mode) interface; the standard runlevel for most Linux-based server hardware.
4 - User-definable
5 - Multiple users, GUI (graphical user interface); the standard runlevel for most Linux-based desktop systems.
6 - Reboot; used when restarting the system.
What is SSH port forwarding?
22

What is the difference between local and remote port forwarding?
Local port forwarding creates an outgoing tunnel which can be used to bring a public internet computer to local machine.
Remote port forwarding creates an incoming tunnel which can be used to bring a local computer into the public internet.
What are the steps to add a user to a system without using useradd/adduser?
What is MAJOR and MINOR numbers of special files?
Describe the mknod command and when you'd use it.
Describe a scenario when you get a "filesystem is full" error, but 'df' shows there is free space.
Describe a scenario when deleting a file, but 'df' not showing the space being freed.
Describe how 'ps' works.
What happens to a child process that dies and has no parent process to wait for it and what’s bad about this?
Explain briefly each one of the process states.
How to know which process listens on a specific port?
What is a zombie process and what could be the cause of it?
You run a bash script and you want to see its output on your terminal and save it to a file at the same time. How could you do it?
Explain what echo "1" > /proc/sys/net/ipv4/ip_forward does.
Describe briefly the steps you need to take in order to create and install a valid certificate for the site https://foo.example.com.
Can you have several HTTPS virtual hosts sharing the same IP?
What is a wildcard certificate?
Which Linux file types do you know?
What is the difference between a process and a thread? And parent and child processes after a fork system call?
What is the difference between exec and fork?
What is "nohup" used for?
What is the difference between these two commands?
myvar=hello
export myvar=hello
How many NTP servers would you configure in your local ntp.conf?
What does the column 'reach' mean in ntpq -p output?
You need to upgrade kernel at 100-1000 servers, how you would do this?
How can you get Host, Channel, ID, LUN of SCSI disk?
How can you limit process memory usage?
What is bash quick substitution/caret replace(^x^y)?
Do you know of any alternative shells? If so, have you used any?
What is a tarpipe (or, how would you go about copying everything, including hardlinks and special files, from one server to another)?
How can you tell if the httpd package was already installed?
How can you list the contents of a package?
How can you determine which package is better: openssh-server-5.3p1-118.1.el6_8.x86_64 or openssh-server-6.6p1-1.el6.x86_64 ?
####[⬆] Hard Linux Questions:

What is a tunnel and how you can bypass a http proxy?
What is the difference between IDS and IPS?
What shortcuts do you use on a regular basis?
What is the Linux Standard Base?
What is an atomic operation?
Your freshly configured http server is not running after a restart, what can you do?
What kind of keys are in ~/.ssh/authorized_keys and what it is this file used for?
I've added my public ssh key into authorized_keys but I'm still getting a password prompt, what can be wrong?
Did you ever create RPM's, DEB's or solaris pkg's?
What does :(){ :|:& };: do on your system?
How do you catch a Linux signal on a script?
Can you catch a SIGKILL?
What's happening when the Linux kernel is starting the OOM killer and how does it choose which process to kill first?
Describe the linux boot process with as much detail as possible, starting from when the system is powered on and ending when you get a prompt.
What's a chroot jail?
When trying to umount a directory it says it's busy, how to find out which PID holds the directory?
What's LD_PRELOAD and when it's used?
You ran a binary and nothing happened. How would you debug this?
What are cgroups? Can you specify a scenario where you could use them?
How can you remove/delete a file with file-name consisting of only non-printable/non-type-able characters?
How can you increase or decrease the priority of a process in Linux?
What are run-levels in Linux?
####[⬆] Expert Linux Questions:

A running process gets EAGAIN: Resource temporarily unavailable on reading a socket. How can you close this bad socket/file descriptor without killing the process?
####[⬆] Networking Questions:

What is localhost and why would ping localhost fail?
What is the similarity between "ping" & "traceroute" ? How is traceroute able to find the hops.
What is the command used to show all open ports and/or socket connections on a machine?
Is 300.168.0.123 a valid IPv4 address?
Which IP ranges/subnets are "private" or "non-routable" (RFC 1918)?
What is a VLAN?
What is ARP and what is it used for?
What is the difference between TCP and UDP?
What is the purpose of a default gateway?
What is command used to show the routing table on a Linux box?
A TCP connection on a network can be uniquely defined by 4 things. What are those things?
When a client running a web browser connects to a web server, what is the source port and what is the destination port of the connection?
How do you add an IPv6 address to a specific interface?
You have added an IPv4 and IPv6 address to interface eth0. A ping to the v4 address is working but a ping to the v6 address gives yout the response sendmsg: operation not permitted. What could be wrong?
What is SNAT and when should it be used?
Explain how could you ssh login into a Linux system that DROPs all new incoming packets using a SSH tunnel.
How do you stop a DDoS attack?
How can you see content of an ip packet?
What is IPoAC (RFC 1149)?
####[⬆] MySQL questions:

How do you create a user?
How do you provide privileges to a user?
What is the difference between a "left" and a "right" join?
Explain briefly the differences between InnoDB and MyISAM.
Describe briefly the steps you need to follow in order to create a simple master/slave cluster.
Why should you run "mysql_secure_installation" after installing MySQL?
How do you check which jobs are running?
####[⬆] DevOps Questions:

Can you describe your workflow when you create a script?
What is GIT?
What is a dynamically/statically linked file?
What does "./configure && make && make install" do?
What is puppet/chef/ansible used for?
What is Nagios/Zenoss/NewRelic used for?
What is Jenkins/TeamCity/GoCI used for?
What is the difference between Containers and VMs?
How do you create a new postgres user?
What is a virtual IP address? What is a cluster?
How do you print all strings of printable characters present in a file?
How do you find shared library dependencies?
What is Automake and Autoconf?
./configure shows an error that libfoobar is missing on your system, how could you fix this, what could be wrong?
What are the advantages/disadvantages of script vs compiled program?
What's the relationship between continuous delivery and DevOps?
What are the important aspects of a system of continuous integration and deployment?
####[⬆] Fun Questions:

A careless sysadmin executes the following command: chmod 444 /bin/chmod - what do you do to fix this?
I've lost my root password, what can I do?
I've rebooted a remote server but after 10 minutes I'm still not able to ssh into it, what can be wrong?
If you were stuck on a desert island with only 5 command-line utilities, which would you choose?
You come across a random computer and it appears to be a command console for the universe. What is the first thing you type?
Tell me about a creative way that you've used SSH?
You have deleted by error a running script, what could you do to restore it?
What will happen on 19 January 2038?
How to reboot server when reboot command is not responding?
####[⬆] Demo Time:

Unpack test.tar.gz without man pages or google.
Remove all "*.pyc" files from testdir recursively?
Search for "my konfu is the best" in all *.py files.
Replace the occurrence of "my konfu is the best" with "I'm a linux jedi master" in all *.txt files.
Test if port 443 on a machine with IP address X.X.X.X is reachable.
Get http://myinternal.webserver.local/test.html via telnet.
How to send an email without a mail client, just on the command line?
Write a get_prim method in python/perl/bash/pseudo.
Find all files which have been accessed within the last 30 days.
Explain the following command (date ; ps -ef | awk '{print $1}' | sort | uniq | wc -l ) >> Activity.log
Write a script to list all the differences between two directories.
In a log file with contents as <TIME> : [MESSAGE] : [ERROR_NO] - Human readable text display summary/count of specific error numbers that occurred every hour or a specific hour.
####[⬆] Other Great References:

Some questions are 'borrowed' from other great references like:

https://github.com/darcyclarke/Front-end-Developer-Interview-Questions
https://github.com/kylejohnson/linux-sysadmin-interview-questions/blob/master/test.md
http://slideshare.net/kavyasri790693/linux-admin-interview-questions

------------------------------------------

Q: What is your CMDB in your organization ?

Ans: Glass, quick base and snow.

Q) what is the difference between init and systemd ?
Ans: A init process starts serially i.e., one task starts only after the last task startup was successful and it was loaded in the memory. This often resulted into delayed and long booting time. 
If somehow init daemon could not start, no process will be started and the system will reach a stage called “Kernel Panic“.

#Systemd is a background processes which is designed to start processes in parallel, thus reducing the boot time and computational overhead.
systemd is the parent of all other processes directly or indirectly.A systemd, may refer to all the packages, utilities and libraries around daemon. systemd will avoid all the UN-necessary delay.

Q) How To Create a systemd Service in Linux (CentOS 7)
Ans :  create the file for the service >> /etc/systemd/system/<deomon name>.service  >>

>>  systemctl daemon-reload

Q: What is red-hat Satellite Server ?

Ans: It is a patch management server., Security, Bug fix, Enhancement and package updates.

EPEL repository is using for 3rd party software. 

Q) 32) How to recover from a chmod -R 000 /bin or chmod chmod u-x,g-x,o-x /bin/chmod?
Ans: wget coreutils-8.22-24.el7.x86_64.rpm or download the rpm.
rpm -Uvh --force coreutils-8.22-18.el7.x86_64.rpm 

 ls -l /bin/chmod
-rwxr-xr-x. 1 root root 58592 Aug 20 06:25 /bin/chmod

Q: How to run the dry run in patching process ?
Update test part into yum.conf
yum deplist <package>
Q: How to register my RHEL based system with RHN

# rhn_register
To register your RHEL 7.x system with RHN type the following

# subscription-manager register --username tom --password jerry --auto-attach

Q: How to find the list of open ports in linux ?
Ans: netstat -lntu
OR  lsof -i -P -n | grep LISTEN
OR  netstat -tulpn | grep LISTEN

Q: What are the linux components ?

Ans: Kernel , System Library, System Utility
Q: - What is use if sar command and location sar log files ?


Ans: - The sar command collect, report, of Linux system activity information. location /var/log/sa/sadd file. 


    CPU utilization
    Memory paging and its utilization
    Network I/O, and transfer statistics
    Process creation activity
    All block devices activity
    Interrupts/sec etc.


Q: What is the means of uptime cmd ?


uptime - Tell how long the system has been running.  


the system load averages for the past 1, 5, and 15 minutes.


Q: - Explain page in and page out in OS memory management ?


Ans: - paged in : In a virtual memory system, memory  is described as paged in if it is available in physical memory.


paged out : In a virtual memory system, memory is described as paged out if it is not available in physical memory.


Q: What is paging in Linux ?


Ans: In the paging memory-management scheme, the operating system retrieves data from secondary storage in same-size blocks called pages


Q: - What is Network bonding and how to check status of bonding ?


Bonding, also called port trunking/combining several network interfaces (NICs) to a single link, providing either high-availability, load-balancing, maximum throughput.


Check the  bond interface using ifconfig Command as shown below :


[root@localhost ~]# ifconfig | grep -i bond


 Status of Bond interfaces


[root@localhost ~]# cat /proc/net/bonding/bond0


Descriptions of bonding modes


Mode 0 is balance-rr


Round-robin policy: Transmit packets in sequential order from the first available slave through the last. This mode provides load balancing and fault tolerance.


Mode 1 is  active-backup


Active-backup policy: Only one slave in the bond is active. A different slave becomes active if, and only if, the active slave fails. The bond's MAC address is externally visible on only one port (nic) to avoid confusing the switch. This mode provides fault tolerance. 


Mode 2  is  balance-xor
Mode 3  is  broadcast
Mode 4  is  802.3ad
Mode 5  is   balance-tlb :- Adaptive transmit load balancing: The outgoing traffic is distributed according to the current load on each slave. Incoming traffic is received by the current slave. If the receiving slave fails, another slave takes over the MAC address of the failed receiving slave.
 Mode 6  is  balance-alb


Adaptive load balancing: includes balance-tlb plus receive load balancing (rlb) for IPV4 traffic. The receive load balancing is achieved by ARP negotiation. The bonding driver intercepts the ARP Replies sent by the local system on their way out and overwrites the source hardware address with the unique hardware address of one of the slaves in the bond such that different peers use different hardware addresses for the server. 


Q: - What is multipathing and why is it required ?


Multipathing services, provide a means for high performance, load-balanced, and fault-tolerant data storage either locally or via a storage area network (SAN). Multipathing facilitates a single storage device to be transparently accessed across one or more paths.


multipathing is made of two distinct parts: device-mapper and multipath-tools .


Linux multipathing provides connection fault tolerance and can provide load balancing across the active connections. 


DM-Multipathing (DM-MPIO) provides I/O fail-over and load-balancing within Linux for block devices. DM-MPIO handles the rerouting of block I/O to an alternate path in the event of a path failure. DM-MPIO can also balance the I/O load across all of the available paths that are typically Fibre Channel (FC).
The DM-Multipath devices will be created as /dev/mapper/mpathN,
If require edit the /etc/multipath.conf
    modprobe dm-multipath
    service multipathd start
    multipath -d (this will perform a dry to make sure you are happy with everything, fix anything that appears as a problem)
    multipath -v2 (commits the configuration)
    multipath -ll
    chkconfig multipathd on (make devices are configured after a reboot)
        
        Configuration file in detail


The configuration file is divided into the following sections


    blacklist - listing specific devices to exclude from multipathing
    blacklist_exceptions - listing of multipath candidates that would otherwise be excluded (blacklisted)
    defaults - general setup parameters
    multipaths - settings for the characteristics of individual multipath devices
    devices - settings for non-default storage arrays


If you need to resize an online multipath device, use the following procedure.


    Resize your physical device.
    Use the following command to find the paths to the LUN:


    # multipath -l


    Resize your paths. For SCSI devices, writing a 1 to the rescan file for the device causes the SCSI driver to rescan, as in the following command:


    # echo 1 > /sys/block/device_name/device/rescan 


    Resize your multipath device by running the multipathd resize command:


    # multipathd -k'resize map mpatha'


    Resize the filesystem (assuming no LVM or DOS partitions are used):


    # resize2fs /dev/mapper/mpatha
        
Q How to view UUID values and print block device attributes in linux?


Option 1 : Using blkid command
Option 2 : Using dumbe2fs command
Option 3: using  #ls -l /dev/disk/by-uuid


Q: - What is the difference of 2.4 and 2.6 kernel ?


2.4 have LVM1 , Support 32 bit CPU max size LV 2 TB, RHEL 3.x
2.6 HAVE LVM2 , support 32 & 64 bit max LV size 16TB with 32 bit & 8EB with 64 bit , RHEL 4.x & RHEL 5.x


Q: - What server need to check first - physical memory is not fully utilized but swap is  fully utilized and  physical memory is fully utilized but swap  memory is free and why ?


free -m, top, vmstat


To check the swappiness value, Swappiness can have a value between 0 and 100. Setting this parameter to a low value will reduce swapping from RAM, 


cat /proc/sys/vm/swappiness


This behaviour can be configured by setting the value of /proc/sys/vm/swappiness. The default value is 60, 
setting it to 0 means “never use swap and 100 is swapping out memory as soon as possible.


To change the value temporarily (lost on reboot):


sudo sysctl vm.swappiness=10


Q:- What is meand free -m output ?
# free -m
total used free shared buffers cached
Mem: 1963 1912 50 0 28 906


Have a look at the buffers/cache that says "985" MB of RAM is still free in buffers. As long as you have enough memory in the buffers, and your server is not using much swap, you're pretty fine on RAM.




Q: - What is chroot env in ftp and how enable chroot for ftp ?


A chroot operation changes the apparent root directory for a running process and its children. It allows you to run a program with a root directory other than /. 


The program cannot see or access files outside the designated directory tree. Such an artificial root directory is called a chroot jail.


By default, anonymous users are placed in a chroot jail.


Specify the chroot_local_user=YES option in the /etc/vsftpd/vsftpd.conf file to place local users in a chroot jail based on their home directory.


Q: - What is 'inode'?


All Linux/Unix files have its description stored in a structure called 'inode'.


The inode contains info about the file-size, its location, time of last access, time of last modification, permission and so on. Directories are also represented as files and have an associated inode. 


Q: - How to recover corrupted ext3 partition data from  Super block ?


Super block:#  Super block is a header that tells the kernel about the layout of the file system. 
It contains information about the block size, block-count and several such details. The first super block is the one that is used when the file system is mounted.


Q: How can I Recover a bad super block from a corrupted ext3 partition to get back my data? I'm getting following error:


    /dev/sda2: Input/output error
    mount: /dev/sda2: can't read super block
How do I fix this error?


If your system will give you a terminal type the following command, else boot Linux system from rescue disk (boot from 1st CD/DVD. At boot: prompt type command linux rescue).
Mount partition using alternate super block


Find out super block location for /dev/sda2:  # dumpe2fs /dev/sda2 | grep super block


Sample output:


  Primary super block at 0, Group descriptors at 1-6
  Backup super block at 32768, Group descriptors at 32769-32774
  Backup super block at 98304, Group descriptors at 98305-98310


Now check and repair a Linux file system using alternate super block # 32768:  # fsck -b 32768 /dev/sda2
Now try to mount file system using mount command:
# mount /dev/sda2 /mnt
You can also use super block stored at 32768 to mount partition, enter:


# mount sb={alternative-super block} /dev/device /mnt
# mount sb=32768 /dev/sda2 /mnt
Try to browse and access file system:


Q: - What are the process states in Unix?


Running : The process is either running or it is ready to run .
Waiting : The process is waiting for an event or for a resource.
Stopped : The process has been stopped, usually by receiving a signal.
Zombie  : The process is dead but have not been removed from the process table.
Q: - What is a zombie?


When a process finishes execution, it will have an exit status to report to its parent process. Because of this last little bit of information, the process will remain in the operating system’s process table as a zombie process


Zombie is a process state when the child dies before the parent process. In this case the structural information of the process is still in the process table.


There is no impact in case zombie process exist, there is some clean up process in OS that will clear zombie.


Q: - What daemon is responsible for tracking events on your system?


syslogd or rsyslogd


/etc/rsyslog.conf


Q: - What do you mean a File System?


File System is a method to store and organize files and directories on disk. 
A file system can have different formats called file system types.
These formats determine how the information is stored as files and directories.


Q: - Tell me the name of directory structure hierarchy for Linux


/root    /boot  /bin  /sbin /proc /mnt /usr /var /lib /etc /dev /opt /srv /tmp /media  


Q: - What does /boot directory contains?


The /boot/ directory contains static files required to boot the system, such as the Linux kernel, boot loader configuration files.


Q: - If some one deletes /boot directory from your server, than what will happen?


 Your Server can’t boot without /boot directory because this directory contains all bootable files 
 
Q: - What does /dev directory contain?


The /dev directory contains all device files that are attached to system or virtual device files that are provided by the kernel.


Q: - What is the role of udev daemon?


The udev demon used to create and remove all these device nodes or files in /dev/ directory dynamically


udevadm -  udev management control


Q: How to remove a module from Kernel ?


modprob -r <module>


modinfo et3 will show modules.


modeprobe -- prob the modules if not loaded.
modeprob -l vfat


Q: - What kind of files or nodes /dev/ directory contains and how do I access or see device files?


Block Device Files:- talks to devices block by block [1 block at a time (1 block = 512 bytes to 32KB)]. Eg: USB, CDROM, HDD


# ls /dev/sd*
brw-rw----         1 root             root               8,         0 Mar 15  2009 sda


Character Device Files:- its talk to devices character by character.
Examples: - Virtual terminals, terminals, serial modems, random numbers


#ls /dev/tty*
crw-rw----            1 root             root               4,         64 Mar 15  2009 ttyS0


Q: - Tell me the name of device file for PS/2 mouse connection.


/dev/psaux


Q: - Tell me the name of device file for parallel port (Printers).


/dev/lp0 


Q: - What does /etc/X11/ directory contains?


The /etc/X11/ directory is for X Window System configuration files, such as xorg.conf.


Q: - What does /etc/skel directory contains?


Its contains files and directories that are automatically copied over to a new user's home directory when such user is created by the adduser command.


Q: - Tell me name of Linux File systems?  and difference between them ?


Ext2  , Ext3 , Ext4


The ext3 file system is an enhanced version of the ext2 file system.


 Ext3 supports journalling, but ext2 not.
After an unexpected power failure or system crash,  each mounted ext2 file system on the machine must be checked for consistency by the e2fsck program. This is a time-consuming process and during this time, any data on the volumes is unreachable.
The journalling provided by the ext3 file system means that this sort of file system check is no longer necessary after an unclean system shutdown. The only time a consistency check occurs using ext3 is in certain rare hardware failure cases, such as hard drive failures. The time to recover an ext3 file system after an unclean system shutdown does not depend on the size of the file system or the number of files; rather, it depends on the size of the journal used to maintain consistency. The default journal size takes about a second to recover, depending on the speed of the hardware.


 Fourth extended file system is a journaling file system .
 
 Features of ext4 file system:-


1. Ext3 supports 16 TB of max file system size and 2 TB of max file size.But Ext4 have 1 EB of max file system size and 16 TB of max file size. 
2. Fast fsck check than ext3
3 In Ext4 the journalling feature can be disabled, which provides a small performance improvement.
4. Online defragmentation.
5. Delayed allocation :- Ext4 uses a file system performance technique called allocate-on-flush, also known as delayed allocation. It consists of delaying block allocation until the data is going to be written to the disk, unlike some other file systems, which may allocate the necessary blocks before that step.


Q: What are types of journalling ?


Journal (lowest risk)
    Both metadata and file contents are written to the journal before being committed to the main file system. Because the journal is relatively continuous on disk, this can improve performance, if the journal has enough space. In other cases, performance gets worse, because the data must be written twice—once to the journal, and once to the main part of the filesystem


Ordered (medium risk)
    Only metadata is journaled; file contents are not, but it's guaranteed that file contents are written to disk before associated metadata is marked as committed in the journal. This is the default on many Linux distributions. If there is a power outage or kernel panic while a file is being written or appended to, the journal will indicate that the new file or appended data has not been "committed", so it will be purged by the cleanup process


Writeback (highest risk)
    Only metadata is journaled; file contents are not. The contents might be written before or after the journal is updated. As a result, files modified right before a crash can become corrupted. For example, a file being appended to may be marked in the journal as being larger than it actually is, causing garbage at the end. Older versions of files could also appear unexpectedly after a journal recovery. The lack of synchronization between data and journal is faster in many cases. JFS uses this level of journaling, but ensures that any "garbage" due to unwritten data is zeroed out on reboot. 


Q: - How we create ext3 file system on /dev/sda7 disk?


# mkfs –j /dev/sda7 Or mkfs.ext3 /dev/sda7


Q: - Can we convert ext2 filesystem to ext3 file system?


Yes, we can convert ext2 to ext3 file system by tune2fs command.
tune2fs –j   /dev/<Block-Device-Name>


Q: - How we will create ext4 file system?


# mke2fs -t ext4 /dev/DEV 


Q: - Explain /proc filesystem?


/proc is a virtual filesystem that provides detailed information about Linux kernel, hardware’s and running processes. Files under /proc directory named as Virtual files. Because /proc contains virtual files that’s why it is called virtual file system. These virtual files have unique qualities. Most of them are listed as zero bytes in size. Virtual files such as /proc/interrupts, /proc/meminfo, /proc/mounts, and /proc/partitions provide an up-to-the-moment glimpse of the system's hardware. Others, like the /proc/filesystems file and the /proc/sys/ directory provide system configuration information and interfaces.


Q: - Can we change files parameters placed under /proc directory?


Yes
To change the value of a virtual file, use the echo command and a greater than symbol (>) to redirect the new value to the file. 
eg: echo www.nextstep4it.com > /proc/sys/kernel/hostname 


Q: - What is the use of sysctl command?


The /sbin/sysctl command is used to view, set, and automate kernel settings in the /proc/sys/ directory. 


Q: - /proc/ directory contains a number of directories with numerical names. What is that?


These directories are called process directories, as they are named after a program's process ID and contain information specific to that process.


Q: - What is RAID?


RAID, stands for Redundant Array of Inexpensive Disks. RAID is a method by which same data or information is spread across several disks, using techniques such as disk striping (RAID Level 0), disk mirroring (RAID Level 1), and disk striping with parity (RAID Level 5) to achieve redundancy, lower latency, increased bandwidth, and maximized ability to recover from hard disk crashes.


Q: - What is the difference between hardware RAID and Software RAID?


The hardware-based RAID is independent from the host. A Hardware RAID device connects to the SCSI controller and presents the RAID arrays as a single SCSI drive. An external RAID system moves all RAID handling "intelligence" into a controller located in the external disk subsystem. The whole subsystem is connected to the host via a normal SCSI controller and appears to the host as a single disk.


Software RAID is implemented under OS Kernel level. The Linux kernel contains an MD driver that allows the RAID solution to be completely hardware independent. The performance of a software-based array depends on the server CPU performance and load.


Q: - Explain RAID 0?  


 works on “striping” technique. RAID 0 allows high I/O performance but provides no redundancy. RAID 0 Array Size is equal to sum of disks in array. If one drive fails then all data in the array is lost.


Q: - Explain RAID 1?


Its a Mirroring technique. Level 1 provides redundancy by writing identical data to each member disk of the array. The storage capacity will be 50%  In RAID 1 write speed is slow but read speed is good.


Q: - Explain RAID 5?


It is based on rotating parity with striping technique. (x-or gate) . The storage capacity  means ( Max no of disk -1 ) 


Read data transactions are very fast while write data transaction are somewhat slower


Q: - Which kernel module is required for Software RAID? and which utility or command is used for creating software RAID’s for RHEL5?


“md” module
mdadm


Q: - Can we create software RAID during Linux installation?


Yes, we can create Software RAID during Linux Installation by “Disk Druid”


Q: - What is the role of chunk size for software RAID?


Chunk size is very important parameter on which RAID performance based.
We know stripes go across disk drives. But how big are the pieces of the stripe on each disk? The pieces a stripe is broken into are called chunks.To get good performance you must have a reasonable chunk size.


For big I/Os we required small chunks and for small I/Os we required big chunks.


Q: - What is SWAP Space?


Swap space in Linux is used when the amount of physical memory (RAM) is full. If the system needs more memory resources and the RAM is full or exceed the swappiness Value, inactive pages in memory are moved to the swap space. While swap space can help machines with a small amount of RAM, it should not be considered a replacement for more RAM. Swap space is located on hard drives, which have a slower access time than physical memory.


Q: - What are the steps to create SWAP files or Partition?


- Create swap partition or file
- Write special signature using “mkswap”
- Activate swap space by “swapon –a” command
- Add swap entry into /etc/fstab file


Q: - How you will create swap file of size 4 GB and explain swap file entry in /etc/fstab file?


Use “dd” command to create swap file.
dd if=/dev/zero  of=/SWAPFILE  bs=1024  count=4
mkswap /SWAPFILE
swapon –a
Entry into /etc/fstab file.
/SWAPFILE   swap   swap   defaults   0   0


Q: - Tell me the steps to remove the swap file?


Firstly disable the swap file by “swapoff” command.
Remove Swap file entry from /etc/fstab file.
Now remove the swap file by “rm” command.


Q: Something eats all memory (I suspect memory leak on some app). How to detect what?


Memory Leakage in most cases are application bug and it never comes up with Linux os until and unless you did something funny with kernel parameters.
You can use cat /proc/meminfo and ps aux | less to get a better idea of the memory distribution on your system 


ps -A --sort -rss -o comm,pmem | head -n 11


Q: - What can we do with “parted” command or utility?


- View the existing partition table
- Add partitions from free space or additional hard drives
- Change the size of existing partitions


Q: - How we will check free space on drive /dev/sda with parted command?


#parted /dev/sda
print


Q: - Can we resize the size of a partition?


Yes, we can resize the size of partition by “parted” command.
#parted /dev/sda


print


To resize the partition, use the resize command followed by the minor number for the partition, the starting place in megabytes, and the end place in megabytes. For example:


resize 3 1024 2048


After resizing the partition, use the print command to confirm that the partition has been resized correctly, is the correct partition type, and is the correct file system type.


Q: - What is LVM?


LVM stands for Logical Volume Manager. LVM, is a storage management solution that allows administrators to divide hard drive space into physical volumes (PV), which can then be combined into logical volume groups (VG), which are then divided into logical volumes (LV) on which the file system and mount point are created.


Q: - What are the steps to create LVM?


- Create physical volumes by “pvcreate” command


#pvcreate /dev/sda2
- Add physical volume to volume group by “vgcreate” command


#vgcreate VLG0 /dev/sda2
- Create logical volume from volume group by “lvcreate” command.


#lvcreate -L 1G -n LVM1 VLG0
Now create file system on /dev/sda2 partition by “mke2fs” command.


#mke2fs -j /dev/VLG0/LVM1 


Q: - What are LVM1 and LVM2?


LVM1 and LVM2 are the versions of LVM.
LVM2 uses device mapper driver contained in 2.6 kernel version.
LVM 1 was included in the 2.4 series kernels.


Q: - What is Volume group (VG)?


The Volume Group is the highest level abstraction used within the LVM. It gathers together a collection of Logical Volumes and Physical Volumes into one administrative unit.


Q: - What is physical extent (PE)?


Each physical volume is divided chunks of data, known as physical extents; these extents have the same size as the logical extents for the volume group.


Q: - What is logical extent (LE)?


Each logical volume is split into chunks of data, known as logical extents. The extent size is the same for all logical volumes in the volume group.


Q: - Explain LVM snapshot?


LVM snapshots allow the administrator to create a new block device which presents an exact copy of a logical volume, frozen at some point in time.
# lvcreate -L 592M -s -n databackup /dev/ops/databases
Snapshots provide a ’frozen image’ of the contents of the origin while the origin can still be  updated.
The snapshot does not need the same amount of storage the origin has. In a typical scenario, 15-20% might be enough.


Q: - How you will check on Your server or system device-mapper is installed or not?


Check the following file.  #cat /proc/misc


Q: - How are snapshots in LVM2 different from LVM1?


In LVM2 snapshots are read/write by default, whereas in LVM1, snapshots were read only.


Q: - What is the maximum size of a single LV?


For 2.4 based kernels, the maximum LV size is 2TB.
For 32-bit CPUs on 2.6 kernels, the maximum LV size is 16TB.
For 64-bit CPUs on 2.6 kernels, the maximum LV size is 8EB. 


Q: - If a volume group named as VG0 already exists but i need to extend this volume group up to 4GB.Explain all steps?


Firstly create Physical volume (/dev/sda7) of size 4GB.
Now run following command.
vgextend VG0 /dev/sda7 
Q: - If a volume group VG0 have 3 PV's (/dev/sda6, /dev/sda7, /dev/sda8) but i want to remove /dev/sda7 pv from this VG0?


vgreduce VG0 /dev/sda7


Q: - Which command is used to extend a logical volume?


lvextend --size +<addsize> /dev/<vgname>/<lvname>
resize2fs /dev/<vgname>/<lvname>


Q: - Tell me all steps to remove a LVM?


To remove a logical volume from a volume group, first unmount it with the umount command:
umount /dev/<vgname>/<lvname>
and then use the lvremove command:
lvremove /dev/<vgname>/<lvname>


Q: - Which command is used to create LVM Snapshot?


lvcreate --size <size> -s -n <snapshotname> <lvname>


lvcreate -L 10G -s -n rootsnapshot /dev/server1/root


We want to mount /dev/server1/rootsnapshot on /mnt/server1/rootsnapshot, so we have to create that directory first:


mkdir -p /mnt/server1/rootsnapshot


Then we mount our snapshot:


mount /dev/server1/rootsnapshot /mnt/server1/rootsnapshot


Then we run


ls -l /mnt/server1/rootsnapshot/


This should show all directories and files that we know from our / partition:


The lvcreate command is used to create a new logical volume, meaning there must be
free physical extents in the logical volume group to create a snapshot. The -s option
means that the LV is a snapshot, <snapshotname> is the name of the new LV created, and
<lvname> is the name of the LV from which to create the snapshot.


 Snapshot is really just a copy of the inode tree at the point in time you created it


Q: How to check Server serial No and details in cmds line.


dmidecode -t  


# dmidecode | egrep -i "product name|serial number"


# dmidecode -t system


#  dmidecode -s system-serial-number
Q: - Is there any relation between modprobe.conf file and network devices?


Yes, This file assigns a kernel module to each network device.


For Example :-
[root@localhost ~]# cat /etc/modprobe.conf
alias eth0 b44
Here b44 is the kernel module for network device eth0.
We can Confirm by following command (This module “b44” is present or not).
[root@localhost ~]# lsmod |grep b44
b44                    29005    0


Q: - What is the location of "network" file and what does this contains?


location :-  /etc/sysconfig/network


NETWORKING=yes
NETWORKING_IPV6=no
HOSTNAME=localhost.localdomain


Q: - Which deamon is required to start Network services?


network
/etc/init.d/network start


Q: - What is the role of /etc/resolv.conf file?


In this file we sets the DNS servers (using their IP addresses) and the search domain. The values of the DNS servers are often added when the network is activated because the data can be provided by DHCP or a similar service.


Q: - Which protocol is required to allow local printing and print sharing?


Internet Printing Protocol (IPP) is required to allow local printing and print sharing.


Q: - What is CUPS?


CUPS stands for "Common UNIX Printing System". CUPS is a open source printing system developed by Apple Inc. CUPS uses the Internet Printing Protocol (IPP) to allow local printing and print sharing.


Q: - What is the location of log files for CUPS?


The log files for the CUPS printing system are located in the /var/log/cups/ directory.


Q: - What is YUM?


YUM stands for Yellow dog Updater,  Yellow Dog is a version of Linux for the Power Architecture hardware and is RPM-based


Q: - What are the advantages of YUM?


- Automatic resolution of software dependencies.
- Multiple software locations at one time.
- Ability to specify particular software versions or architectures.


Q: - How you will install software by YUM?


yum install <pkgname>


Q: - Which option is required to assume the answer "yes" to any questions asked during installation of package dependencies for YUM?


The "-y" option is used to assume the answer "yes".
For Example
yum -y install squid


Q: - How to remove a software by YUM?


yum remove <pkgname>


Q: how to do yum roll back ?


yum history


yum rollback <history no>

Q: How to downgrade a package to an earlier version

The syntax is:
# yum downgrade {pkg}
# yum downgrade nginx

Q: How to list software repositories
$ yum repolist

Q: - How Many Run Levels present in Linux?


There are 7 run levels, with each having its own properties.


-   0: Halt the system
-   1: Single-user mode
-   2: Not used
-   3: Multi-user mode with text login
-   4: Not used
-   5: Multi-user mode with graphical login
-   6: Reboot


Q: - Which configuration file is required to change the Run Level of Server or system?


/etc/inittab
To change the default run level, modify this line.
id:5:initdefault:


Q: - Explain architectures required for RPMs?


noarch Architecture-independent, can run on any architecture
i386   Generic build for a 32-bit x86 system
i586   Sometimes used when building kernels for older x86 processors
Intel® Pentium ® II, Intel Pentium III, Intel Pentium 4, AMD Athlon, and
i686   AMD Duron systems (Most RPMs for these architectures are built using the i386 architecture, with the kernel for these architectures being built with the
i686 for optimal performance.)
x86_64 64-bit processors such as AMD Athlon64, AMD Opteron, and Intel EM64T
ia64   Intel® Itanium
ppc    32-bit IBM® POWER, IBM eServer„ pSeries®, and IBM eServer iSeries
s390x  64-bit IBM eServer System z


Q: - How to install Linux software’s by RPM?


rpm -ivh test-1.0-1.i386.rpm


Q: - If a file associated with test-1.0-1.i386.rpm deleted, than How we will recover that file?


We can reinstall this rpm again.


Q: - If you are getting error "package is already installed" but you have to install package any how. what option you will use?


rpm -ivh test-1.0-1.i386.rpm


Preparing... ########################################### [100%] package test-1.0-1 is already installed
In this case you can use "--replacepkgs" option.
rpm -ivh –replacepkgs   test-1.0-1.i386.rpm


Q: - Which options are required to upgrade a RPM?


Upgrading a package is similar to installing one. Type the following command at a shell prompt:
rpm -Uvh test-2.0-1.i386.rpm


Q: - In which directory RPM database stored?


/var/lib/rpm 


Q: - Explain the command "rpm -qa"?


It will queries all currently installed packages.


Q: - Explain the command "rpm -qf "?


it queries the RPM database for which package owns <filename>. When specifying a file, specify the absolute path of the file.


Q: - How to verify all installed packages?


rpm -Va


Q: - How to verify the signature of an rpm?


rpm -K test-1.0-1.i386.rpm


Q: - How to list PCI Devices on your server or System?


use "lspci" command.


Q: - What is the role of "Kudzu"?


Kudzu is used to Detect new Hardware


Q: - What happens when you add a new device after installation?


The Kudzu program runs each time the system boots and performs a hardware probe. If new hardware is found, Kudzu attempts to map it to a kernel module. If successful, the information is saved, and the device is configured.


Q: - What command should you use to check the number of files and disk space used and each user's defined quotas?


repquota 


Q: - What can you type at a command line to determine which shell you are using?


echo $SHELL 


Q: - Write a command to find all of the files which have been accessed within the last 30 days.


find / -type f -atime -30 > filename.txt


Q: - How to Enable ACLs for /home partition?


Add following entry in /etc/fstab


LABEL=/home    /home       ext3        acl      1  2


Now remount /home partition with acl option.
mount -t ext3 -o acl /dev/sda3  /home


Q: - How to View ACLs for a file(test_file)?


getfacl test_file


Q: - How to remove an ACL?


setfacl --remove-all <file-name>


30)  Default Port numbers used by ssh,ftp,http,https,telnet,smtp,pop3,pop3s,imap,imaps


SSH 22, ftp 20/21, http 80, https 443, SMTP/SMPTS 25/465, POP3/POP3S 110/995, IMAP/IMAPS 143/993


179: How can you enable, on a default Linux installation, root remote access through SSH?


Edit ssh configuration on /etc/ssh/sshd_config and enable Root by


changing “PermitRootLogin” to “yes”.


Q) How to find what are the services are running in server ?


#service –status-all 


Q) What are the Grub stages ?


 stage ## 1 code can be found in the file /boot/grub/stage1.


# file /boot/grub/stage1
/boot/grub/stage1: x86 boot sector; GRand Unified Bootloader, stage1 version 0x3,
GRUB version 0.94, code offset 0x48


Stage ## 1


    Stage 1 code is stored in the MBR. This code contains a block list that points to the next stage of GRUB, which is either stage1_5 or stage 2, depending on the file system type.
        
        Stage 1_5


    Stage1_5 code allows GRUB to interpret different types of file system. For some file system types such as ext4, GRUB does not need to load stage1_5. The code for each file system type is stored as files in /boot/grub:


    # cd /boot/grub
    # ls *stage1_5
        
Stage 2


    Stage 2 code reads /boot/grub/grub.conf to determine how to load the kernel. The stage 2 code is stored in the file /boot/grub/stage2:


    # ls -al /boot/grub/stage2
    -rw-r--r--. 1 root root 125976 Jun 28  2012 /boot/grub/stage2
Boot Sequence :--
______________________


a. BIOS
    BIOS stands for Basic Input/Output System
    Performs some system integrity checks
    Searches, loads, and executes the boot loader program.


b. MBR
    MBR stands for Master Boot Record.
    It is located in the 1st sector of the bootable disk. Typically /dev/hda, or /dev/sda
    MBR is less than 512 bytes in size. This has three components 1) primary boot loader info in 1st 446 bytes 2) partition table info in next 64 bytes 3) mbr validation check in last 2 bytes.
    It contains information about GRUB (or LILO in old systems).
    So, in simple terms MBR loads and executes the GRUB boot loader.


c GRUB


GNU GRUB is a Multiboot boot loader. It was derived from GRUB, the GRand Unified Bootloader,


Briefly, a boot loader is the first software program that runs when a computer starts. It is


responsible for loading and transferring control to the operating system kernel software


(such as the Hurd or Linux). The kernel, in turn, initializes the rest of the operating


    GRUB stands for Grand Unified Bootloader.
    If you have multiple kernel images installed on your system, you can choose which one to be executed.
    GRUB displays a splash screen, waits for few seconds, if you don’t enter anything, it loads the default kernel image as specified in the grub configuration file.
    GRUB has the knowledge of the filesystem (the older Linux loader LILO didn’t understand filesystem).
    Grub configuration file is /boot/grub/grub.conf (/etc/grub.conf is a link to this).


d. Kernel
    Mounts the root file system as specified in the “root=” in grub.conf
    Kernel executes the /sbin/init program
    Since init was the 1st program to be executed by Linux Kernel, it has the process id (PID) of 1. Do a ‘ps -ef | grep init’ and check the pid.
    initrd stands for Initial RAM Disk.
    initrd is used by kernel as temporary root file system until kernel is booted and the real root file system is mounted. It also contains necessary drivers compiled inside, which helps it to access the hard drive partitions, and other hardware.


e. Init
    Looks at the /etc/inittab file to decide the Linux run level.
   
           Init identifies the default initlevel from /etc/inittab and uses that to load all appropriate program.
    Execute ‘grep initdefault /etc/inittab’ on your system to identify the default run level
    If you want to get into trouble, 
    Typically you would set the default run level to either 3 or 5.


f. Runlevel programs


    When the Linux system is booting up, you might see various services getting started.
    Depending on your default init level setting, the system will execute the programs from one of the following directories.
        Run level 0 – /etc/rc.d/rc0.d/
        Run level 1 – /etc/rc.d/rc1.d/
        Run level 2 – /etc/rc.d/rc2.d/
        Run level 3 – /etc/rc.d/rc3.d/
        Run level 4 – /etc/rc.d/rc4.d/
        Run level 5 – /etc/rc.d/rc5.d/
        Run level 6 – /etc/rc.d/rc6.d/


    Please note that there are also symbolic links available for these directory under /etc directly. So, /etc/rc0.d is linked to /etc/rc.d/rc0.d.
    Under the /etc/rc.d/rc*.d/ directories, you would see programs that start with S and K.


    Programs starts with S are used during startup. S for startup.
    Programs starts with K are used during shutdown. K for kill.
    There are numbers right next to S and K in the program names. Those are the sequence number in which the programs should be started or killed.
 
3) Which files are called for user profile by default when a user gets login


$HOME/.bash_profile, $HOME/.bash_bashrc


9) Command used to lock user password


usermod -L username


11) Which file defines the attributes like UID, PASSWORD expiry, HOME Dir create or not while adding user


/etc/login.defs


14) What is the path of network (ethX) configuration files


/etc/sysconfig/network-scripts/ethX


15) How can we change speed and make full duplex settings for eth0


We can do this with below given 2 methods:


ethtool -s eth0 speed 100 duplex full


ethtool -s eth0 speed 10 duplex half


OR


mii-tool -F 100baseTx-HD


mii-tool -F 10baseT-HD


17) Main configuration file and command used for exporting NFS directories and it’s deamons


/etc/exports and exportfs -av , deamons are quotad, portmapper, mountd, nfsd and nlockmgr/status


18) What is command to check ports running/used over local machine


netstat -antp


20) What is the difference between soft and hard links

Soft Links => 1) Soft link files will have different inode numbers then source file
Hard link create a copy of the file with duplicate inodes.

2) If original file deleted then soft link file be of no use


3) Soft links are not updated


4) Can create links between directories


5) Can cross file system boundaries


Hard Links => 1) Hard links will have the same inode number as source file


2) Hard links can not link directories


3) Can not cross file system boundaries


4) Hard links always refers to the source, even if moved or removed


25) How can we have daily system analysis and reports over mail


Use logwatch


40) How to create lvm mirror


lvcreate -L 50G -m1 -n LVMmirror vg0


41) Command to check last runlevel


who -r


49) What vmstat show


vmstat (virtual memory statistics) is a computer system monitoring tool that collects and displays summary information about operating system memory, processes, interrupts, paging and block I/O


50) What is tmpfs File System


Reference : http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tmpfs


tmpfs is a common name for a temporary file storage facility on many Unix-like operating systems. It is intended to appear as a mounted file system, but stored in volatile memory instead of a persistent storage device. A similar construction is a RAM disk, which appears as a virtual disk drive and hosts a disk file system.


Everything stored in tmpfs is temporary in the sense that no files will be created on the hard drive; however, swap space is used as backing store in case of low memory situations. On reboot, everything in tmpfs will be lost.


The memory used by tmpfs grows and shrinks to accommodate the files it contains and can be swapped out to swap space.


Q: How do u findout the users who are NOT logged in for more than 30 days? which file you will check?


A. last , lastlog,   /var/log/wtmp


Q: Understanding Linux CPU Load - when should you be worried?


A.


Q: Explaining Close_Wait in netstat output ?


A. CLOSE_WAIT
Indicates that the server has received the first FIN signal from the client and the connection is in the process of being closed


So this essentially means that his is a state where socket is waiting for the application to execute close()


A socket can be in CLOSE_WAIT state indefinitely until the application closes it.
Faulty scenarios would be like file descriptor leak, server not being execute close() on socket leading to pile up of close_wait sockets


CLOSE_WAIT means your program is still running, and hasn't closed the socket (and the kernel is waiting for it to do so). Add -p to netstat to get the pid, and then kill it more forcefully (with SIGKILL if needed). 


Basically the "WAIT" states mean that one side closed the connection but the final confirmation of the close is pending.


TIME_WAIT indicates that this side has closed the connection. 


Open/create `/etc/sysctl.conf`
Add `net.ipv4.tcp_keepalive_time = 120` and save the file it can solve issue


Q: - What are the steps to configure network bonding in linux ?


Step 1.


Create the file ifcfg-bond0 with the IP address, netmask and gateway. Shown below is my test bonding config file.


$ cat /etc/sysconfig/network-scripts/ifcfg-bond0 


Step 2.


Modify eth0, eth1 and eth2 configuration as shown below.


 cat /etc/sysconfig/network-scripts/ifcfg-eth0


DEVICE=eth0
BOOTPROTO=none
ONBOOT=yes
# Settings for Bond
MASTER=bond0
SLAVE=yes 


Step 3.


Set the parameters for bond0 bonding kernel module.


 Add the following lines to /etc/modprobe.conf


# bonding commands
alias bond0 bonding
options bond0 mode=1 miimon=100


Step 4.


Load the bond driver module from the command prompt.


$ modprobe bonding


Step 5.


Restart the network, or restart the computer.


$ service network restart # Or restart computer


When the machine boots up check the proc settings.


$ cat /proc/net/bonding/bond0 


Q: - How to check the perfromance of NFS server in Linux ?


 Reff : http://www.slashroot.in/how-do-linux-nfs-performance-tuning-and-optimization


#cat /proc/mounts  will show the nfs monts parameters.


rw Tells that the file system is mounted in read/write mode


vers=3 This means we are using NFS version 3 for this mount


rsize=32768  & wsize=32768 This specifies the size of the data chunk that each RPC packet takes while reading and writing.


Tuning rsize & wsize must always be done by keeping the capacity of your network, as well as the processing and performance power of your client and the server.


timeo and retrans options in NFS


timeo option in NFS decides the time the client needs to wait before it comes to a conclusion that it must retransmit the packet.


And the second option retrans decides the total number of attempts made by the client, incase it gets a timeout (after waiting for timeo seconds you provided).


To disply current nfst statistics ## nfsstat -r


NFS threads that are available on the NFS server  ## ps aux | grep nfs


Q : What is Async and Sync in NFS mount ?


when the server receives an RPC operation for writing, it first converts that operation to a VFS(Virtual File System) operation to write the data in the underlying disk system.


As soon as the VFS handle's the write operation to the underlying disk, even before getting an acknowledgement that the write operation is completed, the Server becomes ready to accept further RPC write operations. In this case the NFS server increases the performance for writing.


But this method can sometimes cause data loss and corruption, because the NFS server starts to accept more write operations even before the underlying disk system has completed doing its job.


## sync option will do the reverse. In this case the server will reply only after a write operation has successfully completed.


Q: - How to check NFS server's version ?


cat /proc/mounts  can see from o/p " vers=3 "


Q: - What is the main difference between root_sqush and no_root_squash in NFS ?


root_squash will squash the root permissions for the client and denies root access to access/create files on NFS server as root, you get the non-root user permission


whereas no_root_squash will give you the root permission to access/ create files on a NFS Server.Default is root_squash.


Q: - What is rpc and its role in nfs ?


NFS Client/Server Operation Using Remote Procedure Calls (RPCs) ,  to route requests between clients and servers.


RPC-based services rely on portmap to make all connections with incoming client requests


Q: - what is iostat , describe its output and log files ?


iostat – Central Processing Unit (CPU) statistics and input/output statistics for devices and partitions.


iostat (input/output statistics) is a computer system monitor tool used to collect and show operating system storage input and output statistics.


It is often used to identify performance issues with storage devices or remote disks accessed over network file systems such as NFS.


iostat with -c arguments displays only CPU statistics as shown below.


iostat with -d arguments displays only disks I/O statistics of all partitions as shown.


device name arguments displays only disks I/O statistics for specific device only as shown.


[root@tecmint ~]# iostat -p sda


With -N (Uppercase) parameter displays only LVM statistics as shown.


[root@tecmint ~]# iostat -N


tin                 Shows the total number of characters read by the system for all TTYs.
tout                 Shows the total number of characters written by the system to all TTYs.
% user                 Shows the percentage of CPU utilization that occurred while executing at the user level (application).
% sys                 Shows the percentage of CPU utilization that occurred while executing at the system level (kernel).
% idle                 Shows the percentage of time that the CPU or CPUs were idle and the system did not have an outstanding disk I/O request.
% iowait         Shows the percentage of time that the CPU or CPUs were idle during which the system had an outstanding disk I/O request.
physc         Number of physical processors consumed, displayed only if the partition is running with shared processor.
% entc                 The percentage of entitled capacity consumed, displayed only if the partition is running with shared processor. Because the time base over which this data iscomputed can vary, the entitled capacity percentage can sometimes exceed 100%.


Q: - What is use of vmstat and explain its output & log files ?


This data provides an average view of virtual memory and system usage since the last reboot


procs -----------memory---------- ---swap-- -----io---- -system-- ----cpu----


you can observe page-ins and page-outs as they happen.


 Under Procs we have


       r: The number of processes waiting for run time or placed in run queue or are already executing (running)
       b: The number of processes in uninterruptible sleep. (b=blocked queue, waiting for resource (e.g. filesystem I/O blocked, inode lock))


 Under Memory we have:


swpd: shows how many blocks are swapped out to disk (paged). The amount of Virtual memory used.


 Under Swap we have:


si: Amount of memory swapped in from disk (/s). This shows page-ins
so: Amount of memory swapped to disk (/s). This shows page-outs.


 Under IO we have:


bi: Blocks received from block device - Read (like a hard disk)
bo: Blocks sent to a block device – Write


 Under System we have:


in: The number of interrupts per second, including the clock.
cs: The number of context switches per second.
Is CS is high then CPU usage will be high.


vmstat  reports  information about processes, memory, paging, block IO, traps, and cpu activity.


Q) How find hba card issue in command line in linux ?
Q: - What are the Logical Steps for installing Red Hat Cluster Suite ?


a) Configure Storage/udev/multipathing
b) Test file systems by mounting on both nodes
c) Install application on both nodes and copy required folders/data to shared
storage
d) Write the startup/shutdown/status scripts, if required (you can use standard sysv
inti scripts as well, if you application has one)
e) Mount the shared partition on node1 and test the app
f) Unmount shared partition from node1, mount in node2 and test the app
g) Test fencing from both nodes
h) install cman, rgmanager rpms
i) Ensure iptables and selinux do not interfere (setenforce 0 for selinux) 


######################################################################################


Cluster Questions:-


Q: - What is clustering and why we use clustering ?


 A cluster consists of two or more Real Computers referred to as nodes or members of a cluster. 
Clusters are usually deployed to improve performance and/or availability over that provided by a single computer, while typically being much more cost-effective than single computers of comparable speed or availability. 


Q: what is Multi-Site Virtual Cluster ( Geo Clusters  )?


A multi-site virtual cluster is an advanced cluster virtualization concept for greater scalability and flexibility, as well as sufficient usability. Beyond physical hardware limitations at one site, it aims to integrate distributed computational resources into a single cluster form by exploiting recent broad bandwidth backbone advances in WAN environments


Typically, multi-site environments are too far apart to support synchronous communication between the sites and synchronous data replication.


Q: - What are the different type of clusters ?


1. High Performance Clusters
2. High Availability Clusters
3. Load Balancing clusters
4. Storage Clusters 


Q: - What is High Performance Clusters ?


In High Performance Clusters Multiple nodes in cluster perform concurrent calculations. There are two key benefits of High Performance (or grid) computing :


Resilience --> As long as even a single member of a cluster is running, services continue to be provided by the cluster


Increased Capacity --> The more nodes added to the cluster, the more computing horsepower is available and therefore very powerful computers can be built using
commodity hardware


Q: - What is High Availabilty Clusters (HA) ?


High-availability clusters provide continuous availability of services by eliminating single points of failure and by failing over services from one cluster node to another in case a node becomes inoperative.High-availability clusters are sometimes referred to as fail-over clusters. 


Q: - What is Load Balancing Clusters ?


Load Balancing Clusters operate by having all workload come through one or more load balancing front-ends, which then distribute it to a collection of back end servers. If a node in a load-balancing cluster becomes inoperative, the load-balancing software detects the failure and redirects requests to other cluster nodes.
Eg: Red Hat Cluster Suite provides load- balancing through LVS (Linux Virtual Server).


Q: - What is Storage Clusters ?


Storage clusters provide a consistent file system image across servers in a cluster, allowing the servers to simultaneously read and write to a single shared file system.With a cluster-wide file system.
Red Hat Cluster Suite provides storage clustering through Red Hat GFS.


Q: - What is Active Passive and Active Active Terminology in HA Clusters ?


Active/Passive Terminology generally refers to fail-over clusters running only one service.


Q: - What are Clustering Hardware Requirements ?


Red Hat Certified Hardware capable of running the proposed OS (RHEL 5/6/7)
Ethernet Switch for Networking , Fencing Hardware, Shared Storage


Q: - What is fencing in clustering and why it is required ?


Fencing is used to avoid data inconsistencies in shared storage by fencing or cutting off a failed member, process of isolating a node of a computer cluster when the former is malfunctioning.Fencing is typically done  automatically, by cluster infrastructure such as shared disk file systems, in order to protect processes from other active nodes modifying the resources during node failures.


Fencing is required because it is impossible to distinguish between a real failure and a temporary hang. If the malfunctioning node is really down, then it cannot do any damage. However, because there is a possibility that a malfunctioning node could itself consider the rest of the cluster to be the one that is malfunctioning, a race condition could ensue, and cause data corruption. 


Resource fencing #  is the idea that if you know what resources a node might be using, then you can use some method of keeping it from accessing those resources. For example, FC switch in FC environment.


Node fencing # is the idea that one can keep a node from accessing all resources - without knowing what kind of resources it might be accessing, or how one might deny access to them.  A common way of doing this is to power off or reset the errant node or Trigger Kernel panic. 


Two-node mode: the voting algorithm is ignored, and whenever communication between nodes is lost, each node will just try to fence the other one. The fastest node wins. This is not ideal, because the fenced node may reboot, come back up, then start up a cluster on its own and fence the other node. This may result in a "reboot-and-fence loop".


Q: - what is Quorum ?


Quorum is a voting algorithm used by the cluster manager. A cluster can only function correctly if there is general agreement between the members about things. We say a cluster has 'quorum' if a majority of nodes are alive, communicating, and agree on the active cluster members. So in a thirteen-node cluster, quorum is only reached if seven or more nodes are communicating. If the seventh node dies, the cluster loses quorum and can no longer function. It's necessary for a cluster to maintain quorum to prevent 'splitbrain' problems 


Q: What is Quorum disk ?
    In case of a 2 node cluster, quorum disk acts as a tie-breaker and prevents split-brain issue
    If a node has access to network and quorum disk, it is active else can be fenced
    A Quorum disk, known as a qdisk is small partition on SAN storage used to enhance quorum,the quorum disk comprises a shared block device that allows concurrent read/write access by all nodes in a cluster.
        
There are a number of factors to consider when determining whether or not to include a quorum disk in your cluster. In most cases, a quorum is unnecessary and can lead to additional configuration complexity, increasing the likelihood that an incorrect setting might cause unexpected behaviour. Red Hat recommends that you only deploy quorum disk if absolutely necessary


Q: - What is Split Brain in clustering ?






A split-brain condition is the result of a Cluster Partition, where each side believes the other is dead, and then proceeds to take over resources as though the other side no longer owned any resources. It can cause destroying shared disk data.


Q: - What is multipathing in clustering ?


Clusters should be designed with NSPOF(No Single Point Of Failure) considerations. That means that there should be no single device such that it's failure could impact the Cluster. As an example, when using Fibre HBAs, two HBAs must be put into each clustered Node to guard against card failure, link failure etc. Similarly, two Fibre Switches should be used to prevent cluster services disruption int he event of the switch failure. If iSCSI protocol is used to access the shared storage, then two network cards should be used for this purpose. Each network card should have a unique IP address and should be connected via different switched to the iSCSI Storage.


Q: - What is Heartbeat HA ?


Heartbeat provides the basic functions required by any HA system such as starting and stopping resources, monitoring the availability of the systems in the cluster, and transferring ownership of a shared IP address between nodes in the cluster. Heartbeat is a software solution that monitors the health of a particular service (or services) through either a serial line or Ethernet interface or both. It is a vital component of the whole Linux-HA package. 


Q: - What is DRBD ?


DRBD stands for Distributed Remote Block Device  provides data mirroring between two servers on a LAN or WAN.DRBD currently supports one to one replication (i.e. two node clusters, where one node acts as a standby). It is anticipated that DRBD will support one to many replication in the near future. DRBD can be used to provide data replication between nodes for nearly any application (E.g. Apache, Samba, NFS, Oracle and so on), as well as being used as just an offsite data backup.


Q: - What are the configurations files of Heartbeat cluster ?


/etc/ha.d/ha.cf the global cluster configuration file.
/etc/ha.d/authkeys a file containing keys for mutual node authentication.


Q: - What are the contents of authkeys file in heartbeat cluster ?


etc/ha.d/authkeys contains pre-shared secrets used for mutual cluster node authentication. It should only be readable by root and follows this format:


auth <num>
<num> <algorithm> <secret>


num is a simple key index, starting with 1. Usually, you will only have one key in your authkeys file. algorithm is the signature algorithm being used. We may use either md5 or sha1; secret is the actual authentication key.


#############################################################################################


Q: - What is a Veritas Cluster server ?


VERITAS Cluster Server (VCS) from Symantec connects multiple, independent systems into a management framework for increased availability. Each system, or node, runs its own operating system and cooperates at the software level to form a cluster. VCS links commodity hardware with intelligent software to provide application failover and control.


Q: - What are types of cluster ?


– High Availability (HA) clusters
– Parallel processing clusters
– Load balancing clusters
- High Performance Computing (HPC) clusters


VCS is primarily an HA cluster


Q: - What are VCS User Account Privileges ?


Cluster Administrator:- Full Privileges


Cluster Operator:- All cluster, service group, and resources-level operations.


Cluster Guest  :- Read-only access: new users created as cluster guest accounts by default.


Group Administrator :- All service group operations for a specified service group,except deleting service group.


Group Operator :- Bring service groups and resources online and take offline, temporarily freeze or unfreeze service groups 


Q: - What are Switchover and Failover in Veritas Cluster ?


Switchover: A switchover is an orderly shutdown of an application and it’s supporting resources on one server and a controlled startup on another server.Switchover is done manually by the system administrator. A switchover might be performed to do periodic maintenance or to upgrade software on the cluster nodes.


Failover : A failover is similar to a switchover, except the ordered shutdown of applications on the original node may not be possible, so the services are started on another node.


Q: - Definition of a Service Group in Veritas Cluster ?


A service group is a virtual container that enables VCS to manage an application service as a unit.All components required to provide the service, and the relationships between these components, are defined within the service group.Service groups have attributes that define its behavior, such as where it can start and run. 


Q: - What are Service Group Types ?


Failover:
– The service group can be online on only one cluster system at a time.
– VCS migrates the service group at the administrator’s request and in response to faults.


Parallel:
The service group can be online on multiple cluster systems simultaneously.
An example is Oracle Real Application Clusters (RAC). 


Q: - How to specify Service Group Dependencies in veritas Cluster ?


We can use service group dependencies to specify most application relationships according to these four criteria:
– Category: Online or offline
– Location: Local, remote, or global
– Startup behaviour: Parent or child
– Failover behaviour: Soft, firm, or hard


We can specify combinations of these characteristics to determine how dependencies affect service group behaviour.


Q: - Define the Resources in veritas cluster ?


Resources are VCS objects that correspond to the hardware or software components of an application service.


Each resource must have a unique name throughout the cluster. Choosing names that reflect the service group name makes it easy to identify all the         resources in that group, for example, WebIP in the WebSG group.
Resources are always contained within service groups.
Resource categories include: Persistent &  Non-persistent


Q: - What are On-Off & Persistent Resources ?


On-Off:- VCS starts and stops On-Off resources as required. For example, VCS imports a disk group when required, and deports it when it is no longer needed.


Persistent:- These resources cannot be brought online or taken offline. For example, a network interface card cannot be started or stopped, but it is required to configure an IP address. A Persistent resource has an operation value of none. VCS monitors Persistent resources to ensure their status and operation. Failure of a Persistent resource triggers a service group fail-over


Q: - What are Agents in Veritas cluster or VCS cluster ?


Agents are multi-threaded processes that provide the logic to manage resources. VCS has one agent per resource type. The agent monitors all resources of that type; for example, a single IP agent manages all IP resources. When the agent is started, it obtains the necessary configuration information from VCS. It then periodically monitors the resources, and updates VCS with the resource status. An agent typically brigs resources online, take resources offline and monitors resources to determine their state.


Q: - How VCS Controls Resources ?


Each resource type has a corresponding agent process that manages all resources of that type.


    Agents have one or more entry points that perform a set of actions on resources.
    Each system runs one agent for each active resource type


Q: - How Cluster Communicate ?


A cluster interconnect provides a communication channel between cluster nodes.
Where :
LLT :- Low-Latency Transport  Main purpose is to transmit heartbeat
GAB :- Group Membership Services/Atomic Broadcast  determine the state of a node with the heartbeat send over LLTs heartbeat will send every 5 sec
HAD :- The High Availability Daemon   HAD maintain the resource configuration & state info


Q: - What are the main functions of LLT,GAB & HAD in veritas cluster ?


Low-Latency Transport(LLT) :-  
Is responsible for sending heartbeat messages 
Transports cluster communication traffic to every active system
Balances traffic load across multiple network links
Maintains the communication link state
Is a non routable protocol
Runs on an Ethernet network


Group Membership Services/Atomic Broadcast (GAB) :-
Performs two functions:


 – Manages cluster membership; referred to as GAB membership.
 – Sends and receives atomic broadcasts of configuration information
        Is a proprietary broadcast protocol
        Uses LLT as its transport mechanism


The High Availability Daemon (HAD) VCS engine :-


– Runs on each system in the cluster
– Maintains configuration and state information for all cluster resources
– Manages all agents


The hashadow daemon monitors HAD. 


Q: - What are Failover Policies in Veritas Cluster ?


– Priority                : The system with the lowest priority number in the list is selected (default).
– RoundRobin        : The system with the least number of active service groups is selected.
– Load                        : The system with greatest available capacity is selected.


Example configuration: hagrp –modify groupname FailOverPolicy Load


########################################################################################################
######Redhat Cluster Sute:- #####


9. Starting the cluster software.


To start the cluster software on a member, type the following commands in this order:


a. service ccsd start
b. service lock_gulmd start or service cman start according to the type of lock
manager used
c. service fenced start (DLM clusters only) Distributed lock manager
d. service clvmd start
e. service gfs start, For Red Hat GFS
f. service rgmanager start


To stop the cluster software on a member, type the following commands in this order:


service rgmanager stop
service gfs stop, For Red Hat GFS
service clvmd stop
service fenced stop (DLM clusters only)
service lock_gulmd stop or service cman stop according to the type of lock
manager used
f. service ccsd stop


Q: - what is cman in redhat cluster 


CMAN is Cluster management manages cluster quorum and cluster membership. Its work on RHEL. CMAN is a distributed cluster manager and runs in each cluster node; cluster management is distributed across all nodes in the cluster.


CMAN keeps track of cluster quorum by monitoring the count of cluster nodes. If more than half the nodes are active, the cluster has quorum. If half the nodes (or fewer) are active, the cluster does not have quorum, and all cluster activity is stopped. Cluster quorum prevents the occurrence of a "split-brain" condition — a condition where two instances of the same cluster are running. A split-brain condition would allow each cluster instance to access cluster resources without knowledge of the other cluster instance, resulting in corrupted cluster integrity.


Q: - what is ricci and luci in redhat cluster ? OR Q. What is Conga?


A. Conga is an agent/server architecture for remote administration of systems.


The agent component is called "ricci", and the server is called "luci".
One luci server can communicate with many multiple ricci agents installed on systems.
The luci server is accessed via a browser using https. 


Q: - Define the role of Luci and Ricci in redhat cluster suite ?


Conga is an agent/server architecture for remote administration of systems. The agent component is called "ricci", and the server is called "luci". 


One luci server can communicate with many multiple ricci agents installed on systems. When a system is added to a luci server to be administered, authentication is done once.


No authentication is necessary from then on. Through the UI provided by luci, users can configure and administer storage and cluster behavior on remote systems. Communication between luci and ricci is done via XML. 


Cluster Administration


1  What is a Cluster and types ?


    A cluster is two or more computers (called as nodes or members) that works together to perform a taks.
    Storage
    High Availability
    Load Balancing
    High Performance


3   What is CMAN ?


    CMAN is Cluster Manager. It manages cluster quorum and cluster membership.
    CMAN runs on each node of a cluster


4    What is Cluster Quorum ?


    Quorum is a voting algorithm used by CMAN.
    CMAN keeps a track of cluster quorum by monitoring the count of number of nodes in cluster.
    If more than half of members of a cluster are in active state, the cluster is said to be in Quorum
    If half or less than half of the members are not active, the cluster is said to be down and all cluster activities will be stopped
    Quorum is defined as the minimum set of hosts required in order to provide service and is used to prevent split-brain situations.
    
5  What is split-brain ?


    It is a condition where two instances of the same cluster are running and trying to access same resource at the same time, resulting in corrupted cluster integrity
    Cluster must maintain quorum to prevent split-brain issues




7   What is RGManager ?


Responsible to relocate the service in clsuter


    RGManager manages and provides failover capabilities for collections of cluster resources called services, resource groups, or resource trees.
    In the event of a node failure, RGManager will relocate the clustered service to another node with minimal service disruption. You can also restrict services to certain nodes, such as restricting  httpd to one group of nodes while  mysql can be restricted to a separate set of nodes.
    When the cluster membership changes, openais tells the cluster that it needs to recheck it’s resources. This causes rgmanager, the resource group manager, to run. It will examine what changed and then will start, stop, migrate or recover cluster resources as needed.
    Within rgmanager, one or more resources are brought together as a service. This service is then optionally assigned to a failover domain, an subset of nodes that can have preferential ordering.


9    How to manually fence an inactive node ?


    # fence_ack_manual –n <node2>


10  How to see shared IP address (Cluster Resource) if ipconfig doesn’t show it


    # ip addr list


11  What is DLM ?


    A lock manager is a traffic cop who controls access to resources in the cluster  lock management is distributed across all nodes in the cluster. GFS2 and CLVM use locks from the lock manager.


12  What is Conga, Luci, Ricci ?


    This is a comprehensive user interface for installing, configuring, and managing Red Hat High Availability Add-On.
        
    Luci — This is the application server that provides the user interface for Conga. It allows users to manage cluster services. 
        
    Ricci — This is a service daemon that manages distribution of the cluster configuration. Users pass configuration details using the Luci interface, and the configuration is loaded in to corosync for distribution to cluster nodes. Luci is accessible only among cluster members.


13  What is OpenAis or Corosync ?


    OpenAIS is the heart of the cluster. All other computers operate though this component. In Red Hat clusters, openais is configured via the central cluster.conf file. 


14   What is ToTem ?


    The totem protocol defines message passing within the cluster and it is used by openais. A token is passed around all the nodes in the cluster, and the timeout in fencing is actually a token timeout. The counter, then, is the number of lost tokens that are allowed before a node is considered dead.


15   What is CLVM ?


    CLVM is ideal in that by using DLM, the distributed lock manager, it won’t allow access to cluster members outside of openais’s closed process group, which, in turn, requires quorum.
    It is ideal because it can take one or more raw devices, known as “physical volumes”, or simple as PVs, and combine their raw space into one or more “volume groups”, known as VGs. These volume groups then act just like a typical hard drive and can be “partitioned” into one or more “logical volumes”, known as LVs. These LVs are where Xen’s domU virtual machines will exist and where we will create our GFS2 clustered file system.


16  What is GFS2 filesystem ?


        GFS2 is a shared file system used by Red Hat Cluster node member simultaneously. GFS2 allows all nodes to have direct concurrent access to the same shared block storage. GFS2 uses DLM or Distributed Lock Management to achieve this.
    The major difference is that it and clvmd use the cluster’s distributed locking mechanism provided by the dlm_controld daemon. 


17  What is the importance of DLM ?


    One of the major roles of a cluster is to provide distributed locking on clustered storage. In fact, storage software can not be clustered without using DLM, as provided by the dlm_controld daemon and using openais’s virtual synchrony via CPG.
    Through DLM, all nodes accessing clustered storage are guaranteed to get POSIX locks, called plocks, in the same order across all nodes. Both CLVM and GFS2 rely on DLM, though other clustered storage, like OCFS2, use it as well.


18  What is CCS_TOOL ?


    we can use ccs_tool, the “cluster configuration system (tool)”, to push the new cluster.conf to the other node and upgrade the cluster’s version in one shot.
    ccs_tool update /etc/cluster/cluster.conf


19  What is CMAN_TOOL ?


    It is a Cluster Manger tool, it can be used to view nodes and status of cluster
    Cman_tool nodes
    Cman_tool status


20  What is clusstat ?


    Clusstat is used to see what state the cluster’s resources are in


21   What is clusvadm ?


    Clusvadm is a tool to manage resource in a cluster
    clusvcadm -e <service> -m <node>: Enable the <service> on the specified <node>. When a <node> is not specified, the local node where the command was run is assumed.
    clusvcadm -d <service> -m <node>: Disable the <service>.
    clusvcadm -l <service>: Locks the <service> prior to a cluster shutdown. The only action allowed when a <service> is frozen is disabling it. This allows you to stop the <service> so that rgmanager doesn’t try to recover it (restart, in our two services). Once quorum is dissolved and the cluster is shut down, the service is unlocked and returns to normal operation next time the node regains quorum.
    clusvcadm -u <service>: Unlocks a <service>, should you change your mind and decide not to stop the cluster.


22  What is Luci_admin init ?


    This command is run to create Luci Admin user and set password for it
    Service luci start, chckconfig luci on
    Default port for Luci web server is 8084


1. What is CMAN ?


      CMAN is  ( Cluster Manager )a component of the cluster that handles communications between nodes in the cluster. 
          It manages cluster quorum and cluster membership. CMAN runs on each node of a cluster.


2. What is RGManager ?


RGManager manages and provides failover capabilities for collections of cluster resources called services, resource groups, or resource trees.


In the event of a node failure, RGManager will relocate the clustered service to another node with minimal service disruption. You can also restrict services to certain nodes, such as restricting  httpd to one group of nodes while  mysql can be restricted to a separate set of nodes.


3. What is Cluster Quorum in Redhat Cluster ?


    Quorum is a voting algorithm used by CMAN.
    CMAN keeps a track of cluster quorum by monitoring the count of number of nodes in cluster.
    If more than half of members of a cluster are in active state, the cluster is said to be in Quorum
    If half or less than half of the members are not active, the cluster is said to be down and all cluster activities will be stopped
    Quorum is defined as the minimum set of hosts required in order to provide service and is used to prevent split-brain situations.
        
        8 .What can cause a node to leave the cluster ?


A node may leave the cluster for many reasons. Among them:
    Shutdown: cman_tool leave was run on this node
    Killed by another node. The node was killed with either by cman_tool kill or qdisk.
    Panic: cman failed to allocate memory for a critical data structure or some other very bad internal failure.
    Removed: Like 1, but the remainder of the cluster can adjust quorum downwards to keep working.
    Membership Rejected: The node attempted to join a cluster but it's
    cluster.conf file did not match that of the other nodes. 
    Inconsistent cluster view: This is usually indicative of a bug but it can also happen if the network is extremely unreliable.
    Missed too many heartbeats: This means what it says. All nodes are expected to broadcast a heartbeat every 5 seconds (by default).


9 . How can I define a two-node cluster if a majority is needed to reach quorum?


We had to allow two-node clusters, so we made a special exception to the quorum rules. There is a special setting "two_node" in the /etc/cluster.conf file that looks like this:


<cman expected_votes="1" two_node="1"/>
This will allow one node to be considered enough to establish a quorum. Note that if you configure a quorum disk/partition, you don't want two_node="1".
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Postfix Mail Server Setup:-
#############################################################################
CentOS - Email - Mail Server Setup:


Note: The articles in this section are specifically aimed at users running CentOS on their slice. They are designed for users who have multiple email users and domains, however, they can be used for a single domain as well.


CentOS - Email - Preparing the Slice: It is vital that the Slice has the basics such as the hostname and Reverse DNS correctly set before we configure any sort of mail service.


CentOS - Email - Setting a Sender Policy Framework (SPF) Record: Setting the correct SPF records for your domain's mail server can help in reducing spammers from using your domain for nefarious purposes!


CentOS - Mail Server - Installation: Now that we've setup the Slice basics, we can move onto installing Postfix. This MTA (Mail Transfer Agent) is the base package for all of our mail needs.


CentOS - Mail Server - Basic Settings in Main.cf: Let's move on and see what the main.cf file contains and how we can change some of the settings for easier administration.


CentOS - Mail Server - Secure Connection, Configuring Saslauthd: Now we need to setup and configure saslauthd to allow us to utilize a secure connection to our mail server.


CentOS - Mail Server - Secure Connection, Creating the SSL Certificate: Let's create a self-signed certificate for our Postfix connections.


CentOS - Mail Server - Secure Connection, Configuring Postfix: Now that more security aspects are in please, we can move onto configuring Postfix to use them.


CentOS - Mail Server - Dovecot Installation: To enable POP and IMAP (along with secure POP and IMAP) we need to install and configure Dovecot.


CentOS - Mail Server - Opening Ports in the Firewall: The base Slice setup had minimal ports open - let's open the relevant ports in our iptables configuration for our mail server.


CentOS - Mail Server - Adding Domains and Users: Now that we have the basic mail server setup, we need to add our domains and users..




Q: - Tell me about latest Version of Postfix on which u have worked ?


postfix 2.6


Q: - What are the important files for postfix server ?


/etc/postfix/main.cf
/etc/postfix/access
/etc/postfix/aliases


Q: - Where postfix mail server logs created ?


/var/log/maillog 
Q: - by using postconf command, how you will set fully qualified hostname (mail4.test.com)?


# postconf -e myhostname=mail.example.com


The -e option tells postconf to edit the configuration with the parameters and values specified.


Q: - Which command checks for configuration problems?


# postfix check


Q: - How you will see the queue of postfix server?


#postqueue -p


Q: - How can I clear postfix mail server queue?


# postsuper -d ALL


Q: - How you will reload the postfix queue?


# postsuper -r ALL


Q: - Can postfix server configured with MySQL database?


Yes


Q: - which command is used to find out that postfix is complied with mysql or not?


# postconf -m


nis
regexp
environ
mysql
btree
unix
hash
Q: - Explain the working of local mail submission for postfix?


When a local email message enters the postfix system. Local messages are deposited into the maildrop directory of the Postfix queue by the postdrop command, usually through the sendmail compatibility program. The pickup daemon reads the message from the queue and feeds it to the cleanup daemon. The cleanup daemon processes all inbound mail and notifies the queue manager after it has placed the cleaned-up message into the incoming queue. The queue manager then invokes the appropriate delivery agent to send the message to its next hop or ultimate destination.


Q: - What are the benefits of using SMTP AUTH?


- Using SMTP AUTH we can make it possible for clients, colleagues, and ourselves to relay messages from everywhere in the world using only one (our) SMTP server.


Q: - Explain smtpd_timeout Parameter?


The smtpd_timeout parameter limits the amount of time Postfix waits for an SMTP client request after sending a response. This allows the Postfix administrator to quickly disconnect SMTP servers that “camp out” on the SMTP connection, utilizing system resources for the SMTP connection without actually sending a message.


smtpd_timeout = value
By default, Postfix will assume the value is in seconds.


 Q:12 How to check postfix configuration from the command line ?


Ans: 'postconf -n'   


 Q:16 What is relay host in postfix ?


Ans: Relay host is the smtp address , if mentioned in postfix config file , then all the incoming mails be relayed through smtp server. 


 Q:1 What is postfix and default port used for postfix ?


Ans: Postfix is a open source MTA (Mail Transfer agent) which is used to route & deliver emails. Default port for postfix is 25.


Q:2 What is the difference between Postfix & Sendmail ?


Ans:  Postfix uses a modular approach and is composed of multiple independent executables. Sendmail has a more monolithic design utilizing a single always running daemon.


 Q:3 What is MTA and it’s role in mailing system ?


Ans: MTA Stands for Mail Transfer Agent.MTA receives and delivers email. Determines message routing and possible address rewriting. Locally delivered  messages are handed off to an MDA for final delivery. Examples Qmail, Postfix, Sendmail


Q:4 What is MDA ?


Ans: MDA stands for Mail Delivery Agent. MDA is a Program that handles final delivery of messages for a system's local recipients. MDAs can often filter or categorize messages upon delivery. An MDA might also determine that a message must be forwarded to another email address. Example Procmail


Q:5 What is MUA ?


Ans: MUA stands for Mail User Agent. MUA is aEmail client software used to compose, send, and retrieve email messages. Sends messages through an MTA. Retrieves messages from a mail store either directly or through a POP/ IMAP server. Examples Outlook, Thunderbird, Evolution.


Q:6 What is the use of  postmaster account in Mailserver ?


Ans: An email administrator is commonly referred to as a postmaster. An individual with postmaster responsibilities makes sure that the mail system is working correctly, makes configuration changes, and adds/removes email accounts, among other things. You must have a postmaster alias at all domains for which you handle email that directs messages to the correct person or persons .


 Q:7 What are the important daemons in postfix ?


Ans : Below are the lists of impportant daemons in postfix mail server :


    master :The master daemon is the brain of the Postfix mail system. It spawns all other daemons.
    smtpd: The smtpd daemon (server) handles incoming connections.
    smtp :The smtp client handles outgoing connections.
    qmgr :The qmgr-Daemon is the heart of the Postfix mail system. It processes and controls all messages in the mail queues.
    local : The local program is Postfix’ own local delivery agent. It stores messages in mailboxes.


 Q:8 What are the configuration files of postfix server ?


Ans: There are two main Configuration files of postfix :


    /etc/postfix/main.cf : This file holds global configuration options. They will be applied to all instances of a daemon, unless they are overridden in master.cf
    /etc/postfix/master.cf  : This file defines runtime environment for daemons attached to services. Runtime behavior defined in main.cf may be overridden by setting service specific options.


         Basically postfix consists of four different types of queues such as


* active queue – it is limited size queue which contains mails to be sent out.


* deferred queue – mails that cannot be delivered will stored in the deferred queue.


* incoming queue – mails from network will first enter in to incoming queue and after some cleanup it will give it to active queue for mail delivery.


* maildrop queue – it consists of locally posted mails.


Let us see now various queue operations.


Flushing a mail queue:


In order a flush a mail queue, run the following command


# postfix flush


or


# postfix -f


or


# postqueue -f
        
Moving mails to hold queue:


Sometimes there may be a situation that we need move all mails to hold queue and then release at later time for resending. So run the following command to move the mails from deferred, active to hold queue.


# postsuper -h ALL


Here it moves all mails on active, incoming and deferred queue to hold queue.


Also you can move the mails from a particular queue to hold queue by using the following command.


# postsuper -h ALL deferred


To release all the messages from hold queue, run the following command


# postsuper -H ALL


Requeue mails in a mail queue:


In order to requeue the mails in a mail queue, run the following command


# postsuper -r ALL


By default it will requeue all the mails in active, deferred, hold and incoming queue, then it place all those mails to maildrop queue for delivery.


Deleting mails from postfix queue:


To delete a mail from particular mail queue, then run the following command


# postsuper -d ALL deferred


or


# postsuper -d ALL active


The above command will delete mails from the specified queue.


DNS Server:-
#########################################################################
Q: - which are the important configuration files for DNS server ?


BIND uses /etc/named.conf as its main configuration file, the /etc/rndc.conf file as the
configuration file for name server control utility rndc, and the /var/named/ directory for zone files and the like.


Q: - What is BIND ? & What is the role of DNS ?


BIND stands for Berkeley Internet Name Domain which is the most commonly used Domain Name System (DNS) server on the Internet.


A DNS server, or name server, is used to resolve an IP address to a host name or vice versa.


Q: - On which version of bind u have worked ?


BIND 9


Q: - On which port DNS server works ?


Ans: port 53 by default. Incoming and outgoing packets should be allowed on port 53


Q: - What is round robin DNS?


Round robin DNS is usually used for balancing the load of geographically distributed Web servers.


 For example, a company has one domain name and three identical home pages residing on three servers with three different IP addresses. When one user accesses the home page it will be sent to the first IP address. The second user who accesses the home page will be sent to the next IP address, and the third user will be sent to the third IP address.
 
 Q: - What is Name Server?


A name server keeps information for the translation of domain names to IP addresses   and IP addresses to domain names. The name server is a program that performs the translation at the request of a resolver or another name server.


Q: - What is Primary name server or primary master server?


Primary name server/primary master is the main data source for the zone. It is the authoritative server for the zone. This server acquires data about its zone from databases saved on a local disk. The primary server must be published as an authoritative name server for the domain in the SOA resource record, while the primary master server does not need to be published.


Q: - What is Secondary name server/slave name server?


Secondary name server/slave name server acquires data about the zone by copying the data from the primary name server (respectively from the master server) at regular time intervals. It makes no sense to edit these databases on the secondary name servers, although they are saved on the local server disk because they will be rewritten during further copying.


Q: - what is Root name server?


Root name server is an authoritative name server for the root domain (for the dot). Each root name server is a primary server, which differentiates it from other name servers.


Q: - what is Stealth name server?


Stealth name server is a secret server. This type of name server is not published anywhere. It is only known to the servers that have its IP address statically listed in their configuration. It is an authoritative server. It acquires the data for the zone with the help of a zone transfer. It can be the main server for the zone. Stealth servers can be used as a local backup if the local servers are unavailable.


Q: - What do you mean by "Resource Records"?


Information on domain names and their IP addresses, as well as all the other information distributed via DNS is stored in the memory of name servers as Resource Records (RR).


Q: - Explain "TTL"?


Time to live. A 32-bit number indicating the time the particular RR can be kept valid in a server cache. When this time expires, the record has to be considered invalid. The value 0 keeps nonauthoritative servers from saving the RR to their cache memory.


Q: - Tell me 5 Types of DNS records?


A, NS, CNAME, SOA, PTR, MX.


Q:- explain "SOA Record"?


The Start of Authority (SOA) record determines the name server that is an authoritative source of information for the particular domain. There is always only one SOA record in the file, and it is placed at the beginning of the file of authoritative resource records.
Q: - what is "NS Record"


NS Records are name server records.


A NS record or (name server record) tells recursive nameserverswhich name servers areauthoritative fora zone.  Recursive nameservers look at the NS records to work out who to ask next when resolving a name.


Q: - what is "A Record"


A (Address) records assign IP addresses to domain names of computers. The IP address cannot have a dot at the end.


Q: - Explain "CNAME Record"?


Synonyms to domain names can be created using CNAME records. This is often referred to as 'creating aliases for computer names'.


Q: - what are "MX Records"?


MX records specify the mailing server of the domain. An MX record shows to which computer a mail of a particular domain should be sent. 


Q: - Explain "PTR Records"?


A Pointer Record (PTR) is used to translate an IP address into a domain name.


Q: - What is Dynamic DNS?


Dynamic DNS a method of keeping a domain name linked to a changing IP address as not all computers use static IP addresses.


Q: - What are the types of virtual hosts ?


name-based and IP-based.
Name-based virtual host means that multiple names are running on each IP address.
IP-based virtual host means that a different IP address exists for each website served. Most configurations are named-based because it only requires one IP address.


################Apache###############


Q: - How to restart Apache web server ?


service httpd restart


Q: - How to check the version of Apache server ?


rpm -qa |grep httpd


Q: - What is meaning of "Listen" in httpd.conf file ?


Port number on which to listen for nonsecure (http) transfers.


Q: - What is DocumentRoot ?


it is a location of files which are accessible by clients. By default,  /var/www/html/ directory.


Q: - On which port Apache server works ?


http - port 80
https - port 443


Q: - On which version of apache you have worked ? 


httpd-2.2.3


Q: - What do you mean by a valid ServerName directive?


The DNS system is used to associate IP addresses with domain names. The value of ServerName is returned when the server generates a URL. If you are using a certain domain name, you must make sure that it is included in your DNS system and will be available to clients visiting your site.


Q: - What is the main difference between <Location> and <Directory> sections?


Directory sections refer to file system objects; Location sections refer to elements in the address bar of the Web page


What is the difference between a restart and a graceful restart of a web server?


During a normal restart, the server is stopped and then started, causing some requests to be lost. A graceful restart allows Apache children to continue to serve their current requests until they can be replaced with children running the new configuration.


Q: - What is the use of mod_perl module?


mod_perl scripting module to allow better Perl script performance and easy integration with the Web server.


Q: - If you have added “loglevel Debug” in httpd.conf file, than what will happen?


 It will give you more information in the error log in order to debug a problem.
 
 Q: - If you have only one IP address, but you want to host two web sites on your server. What will you do?
In this case I will use Name Based Virtual hosting.


ServerName 10.111.203.25
NameVirtualHost *:80


<VirtualHost *:80>
ServerName web1.test.com
DocumentRoot /var/www/html/web1
</VirtualHost>


<VirtualHost *:80>
ServerName web2.test2.com
DocumentRoot /var/www/html/web2
</VirtualHost>


Q: - Can I serve content out of a directory other than the DocumentRoot directory?


Yes, by using “Alias” we can do this.


Q: - If you have to more than one URL map to the same directory but you don't have multiple Alias directives. What you will do?


In this case I will use “AliasMatch” directives.


The AliasMatch directive allows you to use regular expressions to match arbitrary patterns in URLs and map anything matching the pattern to the desired URL.


Q: - How you will put a limit on uploads on your web server?


This can be achieved by LimitRequestBody directive.


<Directory "/var/www/html/data_uploads">
LimitRequestBody 100000
</Directory>


Here I have put limit of 100000 Bytes




How Get more information about driver ?
Ans: modinfo <device na,e >e1000


eg : modinfo e1000


How show the status of modules in the Linux Kernel ?


Ans : lsmod


How to  List or display loaded modules ?


Ans : less /proc/modules


Finding more info about any module or driver ?


Ans : # modinfo driver-Name-Here
# modinfo thermal_sys
# modinfo e1000e
# modinfo 8139too


How to load a kernel module automatically at boot time ?
Ans : Add the details to vi /etc/modules.conf


 how do we check to know what modules are available to add on a existing system?
cd to /lib/modules/$(uname -r) directory and you can see the list of available modules (run as root):


cd /lib/modules/$(uname -r)
ls -l
The following will list all drives


find /lib/modules/$(uname -r) -type f -iname "*.ko"


How to find Ethernet network interface card information in Linux ? And firmware information ?


Ans : ethtool eth0 , ethtool -i eth0


To find factory-default MAC address information ?
Ans : ethtool -p eth0


To show detailed vendor information of your NIC, run the following ?
Ans : lshw -class network


To find kernel module of nic card ?


Ans: lspci -v | grep Ethernet -A 20


 find how many network connections(network cables are connected to your machine) are active i.e. link is up ?
Ans : ip link show


How can we find network cared driver details in Linux? 
Ans : ethtool -i wlan0


You can also get driver name from config file:


# grep eth0 /etc/modules.conf




lspci command : List all PCI devices.
lshw command : List all hardware.
dmidecode command : List all hardware data from BIOS.
ifconfig command : Outdated network config utility.
ip command : Recommended new network config utility.


How to check HBA driver, firmware and boot image info on Linux ?
# modinfo qla2xxx | grep version
version:        8.04.00.08.06.4-k


Use systool to get HBA driver info


# systool -c scsi_host -v -d host5 | grep driver_version
 driver_version      = "8.04.00.08.06.4-k"


Get Firmware info


 Use systool to get HBA firmware


# systool -c scsi_host -v -d host1 | grep fw_version
    84xx_fw_version     = ""
    fw_version          = "5.08.00 (90d5)"
cat /sys/class/scsi_host/host1/optrom_fw_version
cat /sys/class/scsi_host/host1/fw_version


Check if the drivers for these HBAs are loaded in the kernel. ?
Ans : # lsmod | grep qla2xxx
 modprobe -v qla2xxx


To find hba host : # systool -c fc_host


The -v option gives you detailed output
# systool -c fc_host -v host3


To check the HBA cards installed on your system, check lspci


root@linux:~ # lspci | grep -i fibre


You can query various information using systool


root@linux:~ # systool -av -c fc_host


Checking numerous status. Example shown below is a different server


root@linux:~ # systool -c scsi_host -v -d host1
Or you can query each attribute issuing cat /sys/class/scsi_host/hostX/<attribute>


Model name


root@linux:~ # cat /sys/class/scsi_host/host0/model*name
LP10000


Model description


root@linux:~ # cat /sys/class/scsi_host/host0/model*desc
Emulex LP10000 2Gb PCI-X Fibre Channel Adapter
Firmware revision


root@linux:~ # cat /sys/class/scsi_host/host0/fwrev
Driver version


root@linux:~ # lspci -v | grep -i fibre -A11 | grep driver


Why multipath marked a SAN LUN subpath as active/faulty where as it's visible to system?
Ans: 


 \_ 0:0:0:1 sda 8:0   [active][faulty]   <---
sda is marked as active/faulty:


How to migrate LVM disk into new server ?


Ans: 1. Unmount the file system 


2.Mark the volume group inactive 
Marking the volume group inactive removes it from the kernel and prevents any further activity on it.


# vgchange -an appvg
3. Export the volume group 


It is now must to export the volume group. This prevents it from being accessed on the old server and prepares it to be removed.


# vgexport appvg


4. Import the volume group 


When it plugged into the new server, it becomes /dev/sdc (depends).


# pvscan


We can now import the volume group (which also activates it) and mount the file system.
# vgimport appvg
Volume group "vg" successfully imported




$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$### Perfomance Issue ###$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$


http://www.lazysystemadmin.com/2011/07/troubeshooting-linux-server-performance.html


http://www.unixarena.com/2013/11/linux-performance-issues-troubleshooting.html


https://rimuhosting.com/knowledgebase/linux/misc/troubleshooting-performance-issues




How do you troubleshoot these server performance issues in Linux? 


There can be a number of reasons for high load on the server such as, 
        Inadequate RAM/CPU
        Slower Hard disk drives
        Unoptimized software applications / Modules
 In this article, I am going to explain you  to identify what's the bottleneck and where do you need to focus on.


1) First, Lets check the server Load: uptime


understand what it shows.


15:33:35 up 180 days, 5:17, 6 users, load average: 8.76, 6.77, 5.42


The first part (8.76) shows the load average in the last 5 mins, while the second (6.77) and third (5.42) shows averages of 10 and 15 mins respectively. It's probably a spike here, lets look further.


The load averages aren't so accurate after all and cannot always be the ultimate deciding factor.




2) Check for RAM Memory:


Note: Perform the checks multiple times, to reach a fine conclusion.  


# free -m


The output should look similar to this:


# free -m
total used free shared buffers cached
Mem: 1963 1912 50 0 28 906
-/+ buffers/cache: 978 985
Swap: 1027 157 869


Have a look at the buffers/cache that says "985" MB of RAM is still free in buffers. you're pretty fine on RAM.


Keep in mind, higher SWAP usage, slow down your system.


At least 200MB available in buffers and not more than 200MB swap usage is Good.


3)  Check if I/O (input/output) usage is excessive


If there are too many read/write requests on a single hard disk drive, it will become slow and you'll have to upgrade it to a faster drive (with more RPM and cache). The alternate option is splitting the load onto multiple drives by spreading the data by using RAID. To identify, if your I/O issues:


# top


Read the output under "iowait" section (In some cases %wa), for each CPU. In ideal situations, it should be near to 0%. If you see higher value here, sometimes  at time of a load spike, consider rechecking these values multiple times to reach a fine conclusion. Anything above 15% is bad. Next, you can check the speed of your hard disk drive to see if it's really lagging:


4) Check the CPU consumption:


# top


Check the top output to find out if you're using too much CPU power. You should be looking the value under idle besides each CPU entry. Anything below 45% is something you should really worry about. Look for %sy, %us, %id, %wa values as well as a next step. In the Top output you can determine which process is using higher CPU.




Troubleshooting performance issues in Linux
Performance problems are caused by bottlenecks in one or more hardware subsystems, depending on the profile of resource usage on your system. Some elements to consider:


buggy software
disk usage
memory usage
CPU cycles
network bandwidth


Common performance bottlenecks
Usually, database systems has IO-bound resource usage and requires a lot of RAM, anti-virus software uses many CPU cycles, anti-spam software may stress CPU and network (RBL and other distributed checks). Application servers (Java, PHP, Ruby, Python, etc) may use a lot of processing.


Using the sysstat package to get historical resource usage information








Then start the sysstat daemon:


[root@box ~]# /etc/init.d/sysstat start


It starts collecting data now. Later you'll be able for example to run "sar -r" or "sar -b" to get memory or IO (disk) statistics, respectively. "sar -A" shows a full report.
Troubleshooting irregular, sudden slowness






Analyzing disk usage with iostat




Memory usage
The easiest way to analyze the system memory usage is to use ''free -m'':


This is the SwapCached figure in /proc/meminfo. 




###############################VMWare Questins###################################


Most Common VMware Interview Questions 


Here is a list of commonly asked VMware interview questions


1. Tell me about your current virtualization environment and what is your day to day activity as a VMware administrator.


Ans: We manage vCenter, Create, modify VMs. Take snpashot,Create templet,clones. Create & delete DS, Re-claim Luns, Lun consolidation.ESX/vCenter upgrades. Migrate VMs from host to host and host to cluster.


2. What is the backup solution you are using in your environment and how does it backs up your environment.


Ans: We are taking TSM backup in OS level.


3. Do you have any idea P2V, how to perform P2V. please Explain.


Ans:  vCenter Converter performs both physical-to-virtual (P2V) and virtual-to-virtual (V2V) migrations. In a P2V migration, the operating system running on a physical system is copied to a virtual machine.


In a V2V migration, an existing virtual machine running on one virtualization platform is copied to a virtual machine running on another virtualization platform.


4. How do you patch the ESXi host and VMs, explain the Update Manager.


Ans: VMs will path in OS level, ESX will patch via update ,manger in VC.


5. Tell me the process to find out the RCA for PSOD of an ESXi host.


Ans: A Purple Screen of Death (PSOD) is a diagnostic screen with white type on a purple background that is displayed when the VMkernel of an ESX/ESXi host experiences a critical error, becomes inoperative and terminates any virtual machines that are running.


Typically, the PSOD details the memory state at the time of the crash and includes other information such as the ESX/ESXI version and build, the exception type, register dump, what was running on each CPU at the time of the crash, backtrace, server uptime, error messages and core dump information.


6. How to enable the Memory ballooning for a VM.


Ans:Virtual memory ballooning allows a physical host to recapture unused memory on its guest virtual machines and allocate the resource where needed.


Balloon driver retains hold on memory causing virtual machine guest operating system performance issues.


To re-enable the Balloon driver of the particular virtual machine.Browse towards the virtual Machine Configuration file that .VMX file and remove the below entry


sched.mem.maxmemctl = “0”


1.Power down the virtual machine.
2.Right Click the virtual machine and  click Edit Settings
3.Go to Options Tab > Advanced > General


Click on Advanced Parameters and Click Add Row and add the below name and values.


sched.mem.maxmemctl  = 0  to disable the balloon driver.


7. I got a request from Application team that they need a server basically running with SQL DB, which will require 3 network VLAN, eg – Backup, end user and replication. What you will ask your network team to configure their physical switch and what configuration you will made on VC ( networking level). Please explain.


8. How to connect a USB drive to a virtual machine.


Ans: Choose VM > Removable Devices to connect specific USB devices to your virtual machine. 


        
In the vSphere Client inventory, right-click the virtual machine and select Edit Settings.
2
Click the Hardware tab and click Add.
3
Select USB Device and click Next.
4
(Optional) Select Support vMotion while device is connected.


9. What is the command to get all snapshot details lying on a datastore.


Ans : get-vm | get-snapshot | format-list


10. What is RAID 6.


Ans : RAID 6, also known as double-parity RAID, uses two parity stripes on each disk. It allows for two disk failures within the RAID set before any data is lost.


This configuration offers very high fault- and drive-failure tolerance. It is used for environments that need long data retention periods, such as archiving. One disadvantage in using RAID 6 is that each set of parities must be calculated separately, which slows write performance. Implementing RAID 6 is also more expensive because of the two extra disks required for parity.


Just like RAID 5, this does block level striping. However, it uses dual parity.
In the above diagram A, B, C are blocks. p1, p2, p3 are parities.
This creates two parity blocks for each data block.
Can handle two disk failure
This RAID configuration is complex to implement in a RAID controller, as it has to calculate two parity data for each data block.


11. Tell me the maximum number of snapshot in a VM.


Ans: I know the the maximum tree depth is 31, the maximum total number of snapshots be 496.


12. Suppose you have one cluster of 2 ESXi host, where on one host, particular one VM is consuming the high CPU and Memory usage, and creating the performance crunch on another VMs on that host, how you’ll fix the issue.


13. What are the storage technologies? Please explain.


14. What are the difference between iSCSI, FC, FCOE and NFS. Please explain.


15. What is zoning and masking.


16. What is required for zoning and masking.


17. What are the networking Bandwidth options available in VMware? i.e. – on vSwicth level.


18. What is the port number for iSCSI.


19. In case my VC goes down, does HA and DRS will work? Please explain.


20. What is the command to force power off a VM. 


21. What is FT and What are the minimum requirement for FT. 


22. What technology behind the HA? 


23. How to repair the disk descriptor header file.


24. How to configure syslog server


25. ESXi disconnection issue, what is the command to fix the disconnected host.


26. Linked mode VC.


27. Difference between esxi 4 & esx5


28. what happen if vmotion stops in between 10% and how to fix it?


29. Difference between vmotion and storage Vmotion.


30. what happen if a host is being removed from a cluster and what about those VMs running on that host?


31. P2V and V2V, what is the requirement of this, why we use V2V and how to do V2V.


32. What is a Clone and linked clone, what is the use for linked clone.


33. How to restart the Vcenter service using the command prompt.


34. How to check the vm lock issue and how to fix it.




1. VMWare Kernel is a Proprietary Kenral and is not based on any of the UNIX operating systems, it's a kernel developed by VMWare Company. 


2. The VMKernel can't boot it by itself, so that it takes the help of the 3rd party operating system. In VMWare case the kernel is booted by RedHat Linux operating system which is known as service console. 




3. The service console is developed based up on Redhat Linux Operating system, it is used to manage the VMKernel  




4. To restart webaccess service on vmware


service vmware-webaccess restart – this will restart apache tomcat app 




5. To restart ssh service on vmware


service sshd restart 




6. To restart host agent(vmware-hostd) on vmware esx server


service mgmt-vmware restart 




7. Path for the struts-config.xml
/usr/lib/vmware/webAccess/tomcat/apache-tomcat-5.5.17/webapps/ui/WEB-INF/ 






8. To start the scripted install the command is
    esx ks=nfs:111.222.333.444:/data/KS.config ksdevice=eth0
               location                                             device name




9. Virtual Network in Simple……………….


Virtual Nic(s) on Virtual Machine(s) -----> 


Physical Nic on the ESX Server (Virtual Switch - 56 Ports)  ----->


Physical Switch Port Should be trunked with all the VLANS to which the VM's need access  


All the ESX servers should be configured with Same number of Physical NIC's (vSwitches) and Connectivity also should be same, So that vMotion succeeds
All the Virtual Machines are connected to one vSwitch with Different VLANS, this means the Physical Nic(vSwitch) needs to be trunked with the same VLANS on the Physical Switch Port



10 What are the three port groups present in ESX server networking


   1. Virtual Machine Port Group - Used for Virtual Machine Network
   2. Service Console Port Group - Used for Service Console Communications
   3. VMKernel Port Group - Used for VMotion, iSCSI, NFS Communications


10 A. CISCO APIC USE TO CREATE AND PUSH THE VLAN TO VCNETER DISTRIBUTION SWITCH

10.B If Distribution switch/ vCenter down what is the impact ?

All VMS will run as it is, but there won't be any HA, DRS function available.

11. What is slot in VMWare ? OR I am not able to create a VM and through the error no resource available but we can see free resource . Why ?

Because VCenter create the slate by default with highest resource values of VMS eg : 16 Cpu and 64 GB ram, based on that it will create the slots.


11. What is the use of a Port Group?


The port group segregates the type of communication.


11 A. Types of Snapshot quice state and memory based.   Quice use for backups.it will freezings the VM in seconds and take snapshot, then release. While restore from quice state the vm will be in shutdown stage.

Memory based work based on swap. And vm will be up and running. We need the free space in DS same size of memory.

Snapshot not recommences	in DB, AD Hadoop servers.

12. What are the type of communications which requires an IP address for sure ?


   Service Console and VMKernel (VMotion and iSCSI), these communications does not happen without an ip address 

12A What is isolation IP address ?

Its use a gateway of the network to ensure the nodes are able to reach.

12B How to identify the which is the master in cluster ?

Go to setting of cluster and view the master name.

13. In the ESX Server licensing features VMotion License is showing as Not used, why?


    Even though the license box is selected, it shows as "License Not Used" until, you enable the VMotion option for specific vSwitch


14. How the Virtual Machine port group communication works ? 


             All the vm's which are configured in VM Port Group are able to connect to the physical machines on the network. 
        So this port group enables communication between vSwitch and Physical Switch to connect vm's to Physical Machine's

14A. How to chose the master in esxi cluster via election ?

Which host will have more resource access that will get elected as Master

14B What is FDM ? Falt domain manager

15. What is a VLAN ?


     A VLAN is a logical configuration on the switch port to segment the IP Traffic. For this to happen, the port must be trunked with the correct VLAN ID.

15A. Why there is a miner network drop during the VM migration ?

While migrating from one ESXi to other ESXi there will be a network drop because of changing Mac by ARP.
 
16. Does the vSwitches support VLAN Tagging? Why? 


     Yes, The vSwitches support VLAN Tagging, otherwise if the virtual machines in an esx host are connected to different VLANS, we need to install a separate physical nic (vSwitch) for every VLAN.  So every vSwitch supports upto 1016 ports.


17. What is Promiscuous Mode on vSwitch ? What happens if it sets to Accept?


     If the promiscuous mode set to Accept, all the communication is visible to all the virtual machines, in other words all the packets are sent to all the ports on vSwitch
     If the promiscuous mode set to Reject, the packets are sent to inteded port, so that the intended virtual machine was able to see the communication.


18. What is MAC address Changes ? What happens if it is set to Accept ?


When we create a virtual machine the configuration wizard generates a MAC address for that machine, you can see it in the .vmx (VM Config) file. If it doesn't matches with the MAC address in the OS this setting does not allow incoming traffic to the VM. So by setting Reject Option both MAC addresses will be remains same, and the incoming traffic will be allowed to the VM.




19. What is Forged Transmits ? What happens if it is set to Accept ?


When we create a virtual machine the configuration wizard generates a MAC address for that machine, you can see it in the .vmx (VM Config) file. If it doesn't matches with the MAC address in the OS this setting does not allow outgoing traffic from the VM. So by setting Reject Option both MAC addresses will be remains same, and the outgoing traffic will be allowed from the VM.




20. What are the core services of VC ?


VM provisioning , Task Scheduling and Event Logging




21. Can we do vMotion between two datacenters ? If possible how it will be?


Yes we can do vMotion between two datacenters, but the mandatory requirement is the VM should be powered off.


22. What is VC agent? and what service it is corresponded to? What are the minimum req's for VC agent installation ?


VC agent is an agent installed on ESX server which enables communication between VC and ESX server.


The daemon  associated with it is called vmware-hostd , and the service which corresponds to it is called as mgmt-vmware, in the event of VC agent failure just restart the service by typing the following command at the service console       


     " service mgmt-vmware restart " 
VC agent installed on the ESX server when we add it to the VC, so at the time of installtion if you are getting an error like " VC Agent service failed to install ", check the /Opt size whether it is sufficient or not.




23. How can you edit VI Client Settings and VC Server Settings ?


Click Edit Menu on VC and Select Client Settings to change VI settings
Click Administration Menu on VC and Select VC Management Server Configuration to Change VC Settings


24. What are the files that make a Virtual Machine  ?


     .vmx - Virtual Machine Configuration File
     .nvram - Virtual Machine BIOS
     .vmdk - Virtual Machine Disk file
     .vswp - Virtual Machine Swap File
     .vmsd - Virtual MAchine Snapshot Database
     .vmsn - Virtual Machine Snapshot file
     .vmss - Virtual Machine Suspended State file
     .vmware.log - Current Log File
     .vmware-#.log - Old Log file


25. What are the devices that can be added while the virtual Machine running


In VI 3.5 we can add Hard Disk and NIC's while the machine running.


In vSphere 4.0 we can add Memory and Processor along with HDD and NIC's while the machine running 


26. How to set the time delay for BIOS screen for a Virtual Machine?


Right Click on VM, select edit settings, choose options tab and select boot option, set the delay how much you want.


27. What is a template ?


We can convert a VM into Template, and it cannot be powered on once its changed to template. This is used to quick provisioning of VM's.


23. What to do to customize the windows virtual machine clone,?


copy the sysprep files to Virtual center directory on the server, so that the wizard will take the advantage of it.


24. What to do to customize the linux/unix virtual machine clone,?


VC itself includes the customization tools, as these operating systems are available as open source.


25. Does cloning from template happens between two datacenters ?


Yes.. it can, if the template in one datacenter, we can deploy the vm from that template in another datacenter without any problem.


26. What are the common issues with snapshots? What stops from taking a snapshot and how to fix it ?


If you configure the VM with Mapped LUN's, then the snapshot failed. If it is mapped as virtual then we can take a snapshot of it.
If you configure the VM with Mapped LUN's as physical, you need to remove it to take a snapshot.


27. What are the settings that are taken into to consideration when we initiate a snapshot ?


Virtual Machine Configuration (What hardware is attached to it)
State of the Virtual Machine Hard Disk file ( To revert back if needed)
State of the Virtual Machine Memory (if it is powered on)


28. What are the requirements for Converting a Physical machine to VM ?


An agent needs to be installed on the Physical machine
VI client needs to be installed with Converter Plug-in
A server to import/export virtual machines


29. What is VMWare consolidated backup ?


It is a backup framework, that supports 3rd party utilities to take backups of ESX servers and Virtual Machines. Its not a backup service.


30. To open the guided consolidation tool, what are the user requirements ?


The user must be member of administrator, The user should have "Logon as service" privileges - To give a user these privileges,open local sec policy, select Logon as service policy and add the user the user should have read access to AD to send queries
- See more at: http://www.01world.in/p/vmware-admin-interview-questions.html#sthash.UHQeNaOJ.dpuf


1.What are the products included in VMware vSphere 5.5 Bundle ?


VMware ESXi
VMware vCenter Server
VMware vSphere Client and Web Client
vSphere Update Manager
VMware vCenter Orchestrator


2.What type of Hyper-visor VMware ESXi is ?


VMware ESXi is Bare-metal hypervisor. You can directly install on server hardware.


3.What is the role of VMware vCenter server?


vCenter provides a centralized management platform and framework for all ESXi hosts and their respective VMs. vCenter  server allows IT administrators to deploy, manage, monitor, automate, and secure a virtual infrastructure in a centralized fashion. To help provide scalability , vCenter Server leverages a back-end database (Microsoft SQL Server and Oracle are both supported, among others) that stores all the data about the hosts and VMs.


4. Is it possible install vCenter server on Linux hosts ?


No.But Pre-build vCenter appliance is available in VMware portal which is Linux based.You can import the appliance as virtual machine.


5.How to update the VMware ESXi hosts with latest patches ?


We can update the ESXi hosts using VMware Update Manager(VUM). We can use this VUM add-on package on Windwos based vCenter server and Linux based vCenter server (vCenter appliance).


6.What is the use of VMware vSphere Client and vSphere Web Client ?


vCenter Server provides a centralized management framework to VMware ESXi hosts.To access vCenter server,
 you need vSphere client or vSphere Web client service enabled.




7.What is the difference between vSphere Client and vSphere web client ?


vSphere Client is traditional utility which provides user interface to vCenter server. But from VMware vSphere 5 onwards,vSphere web client   is a primary interface to manage vCenter server.For vSphere client, you need install small utility .But vSphere Web client doen’t require any software. You can directly connect using web browser.But still VUM is managed through vSphere Client .


8.What is the use of VMware vCenter Orchestrator ?


vCneter Orchestrator is used for automation on various vSphere products.


9.What are the features included in VMware vSphere 5.5 ?


vSphere High Availabitliy (HA)
vSphere Fault Tolerance
vSphere vMotion
vSphere Storage vMotion
vSphere Distributed Resource Scheduler (DRS)
virtual SAN (VSAN)
Flash Read Cache
Storage I/O Control
Network I/O Control
vSphere Replication


10.What is the use of vSphere High Availability(HA)? Where it can be applied ?


VMware vSphere HA minimize the VM’s unplanned downtime by restarting the VM guests on next available server ESXi node inacase of failure on current ESXI node. VMware HA must be enabled to reduce the VM unplanned downtime.




11.The list of questions below is intentionally broken up into 5 groups:


System Requirements for ESXi 5.5
ESXi 5.5 Installation
System Requirements for vCenter
vCenter Installation
Managing vSphere Resources


These 5 groups will test for technical proficiency that an experienced VMware administrator will [or should have].


12.The list is also what I use when interviewing someone at an administrator level who will manage the day-to-day support, build, and provisioning of:


vCenter
ESXi hosts
virtual servers
virtual networks
virtual storage


Note: This list of questions may also be used for screening vSphere Engineers or Architects.


13.VMware vSphere give you options. What are the 4 typical ways storage can be added to a vSphere?


Answer: Storage can be added via iSCSI, FC, NFS and local disk (including DAS).


14.When setting up a new datastore how many VMFS file systems should be created per LUN?


Answer: The best practice is to only create 1 VMFS file system per LUN.


15.What is the best plan for a storage failure that impacts multiple datastores?


Answer: Always have a backup of the VMs on a separate storage environment that can be used to restore the lost virtual servers.




16.This is a tough VMware interview question created just for you. Name 4 things that happen on the VMkernel networking layer?


Answer: vMotion, IP storage (iSCSI/NFS), Fault Tolerance and Virtual SAN.


17.What are the ESXi log files. ?


ESXi Log Files


/var/log/auth.log: ESXi Shell authentication success and failure attempts.
/var/log/dhclient.log: DHCP client log.
/var/log/esxupdate.log: ESXi patch and update installation logs.
/var/log/hostd.log: Host management service logs, including virtual machine and host Task and Events, communication with the vSphere Client and vCenter Server vpxa agent, and SDK connections.
/var/log/shell.log: ESXi Shell usage logs, including enable/disable and every command entered.
/var/log/boot.gz: A compressed file that contains boot log information and can be read using zcat /var/log/boot.gz|more.
/var/log/syslog.log: Management service initialization, watchdogs, scheduled tasks and DCUI use.
/var/log/usb.log: USB device arbitration events, such as discovery and pass-through to virtual machines.
/var/log/vob.log: VMkernel Observation events, similar to vob.component.event.
/var/log/vmkernel.log: Core VMkernel logs, including device discovery, storage and networking device and driver events, and virtual machine startup.
/var/log/vmkwarning.log: A summary of Warning and Alert log messages excerpted from the VMkernel logs.
/var/log/vmksummary.log: A summary of ESXi host startup and shutdown, and an hourly heartbeat with uptime, number of virtual machines running, and service resource consumption.


Logs from vCenter Server Components on ESXi 5.1  and  5.5


When an ESXi 5.1 / 5.5 host is managed by vCenter Server 5.1 and 5.5, two components are installed, each with its own logs:


/var/log/vpxa.log: vCenter Server vpxa agent logs, including communication with vCenter Server and the Host Management hostd agent.


/var/log/fdm.log: vSphere High Availability logs, produced by the fdm service. For more information, see the vSphere HA Security section of the vSphere Availability Guide.

Q22) What are the monitoring methods used for vSphere HA?

The Master and Slave hosts uses two types of monitoring the status of the hosts

Datastore Heartbeat
 Network Heartbeat
 
 Q23) How is a Master host elected in vSphere HA environment?

When vSphere HA is enabled for a cluster, all active hosts (those not in standby or maintenance mode, or not disconnected) participate in an election to choose the cluster’s master host. The host that mounts the greatest number of datastores has an advantage in the election.

Q25) What is the use of vmware tools?

VMware Tools is a suite of utilities that enhances the performance of the virtual machine’s guest operating system and improves management of the virtual machine.

Q26) What are Switch network security policies ?
Ans: 1. Promiscuous Mode – set to Reject by default to prevent guest operating systems from observing all traffic passing through a virtual switch. Set this mode to Accept only if you use a packet sniffer or intrusion detection system in the guest operating system.

2. MAC Address Changes – when set to Reject and the guest operating systems attempts to change the MAC address assigned to the virtual NIC, the virtual machine will stop receiving traffic. Set to Accept by default.

3. Forget Transmits – affects traffic that is transmitted from a virtual machine. When set to Reject, the virtual NIC drops frames that the guest operating system sends if the source MAC address is different than the one assigned to the virtual NIC. Set to Accept by default.

 
Q): What is VMKernel and why it is important?
VMkernel is a virtualization interface between a Virtual Machine and the ESXi host which stores VMs. It is responsible to allocate all available resources of ESXi host to VMs such as memory, CPU, storage etc. It’s also controlled special services such as vMotion, Fault tolerance, NFS, traffic management and iSCSI. To access these services, VMkernel port can be configured on ESXi server using a standard or distributed vSwitch. Without VMkernel, hosted VMs cannot communicate with ESXi server.

Q) What are the different types of virtualization?
There are 5 basic types of virtualization

Server virtualization: consolidates the physical server and multiple OS can be run on a single server.
Network Virtualization: Provides complete reproduction of physical network into a software-defined network.
Storage Virtualization: Provides an abstraction layer for physical storage resources to manage and optimize in virtual deployment.
Application Virtualization: increased mobility of applications and allows migration of VMs from a host on another with minimal downtime.
Desktop Virtualization: virtualize desktop to reduce cost and increase service

Q) What is vSS?
vSS stands for Virtual Standard Switch is responsible for communication of VMs hosted on a single physical host. it works like a physical switch automatically detects a VM which want to communicate with other VM on a same physical server.

Q) What is vDS?
vDS stands for Virtual Distributed Switch acts as a single switch in a whole virtual environment and is responsible to provide central provisioning, administration, and monitoring of the virtual network.

Q) What is vRealize Operation (vROP)
vROP provides the operation dashboards for performance analytics, capacity optimization and monitoring the virtual environment

Q) What is vApp?
vApp is a container or group where more than one VM can be package and manage multi-tiered applications for specific requirements for example, Web server, database server, and application server can be configured as a vApp and can be defined their power-on and power-off sequence.

Q) What settings can be configured for vApp?
We can configure several settings for vApp such as CPU and memory allocation, and IP allocation policy etc.

Miscellaneous

Q) What is VMware DPM?
Stands for Distributed Power Management is a feature of VMware DRS is used to monitor required resources in a cluster. When the resources are decreases due to low usage, VMware DPM consolidates workloads and shut down the hosts which are not being used, and when resources are increased it automatically power on the un-used hosts.

Q) What is the command used to restart SSH, NTP & Vmware Web access?

Ans: Service sshd restart
Service ntpd restrat
Service vmware–webaccess restart

Q) What is EVC stands ?

Ans : EVC stands for Enhanced vMotion Compatibility which is a vCenter Server cluster-centric feature allowing virtual machines to vMotion or migrate across ESXi hosts equipped with dissimilar (diffrent, but same family) processors in the same cluster



------------------------

Q: What is the process to create an RPM? What is the command that would generate an RPM and SRPM?
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Q: What sections and fields you usually use when writing a spec?
----------------------------------------------------------------

Q: What section in the spec is important to update each time you are making changes?

What is the meaning of the following special variables and when would you use them? $?, $#, $!
Note: Use sed to solve every question.

Given the next text:

Its a me, Mario
Its a me, Mario
Its a me, Luigi
Its a me, Mario
Its a me, Mario
Its a me, Bowser

1. Remove the line with 'Luigi'

2. Replace 'Mario', in all lines, to 'Toad'


 
